between DNS structure and data contained in the certificates. The only exception is when the Domain Component (DC) attributes are used in the certificate's Subject. 
The DC attributes are used to specify domain components of a DNS name, for example the domain name example.com could be represented by using the dc=com, dc=example format. If the CA's subject field would make use of such a format,  the Issuer field would allow client applications to perform DNS lookups for the provided domain where the information about repositories and services could be stored. 
However, currently, the practice is very different. In fact it is extremely difficult for a client to map digital certificates to DNS records because the DC format is not widely adopted by existing CAs. For example, only one certificate from IE7/Outlook certificates store uses the domain components to provide a mapping between the certificate and an Internet Domain. 
The Ather 450 was first unveiled in February 2016 while aiming for a 2016 or early-2017 launch. But after delays it was finally launched in September 2018 in Bengaluru along with its lower-end sibling, the Ather 340. Ather 340 was later discontinued due to low demand. 
The scooter was made available in Chennai in October 2019 with 10 charging stations set up across the city. 
In January 2020, Ather Energy introduced Ather 450X, quicker, more intelligent than its predecessor Ather 450. Deliveries of Ather 450X started in  November and is now available in Bengaluru, Chennai, Delhi-NCR, Mumbai, Pune, Ahmedabad, Kochi, Mysore, Hubli, Jaipur and Hyderabad. 
The scooter features a 7-inch touchscreen dashboard, and comes with features like on-board navigation, diagnostics, all-LED lighting, fast charging, reverse parking assist, auto-cancelling indicators, smartphone integration, and cloud connectivity to send and receive data from Ather's servers. It also has an incognito mode that does not share the user's GPS data with Ather. 
Ather Energy offers an upgraded version of Ather 450 called the Ather 450 Plus which has a top speed of 70 kmph and a True Range of 70 km in Eco mode. The Ather 450 Plus offers 4G connectivity, onboard navigation, and other connected features but does not have Bluetooth connectivity and the Warp mode. 
The scooter is available in Bengaluru, Chennai, Delhi-NCR, Mumbai, Pune, Ahmedabad, Kochi, Mysore, Hubli, Jaipur and Hyderabad and will be available in 16 more Indian cities in 2021.  
The limited-edition Ather 450X Series 1 scooter was available only to those Ather Energy enthusiasts who pre-ordered the scooter before the national launch of the Ather 450X on January 28th, 2020.  
The 2021 America East Men's Basketball Conference Tournament was the postseason men's basketball tournament for the America East Conference that began February 27, 2021 and ended March 13, 2021. Starting in the semifinals, all tournament games were played on the home arenas of the higher-seeded school. In Pod Play and the Quarterfinals, games were played at either New Hampshire or Hartford. The winner received the conference's automatic bid to the NCAA Tournament. 
Age of Bronze is an American comics series by writer/artist Eric Shanower retelling the legend of the Trojan War. It began in 1998 and is published by Image Comics. 
The series aims to be true to all literary traditions, from Homer's Iliad to Shakespeare's Troilus and Cressida, as well as to the archaeology of the Bronze Age Aegean. When complete it is projected to comprise seven volumes. 
After a six year hiatus issue 34 was published in 2019, the first to be in color. Individual issues will henceforth be solely digital except a handful printed to fulfill existing print subscriptions. No further print subscriptions will be accepted. Book collections are being reissued in color. Plans are to publish two issues a year. 
Shanower won the Eisner Award for best writer/artist in 2001 and 2003, and was nominated for the Ignatz Award for outstanding artist in 1999, for his work on Age of Bronze. 
That Gal of Burke's is a lost 1916 silent short film directed by Frank Borzage and starring Ann Little. It was released by the Mutual Film Company. 
Werner Andreas Albert conducted the orchestra in a recording of Robert Volkmann's orchestral works, two ouvertures, two symphonies and a cello concerto with soloist Johannes Wohlmacher. 
Alun Francis conducted a recording of Carl Reinecke's four piano concertos with pianist Klaus Hellwig. 
Conducted by Michail Jurowski, they played in 1995 the premiere recording of Dmitri Shostakovich's unfinished opera Die Spieler (The Gamblers) after Nikolai Gogol, completed by Krzysztof Meyer in 1981, sung in Russian by soloists of the Bolshoi Theatre. 
Toshiyuki Kamioka conducted Einojuhani Rautavaara's Symphony No.7 "Angel of Light" in January 2000 in Detmold, Paderborn, Herford, Bad Salzuflen and Minden. 
In 2004 Benjamin Britten's War Requiem was performed in the Mainz Cathedral in a collaboration with Joshard Daus and the EuropaChorAkademie. 
A program of orchestral Lieder and works of Hans Pfitzner and Richard Strauss with baritone Hans Christoph Begermann and conductor Otto Tausk was also performed in Witten. 
In 2017, Dirk Kaftan conducted the first series of concerts, performing Alban Berg's Violin Concerto with Liza Ferschtman as soloist, and  Bruckner's Fourth Symphony at seven locations, including Hamm and Marburg. 
In the 2020/21 season, the orchestra had to play short concerts with small groups of players, due to the COVID-19 pandemic. Yves Abel conducted a program of Barber's Adagio for Strings, Mendelssohn's Violin Concerto with Anna Tifu as the soloist, and Poulenc's Sinfonietta (Poulenc). 
The orchestra has played in productions of stage works by Richard Wagner, an ongoing project of the Stadttheater Minden on an initiative by Jutta Hering-Winckler, president of the local Richard Wagner Society. The conductor has been Frank Beermann, GMD of the Chemnitz Opera: 
Zabrus foveipennis is a species of ground beetle in the Pterostichinae subfamily that is endemic to Turkey. 
A README file contains information about the other files in a directory or archive of computer software. A form of documentation, it is usually a simple plain text file called README, Read Me, READ.ME, README.TXT, README.md (to indicate the use of Markdown), or README.1ST. 
In particular, there is a long history of free software and open-source software including a README file; the GNU Coding Standards encourage including one to provide "a general overview of the package". 
Since the advent of the web as a de facto standard platform for software distribution, many software packages have moved (or occasionally, copied) some of the above ancillary files and pieces of information to a website or wiki, sometimes including the README itself, or sometimes leaving behind only a brief README file without all of the information required by a new user of the software.  
The expression "readme file" is also sometimes used generically, for other files with a similar purpose.[citation needed] For example, the source-code distributions of many free software packages (especially those following the Gnits Standards or those produced with GNU Autotools) include a standard set of readme files: 
Also commonly distributed with software packages are an FAQ file and a TODO file, which lists planned improvements. 
The following are the events in related to Philippine law in 2017. This includes developments in criminal investigations of national notability. 
In Japanese mountaineering terms, Go is about 1/10 time rate in climbing journey. It is sometimes called "station" in English.[clarification needed] 
In July 2020, Geukens was with his wife and a friendly couple on cycling holiday in the Netherlands. On 22 July after supper he was not feeling well. He died later that evening, aged 57, presumably as a result of heart failure. 
Following Hochstetter's departure from New Zealand, the Nelson Provincial Council asked Haast to build on the geological work already completed. In particular, he was to focus on identifying valuable minerals in the ranges between Nelson and the Grey River, to scout out travelling routes to Westland, and to complete a topographical map of the area. 
Haast's topographical and geological survey of south west Nelson took eight months, from January to August 1860. His report to the Nelson Provincial Council was published in early 1861 and of note were his discoveries of coal near the present-day town of Westport. He also found that the coal seams discovered by Thomas Brunner in 1848 were of a higher quality than first thought. He found gold in several tributaries of the Upper Buller, and reported on his botanical and zoological findings. 
In 1870, Haast was appointed the curator of Canterbury Museum. The specimens that he collected on his expeditions of earlier years were a key part of the early holdings of the museum. Following the establishment of the Canterbury University College, he lectured in geology from 1873, and was made professor in 1876. 
His Geology of the Provinces of Canterbury and Westland, N.Z., was published in 1879. He was elected fellow of the Royal Society in 1867, and was given a hereditary knighthood by the Emperor of Austria in 1875. He was awarded the Royal Geographical Society's Patron's Gold Medal in 1884 for his explorations in New Zealand. 
Haast travelled to England in 1886, as New Zealand's commissioner to the Colonial and Indian Exhibition in London. While there, he was made Knight Commander of the Order of St Michael and St George for his services. He had previously been made a Companion of the same order three years previously. 
Haast died on 16 August 1887, following his return to Christchurch. He is buried in the grounds of Holy Trinity Church in Stanmore Road, Christchurch. He was survived by his second wife, Mary Dobson, daughter of the Canterbury Provincial Engineer Edward Dobson, and the couple's five children. 
USS Bomazeen was originally the Bathgate, a tugboat built in 1919 at New York and purchased by the United States Navy on 29 December 1941 from the Meseck Towing Lines. She was renamed Bomazeen; designated YT 238 and placed in service on 4 February 1942. 
Gael Briane Mackie (born December 16, 1988) is a Canadian artistic gymnast who competed at the 2004 Summer Olympics. 
Mackie's father, William Mackie, twice qualified for the Canadian Olympic team in men's gymnastics, but both times, injuries prevented him from competing. Her younger sister, Charlotte, also competed as an elite gymnast, including at the 2009 World Artistic Gymnastics Championships. 
Coached by Vladimir and Svetlana Lashin at Omega Gymnastics, Mackie came to prominence on the Canadian gymnastics scene by winning the senior national championship at age 14. 
As a junior elite gymnast, Mackie was the national champion on vault in 2001, and on vault, floor, and in the all-around in 2002. In 2003, she became the senior national all-around champion, as well as the Elite Canada champion on the uneven bars and balance beam. She was a member of the Canadian teams at the 2003 World Championships and at the 2002 and 2003 Pan American Games. 
In 2004, Mackie was named to the Canadian team for the Olympic Games in Athens, along with Melanie Banville, Amelie Plante, Heather Purnell, Kate Richardson, and Kylie Stone. In the qualifications round, she competed only on the uneven bars. Canada finished 10th and did not advance to the team final. 
This biographical article related to Canadian artistic gymnastics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Nomafrench Mbombo (born 6 September 1966) is a South African academic and politician who has been the Western Cape Provincial Minister of Health since 2015 and a Member of the Western Cape Provincial Parliament since 2014. She previously served as the Western Cape Provincial Minister of Cultural Affairs and Sport from 2014 to 2015. Mbombo was the Federal Leader of the Democratic Alliance Women's Network from 2018 to 2021. 
Mbombo was born on 6 September 1966. She spent her childhood in Mdantsane, East London in the former Cape Province. 
She earned a PhD in the fields of Gender and Human Rights from the University of the Western Cape. Mbombo achieved her Masters in Maternal and Child Health from the University of KwaZulu-Natal, and her Bachelors in Nursing Science from the University of Fort Hare. She was then employed in the Eastern Cape and KwaZulu-Natal provincial and local government health departments. 
Before being involved in politics, she worked as an associate professor at the Faculty of Community and Health Sciences Department of the University of the Western Cape. 
She has also served as a member of various organisations, such as the National Committee of Confidential Enquiries on Maternal Death, NEPAD, and the UN Office of Human Rights: Women & Gender Directorate. 
Mbombo, previously an African National Congress supporter, joined the DA in 2013, after attending a DA meeting for black professionals. 
Mbombo was elected to the Western Cape Provincial Parliament in the 8 May 2014 election and was sworn in as a Member on 21 May 2014. She represents the Philippi region of the City of Cape Town. Premier Helen Zille appointed Mbombo to the post of Western Cape Provincial Minister of Cultural Affairs and Sport. She was sworn in as Provincial Minister on 26 May 2014. 
In December 2014, Premier Zille announced that Theuns Botha and Mbombo would exchange ministerial positions. Mbombo would become Western Cape Provincial Minister of Health, while Botha would take her position. The changes came into effect on 1 January 2015. 
In 2018, incumbent Democratic Alliance Women's Network Federal Leader Denise Robinson announced that she would not seek re-election to another term. Mbombo subsequently declared her candidacy and was elected at the party's Federal Congress on 7 April 2018. 
In May 2019, newly elected premier Alan Winde announced that he had retained Mbombo in her post as Provincial Minister of Health. 
In October 2019, she declared her candidacy for interim Federal Chairperson of the Democratic Alliance following Athol Trollip's resignation. She lost to Ivan Meyer. 
In December 2020, Mbombo was criticised for posting on Facebook that she was on holiday in Limpopo, amid the second wave of COVID-19 infections in the Western Cape. She said that it was a "well-deserved, long overdue break". 
On 28 April 2021, Mbombo resigned as the Federal Leader of the DA's Women's Network. Her resignation came after Bonginkosi Madikizela resigned as DA provincial leader and the Provincial Minister of Transport and Public Works. 
In March 2020, Mbombo came into contact with the French consul-general Laurent Amar who tested positive for COVID-19. She consequently went into self-isolation and later tested negative. 
Shoot 'em ups (also known as shmups or STGs) are a sub-genre  of shooter video games, which are in turn a sub-genre of action video games. There is no consensus as to which design elements compose a shoot 'em up; some restrict the definition to games featuring spacecraft and certain types of character movement, while others allow a broader definition including characters on foot and a variety of perspectives. 
Fixed shooters restrict the player along with enemies to a single screen; this can also include giving them a single axis of motion. Everything including movement is constrained to one screen. Examples include Space Invaders (1978), Galaxian (1979), Centipede (1980), Galaga (1981), Pooyan (1982), Galactix (1992), Love Hero (2019), Doughlings: Invasion (2019). 
Multidirectional shooters feature 360-degree movement where the protagonist may rotate and move in any direction. Multidirectional shooters with one joystick for movement and one joystick for firing in any direction independent of movement are called twin-stick shooters. 
Space shooters involve piloting spacecraft in an outer space setting. Following the success of Space Invaders, space shooters were the dominant subgenre during the late 1970s to early 1980s. These games can overlap with other subgenres as well as space combat games. 
Tube shooters feature craft flying through an abstract tube, such as Tempest (1981) and Gyruss (1983). There is still a single axis of motion, making these a subset of fixed shooters. 
 Cute 'em ups feature brightly colored graphics depicting surreal settings and enemies. Cute 'em ups tend to have unusual, oftentimes completely bizarre opponents for the player to fight, with Twinbee and Fantasy Zone first pioneering the subgenre, along with Parodius, Cotton, and Harmful Park being additional key games. Some cute 'em ups may employ overtly sexual characters and innuendo. 
Vertically scrolling shooters or vertical scrolling shooters present the action from above and scroll up (or occasionally down) the screen. 
Side-scrolling shooters or horizontal scrolling shooters present a side-on view and scroll horizontally. 
Isometrically scrolling shooters or isometric shooters, such as Sega's Zaxxon (1982), use an isometric point of view. 
Run 'n' gun or run and gun games have protagonists that fight on foot, often with the ability to jump. Examples include Commando, Ikari Warriors, Contra, Cuphead and Metal Slug. Run-and-gun games may use side scrolling, vertical scrolling or isometric viewpoints and may feature multidirectional movement. 
Video game journalist Brian Ashcraft argues that Spacewar! (1962), an early mainframe game, was the first shoot 'em up video game. Spacewar was developed at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology in 1961, for the amusement of the developers. It was remade four times as an arcade game during the early to mid-1970s. The game featured combat between two spacecraft. 
With these elements, Space Invaders set the general template for the shoot 'em up genre. It became one of the most widely cloned shooting games, spawning more than 100 Space Invaders clones. It has influenced most shooting games released since then, which have continued to rely on "the multiple life, progressively difficult level paradigm" of Space Invaders according to Eugene Jarvis. 
The term "shmup" is believed to have been coined in 1985 by the British Commodore 64 magazine Zzap!64. In the July 1985 issue, the term was used by the editor Chris Anderson and reviewer Julian Rignall. 
West Englewood is an unincorporated community located within Teaneck in Bergen County, New Jersey, United States. 
This Bergen County, New Jersey state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
It was added to the National Register of Historic Places in 1985. It is located in the Chuckatuck Historic District. 
This article about a property in Suffolk, Virginia on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jefferson Lake Coburn was an American architect in Maine practicing in the firm Jefferson Coburn & Sons. 
This article about a United States architect or architectural firm is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A Hill repair is an anti-acid reflux procedure.  It is similar to the Nissen fundoplication.  Though far less common owing to a greater degree of difficulty, studies indicate a similar rate of efficacy.  It is performed almost exclusively in the Pacific Northwest. 
Biricodar or incel (INN, codename VX-710) was a pharmaceutical drug under development by Vertex Pharmaceuticals to help treat ovarian cancer patients, that never reached the market. 
This antineoplastic or immunomodulatory drug article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Matrimony.com Limited, whose flagship brand is BharatMatrimony, is a network of matchmaking services. More than 4000 employees work at over 20 offices across India. The company also has offices in the US and Dubai. 
BharatMatrimony operates in 15 regional languages. The company has pioneered several matrimony-related services such as Assistedmatrimony, a personalized matchmaking service for busy professionals where a trained relationship manager does the matches and facilitates meetings between prospects.  Its premium service, Elite Matrimony, offers matchmaking services for the upper crust that ensures privacy and confidentiality during the process. 
In 2005 BharatMatrimony launched BharatMatrimony Centres, its offline division. The company pioneered the personal assisted service in 2008 with the launch of BM Privilege. This was then renamed Privilege Matrimony in 2009. Later it became Assisted Matrimony. Trained relationship managers understand member preferences, search for matching profiles and send them to members. They then contact prospects and facilitate meetings on mutual consent of prospective families. 
 "Elite Matrimony", launched in 2008, caters to wealthy individuals or their families seeking matrimonial alliances, and is a part of Matrimony.com's premium matchmaking service.  The website employs staff who assist members in searching for potential partners, and its services are available only to invited members who must pay a matchmaking service fee ranging from 60,000 rupees to over 2,220,000 rupees.  The site was founded in 2008 by Murugavel Janakiraman in Chennai. 
In 2012, the company came out with Matrimony Directory, a wedding vendors classifieds portal It features over 50,000 wedding related services in over 20 cities. 
BharatMatrimony has mobile apps for iPhone, iPad, BlackBerry, Nokia and Android users in India. It also has an upgraded WAP site. Community Matrimony also has mobile apps. 
Back in the early 2000s, when there was skepticism about online matrimony and fear about paying online, the company pioneered doorstep collections in India. The company introduced features on their website like Matchboard, SoulMate Search, AstroMatch, and Express Interest to help customers make the right matches. 
In 2006, Bharat Matrimony earned an entry in the Limca Book of World Records for having facilitated the highest number of documented marriages online in India. 
Redrice School was an independent school located at Red Rice, near Andover in Hampshire, United Kingdom. 
The school was founded by Adrian Stokes and Richard Arnold Jones in 1961 with patronage of The Bishop of Portsmouth. and with a Board of Governors chaired by Thomas Shaw, 3rd Baron Craigmyle.  A later chairman was William O'Brien. 
The school was dedicated to the 40 English Martyrs, whose names were given to the houses and dormitories. The school crest depicted the martyr's crown and palm leaves. 
After the Second World War, there was an increased demand for Catholic education. In the private sector, the Catholic preparatory and public schools were often oversubscribed. When Redrice opened in 1961 it was the first entirely lay-run Catholic public school. 
Originally, there was a planned limit of 200 boarders. A pupil could start after passing the Common Entrance examination, and end after taking 'A' levels. That five-year period, and through the use of streaming, gave an average class size of fewer than 15 pupils. 
The name changed in 1980 from 'Redrice School' to 'Redrice College' to assist in marketing the school abroad. The school closed in 1982, and the premises were taken over by Farleigh School. 
The school's former pupils are named 'old martyrs'. Annual reunion dinners take place in London. In February 2013, there were over 140 ex-pupils connected in a Facebook group for ex-pupils and staff. 
Some trees were removed to create space for rugby and cricket fields. New buildings were built onto the existing building to accommodate classrooms and dormitories. Some attempts were made to convert an ornamental water garden into a swimming pool. A new house was built in the grounds as accommodation for one of the headmasters (Adrian Stokes) and his family. 
Arahiwi had a population of 156 at the 2018 New Zealand census, a decrease of 21 people (-11.9%) since the 2013 census, and an increase of 6 people (4.0%) since the 2006 census. There were 54 households. There were 81 males and 75 females, giving a sex ratio of 1.08 males per female. The median age was 31.1 years (compared with 37.4 years nationally), with 39 people (25.0%) aged under 15 years, 33 (21.2%) aged 15 to 29, 72 (46.2%) aged 30 to 64, and 9 (5.8%) aged 65 or older. 
Although some people objected to giving their religion, 59.6% had no religion, 28.8% were Christian and 3.8% had other religions. 
Of those at least 15 years old, 6 (5.1%) people had a bachelor or higher degree, and 18 (15.4%) people had no formal qualifications. The median income was $33,900, compared with $31,800 nationally. The employment status of those at least 15 was that 66 (56.4%) people were employed full-time, 24 (20.5%) were part-time, and 3 (2.6%) were unemployed. 
Barbra Streisand is an American singer, actress, and filmmaker. With a career spanning seven decades, she has achieved success in multiple fields of entertainment and is one of the few entertainers who have been awarded an Emmy, Grammy, Oscar, and Tony Award (EGOT). 
Steven Lloyd Welch is an American Christian musician, worship leader, and pastor, who primarily plays Christian pop and contemporary worship music. He has released one solo album, Color of Love, in 2012, with Dream Records. 
Steven Lloyd Welch, the son of Stan, a pastor, and Sherry Lynn Welch, who is the older brother to Sumer, who is his sister. He was formerly the worship leader at James River Assembly in Springfield, Missouri, while he eventually left to take a position with Eastridge Church in Issaquah, Washington. His wife is Danina, and they have children together. 
His professional music career started in 2011, with the recording, Color of Love, that was released on September 18, 2012, from Dream Records. 
The complete Bylaws of the corporation are publicly available in both Canadian languages on the official website of the Association. 
Presidents of SF Canada in order of succession have been: Candas Jane Dorsey, Karl Schroeder, Jean-Louis Trudel, Hugh Spencer, Mark Shainblum, Candas Jane Dorsey, Derryl Murphy, Colleen Anderson, Edward Willett, Steve Stanton, Peter Halasz, Lynda Williams, Robert Dawson. 
The ninth season of the animated television series, Archer, subtitled  Danger Island, premiered on April 25, 2018, on FXX. 
FXX announced that season 9 would see a change in the time again, with this series set between 1938 and 1939. Along with the change in the time, the network announced that although the same voice cast will return as in previous seasons, they will again play different versions of their characters. This means that Archer, who was found shot in actress Veronica Deane's pool after season seven, remains in a coma, and the events of the season are of his imagination. 
These different versions have similar personalities to their "normal" counterparts but take on different jobs or roles and have different relationships. The season's premise sees Archer as an alcoholic co-pilot with Pam, living on the lush and mysterious Pacific island of Mitimotu. 
The season also pays homage to the short-lived 1980s television series Tales of the Gold Monkey which featured a very similar premise as Danger Island. Adam Reed has previously claimed that Tales of the Gold Monkey was "one of my favorite shows ever." 
Manahan Sitompul is an Indonesian judge and currently one of the justices of the Constitutional Court of Indonesia. 
In January 2017, Sitompul was investigated alongside several other justices on the Constitutional Court in relation to a graft scandal. Chief Justice Arief Hidayat cleared Sitompul and colleague I Dewa Gede Palguna of any wrongdoing, but found evidence of bribery in an animal health case that led to the dismissal of their (former) colleague Patrialis Akbar. 
As per the 2001 census, Thalavoi (North) had a total population of 2426 with 1175 males and 1251 females. 
This article related to a location in Ariyalur district, Tamil Nadu, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Originally all 15 engines were painted green. From the middle of the 1970s, however, they were resprayed bordeaux red with a wide, ivory-coloured stripe. This was later painted much narrower on the sides. The DB also had the engines repainted in the livery of the time. 
M101 OT2015-1 (also known as PSN J14021678+5426205, iPTF13afz and AT 2015dl) is a contact binary that merged into a single star, in a process known as a luminous red nova (LRN). M101 OT2015-1 is an optical transient located in the Pinwheel Galaxy (M101). Luminous red novae are representatives of the sparsely populated class of exploding variables which is known since 1988 when such a star appeared in the M31 galaxy. 
The final confirmation came a year later, on 2016 January 28, from observations carried out in several astronomic observatories in Russia. 
"I Am a Lonesome Hobo" is a song written and recorded by Bob Dylan, released in 1967 on his eighth studio album, John Wesley Harding. The song was produced by Bob Johnston. 
The original Rolling Stone review of John Wesley Harding from 1968 claimed that the song recalled Arthur Rimbaud's "miniature masterpiece My Bohemian Existence" and noted how Dylan "brilliantly...reverses the role of the Hobo and tells us what road one may end up on if one does not 'stay free from petty jealousies, live by no man's code', hold your judgment for yourself and keep cool". 
Dylan scholar Tony Attwood sees the song as "fitting neatly alongside 'Drifter's Escape', representing the other side of the coin of the outcast in American society". Whereas the narrator of "Drifter's Escape" is an honest man who "steals only in desperation", the narrator of "I Am a Lonesome Hobo" is a man who's "past success and well-being financially...has corrupted him". 
Jochen Markhorst calls it a song of "simple beauty" but also "a neglected child" since Dylan never played the song again after recording it for John Wesley Harding. Markhorst also notes that, "To compensate: almost every cover is very attractive". 
Russell Lea is a small suburb in the inner-west of Sydney, in the state of New South Wales, Australia. Russell Lea is located 8 kilometres west of the Sydney central business district in the local government area of the City of Canada Bay. 
Russell Lea sits on the western shore of Iron Cove, on the Parramatta River. It is a quiet tree-lined suburb with large waterfront homes as well as more traditional federation homes. 
Russell Lea takes its name from one of its original settlers, Russell Barton, who was a pastoralist, mine owner and politician. He developed the "Russell Lea Estate" on a 24-hectare (60-acre) grant. 
In the 2016 census, Russell Lea has a population of 5,001 persons, of whom 2,621 (52.4%) were female and 2,380 (47.6%) were male.   
The song's accompanying music video premiered on October 9, 2015 on O.T. Genasis's YouTube account. Since its release, the music video has received over 220 million views on YouTube. 
In 2016, Young Dolph performed his hit single "Cut It" live at the Royal South Central in Atlanta along with Solo Lucci and more to promote his debut album "King of Memphis". The performance was filmed by StayOnGrindTV's Director LookImHD. 
The official remix entitled "Cut It Remix: Part One" features Young Thug and Kevin Gates. The second remix entitled "Cut It Remix: Part Two" features Lil Wayne and T.I. 
Moe railway station is located on the Gippsland line, in Victoria, Australia. It serves the town of Moe, and opened on 1 March 1878. 
It was formerly the junction station for the narrow gauge Walhalla line and the broad gauge Thorpdale and Yallourn lines. 
Construction of the current station building commenced in late 1991, and was completed by 1992, with the former station building demolished shortly after. 
She worked as a schoolteacher prior to her June 1865 marriage to Dr. John G. Blake, a graduate of Harvard Medical School who had admired her published poems before they met in person. They had eleven children; of the six that survived into adulthood, five boys graduated from Harvard University and one daughter graduated from Radcliffe College. 
Science of Life Studies 24/7 Malaysia (better known as SOLS 24/7), is tax exempted, humanitarian organisation registered in Malaysia. 
The organisation was created to provide subsidised or free non-formal education programs to underserved communities and currently has 14 ongoing programs and projects in Malaysia. 
In 2013, co-founder Raj Ridvan Singh further expanded the vision and mission of SOLS 24/7 and founded its Social Empowerment Arm. 
Cambodia: Started by Raj Ridvan Singh's father, brother and himself in January 2000 (under registration of LCDI), and officially re-registered in 2005 (under registration GDI). 
SOLS 24/7 is registered with the Companies Commission of Malaysia as a company limited by guarantee with the registration number 811025T since March 25, 2008. 
 Raj Ridvan Singh left school in Malacca at the age of 14 without sitting for the Penilaian Menengah Rendah (PMR) Malaysian public examinations. 
He also secured a Microsoft Grant for the SOLS 24/7 social enterprise in Timor-Leste after presenting to a panel during the Scale-up Pitching session at YSEF in 2008. In 2009 he set up two state-of-the-art ICT Labs for the Universidade Nacional de Timor-Leste fully funded by USAID. Raj Ridvan Singh has been instrumental in establishing the SOLS 24/7 Malaysia Youth Development Center, in Kuala Lumpur. 
Raj Ridvan Singh received a letter of praise and support from Nobel Peace Prize Laureate and President of Timor Leste Dr. Jose Ramos Horta for SOLS 24/7's efforts in Timor Leste in July 2009. 
'Science of Life' comes from the concept that if every child could be scientifically shown the challenges and possibilities they would face in life and also shown their true self, they will be able to prepare and develop all the skills needed to live a great life. 'Life' constitutes all the time (24 hours a day, 7 days a week), and is represented now. Not the future, or after life only. 
'Science of Life' is also the name of the comprehensive program for personal and youth development which is taught exclusively in all SOLS 24/7 training centers. This program explores human potential through a series of concepts, discussions, activities and real life examples dealing with topics such as 'Leadership', 'Character Development', 'Responsibility', 'Love & Unity', 'Righteousness', 'Dynamism' and much more. 
The SOLS 24/7 Main Training Center, Dili officially opened its doors to the Timorese youth in November 2006. From an initial 16 students, SOLS 24/7 now has training centers in 11 of the 12 districts in Timor Leste. 
SOLS 24/7 is also operating another initiative called SOLS Computers which refurbishes donated computers and distributes it to rural and poor welfare homes, orphanages, old folks home and communities. SOLS 24/7 is also a Microsoft Registered Refurbisher. 
SOLS 24/7 also acts as a hub for blood donations, community area cleaning, vaccinations as well as partnering with other NGO's and grassroots projects to generate a greater impact for those in need. 
Bikya (also known as Furu) is a potentially extinct Southern Bantoid language spoken in Cameroon. It is one of the three, or four, Furu languages. In 1986 four surviving speakers were identified, although only one (a man in his seventies) spoke the language fluently. 
English linguist Dr. David Dalby filmed an 87-year-old African woman who spoke Bikya as her native tongue. At the time, it was believed that she was the last Bikya speaker. 
Tori are of fundamental importance in the theory of algebraic groups and Lie groups and in the study of the geometric objects associated to them such as symmetric spaces and buildings. 
In most places we suppose that the base field is perfect (for example finite or characteristic zero). This hypothesis is required to have a smooth group schemepg 64, since for an algebraic group     G   {\displaystyle G}   to be smooth over characteristic     p   {\displaystyle p}  , the maps
Over the field of real numbers      R    {\displaystyle \mathbb {R} }   there are exactly (up to isomorphism) two tori of rank 1: 
This equivalence can be generalized to pass between groups of multiplicative type (a distinguished class of formal groups) and arbitrary abelian groups, and such a generalization can be convenient if one wants to work in a well-behaved category, since the category of tori doesn't have kernels or filtered colimits. 
Given a finite separable field extension L/K and a torus T over L, we have a Galois module isomorphism 
If T is the multiplicative group, then this gives the restriction of scalars a permutation module structure.  Tori whose weight lattices are permutation modules for the Galois group are called quasi-split, and all quasi-split tori are finite products of restrictions of scalars. 
As seen in the examples above tori can be represented as linear groups. An alternative definition for tori is: 
If      G    {\displaystyle \mathbf {G} }   is a semisimple algebraic group over a field     F   {\displaystyle F}   then: 
Obviously the rank is greater than or equal the     F   {\displaystyle F}  -rank; the group is called split if and only if equality holds (that is, there is a maximal torus in      G    {\displaystyle \mathbf {G} }   which is split over     F   {\displaystyle F}  ). The group is called anisotropic if it contains no split tori (i.e. its     F   {\displaystyle F}  -rank is zero). 
Note that this allows to define the      Q    {\displaystyle \mathbf {Q} }  -rank of any lattice in a semisimple Lie group, as the dimension of its asymptotic cone. 
In his work on Tamagawa numbers, T. Ono introduced a type of functorial invariants of tori over finite separable extensions of a chosen field k.  Such an invariant is a collection of positive real-valued functions fK on isomorphism classes of tori over K, as K runs over finite separable extensions of k, satisfying three properties: 
The notion of invariant given above generalizes naturally to tori over arbitrary base schemes, with functions taking values in more general rings.  While the order of the extension group is a general invariant, the other two invariants above do not seem to have interesting analogues outside the realm of fraction fields of one-dimensional domains and their completions. 
The 1951 Boston Red Sox season was the 51st season in the franchise's Major League Baseball history. The Red Sox finished third in the American League (AL) with a record of 87 wins and 67 losses, 11 games behind the New York Yankees, who went on to win the 1951 World Series. 
Note: Pos = Position; G = Games played; AB = At bats; H = Hits; Avg. = Batting average; HR = Home runs; RBI = Runs batted in 
Note: G = Games played; AB = At bats; H = Hits; Avg. = Batting average; HR = Home runs; RBI = Runs batted in 
Note: G = Games pitched; IP = Innings pitched; W = Wins; L = Losses; ERA = Earned run average; SO = Strikeouts 
Note: G = Games pitched; IP = Innings pitched; W = Wins; L = Losses; ERA = Earned run average; SO = Strikeouts 
Note: G = Games pitched; W = Wins; L = Losses; SV = Saves; ERA = Earned run average; SO = Strikeouts 
The Berkshire Athenaeum is a public library (1872) based on a previously private athenaeum, and now at 1 Wendell Avenue, Pittsfield, Massachusetts in the Berkshires, United States. Like many New England libraries, the Berkshire Athenaeum started as a private organization. 
In 1903, the Berkshire Athenaeum assumed the responsibility for the newly created Berkshire Museum, and was both a public library and museum until the museum spun off in 1932. The Berkshire Athenaeum is now Pittsfield's public library and contains a collection of more than 150,000 items. The library's special collections on local history, genealogy, local author Herman Melville, and other Berkshire authors are some of the best in the northeast. 
Designed by New York architect William Appleton Potter, the original Berkshire Athenaeum building was erected in 1874-1876 as a gift from railway magnate and native son Thomas Allen. It is in the High Victorian Gothic style, constructed of dark blue limestone from Great Barrington, red freestone from Longmeadow and red granite from Missouri. The 1876 building became the Berkshire County Registry of Deeds in 1975 when the Berkshire Athenaeum moved to the current library building two doors away. 
The collection is geared to those with historical interest in the City of Pittsfield and its residents. With close to 4,700 square feet, the department is located at the east end of the main floor of the Athenaeum, with additional closed stack space located in the storage room on the lower floor. 
The Local History Collection provides historical and genealogical information primarily about the Berkshires and greater Berkshire area, but it also includes New England, eastern New York State, and Southern Canada to showcase the origin of Berkshire families. 
The Berkshire Authors Room houses a collection of books and other materials by and about authors with a connection to the Berkshires. 
The Herman Melville Memorial Room collection includes first editions of writer Herman Melville's works, manuscripts, family letters, and annotated volumes from his personal library.  Paintings. prints, and photographs of him are also available. In addition, the collection showcases biographies and critical studies works produced by Melville scholars. 
On November 15, 2011, CBS announced the cancellation of The Early Show, and replacement by a new morning program that CBS News chairman Jeff Fager and president David Rhodes stated would "redefine the morning television landscape." The Early Show ended its twelve-year run on January 6, 2012, replaced three days later on January 9 by the second version of CBS This Morning. 
By the fall of 1982, Captain Kangaroo had disappeared from the daily schedule, and the new team of Kurtis and Sawyer were anchoring three hours of news in the morning, as they were also seen on the CBS Early Morning News an hour earlier. 
CBS News correspondents Jane Wallace and Meredith Vieira briefly alternated as interim co-host in an on-air try-out that lasted several months, but both were passed over for the permanent spot. Instead, CBS settled for former Miss America and The NFL Today co-host Phyllis George, who was given a three-year contract following a mere two-week trial run. There was little chemistry between George and Kurtis onscreen and the show fared poorly.[citation needed] 
In an August 1986 Newsweek article, columnist Jonathan Alter wrote regarding the move, "The CBS Morning News was simply shot dead. Underappreciated co-anchors Forrest Sawyer and Maria Shriver left the air with a classy farewell after the network's announcement that the perennially lagging show would be canceled by the end of the year." 
Tom Shales reported in The Washington Post, "throughout the industry there is shock and derision for the way CBS has handled [the] Morning News, so long its problem child. Competitors are saying the Morning News fiasco is a symptom of a new disarray in CBS News, and some question whether current CBS News executives will all be able to ride out the storm." 
On October 30, 2006, The Early Show received a revamp, featuring new graphics (with a new blue and orange color scheme instead of blue and yellow) and music similar to that used on the CBS Evening News (which were also rolled out on Up to the Minute and the CBS Morning News in early October). On December 4, 2006, it was announced that Rene Syler would leave the show by the end of the month; her last show was December 22. 
On December 7, 2006, CBS News named Russ Mitchell (who had been co-anchor of the program's Saturday edition since its inception as CBS News Saturday Morning in 1997) as the news anchor for the program starting January 2, 2007. On November 28, 2007, it was announced that Hannah Storm was leaving as the program's co-anchor; her last day was December 7, 2007. 
On April 16, The Early Show scored a coup with the broadcast of a live musical performance by Susan Boyle. The Early Show enjoyed a relatively successful May sweeps, racking up a 5% increase in total viewership year-to-year while remaining flat in the 25-to-54-year-old demographic, at a time when both Today and Good Morning America were shedding viewers to the tune of 3 and 4% respectively. 
On January 13, 2010, CBS announced that news anchor Russ Mitchell would exit The Early Show at the end of the week, leaving a gap in the program's anchor lineup. He became the national correspondent for CBS and would remain as anchor of the Sunday edition of the CBS Evening News.[citation needed] Around this time, Koeppen left The Early Show to become a primary news anchor for CBS-owned KDKA-TV in Pittsburgh; her spot as consumer correspondent was not replaced. 
In January 2010, Erica Hill became the program's news update anchor, joining Smith, Rodriguez, Price and now features correspondent Chen. 
The Early Show became the last morning network news/talk program to begin broadcasting in high definition on April 26, 2010. The Evening News control room was to be used to base the program, as construction was under way for a new control room for The Early Show at the General Motors Building. New graphics were now overlaid to accommodate added screen space, and were also used throughout other CBS News programs. 
In March 2011, the program introduced a redesigned set, which included a new anchor desk backdrop, a new reporter area and a blue color scheme. On September 2, 2011, it was announced that Marysol Castro would be leaving her post as weather anchor effective immediately. 
After Castro's departure, the hosts had cut directly to local CBS affiliates to provide forecast cut-ins (with a narrated national outlook available to stations that did not provide cut-ins due to the absence of a news department), making CBS the only one of the three major broadcast morning shows without a national forecast segment. 
In 2011, the program had begun focusing on hard news in contrast to the other network morning news programs, which show a mix of hard news, lighter news and infotainment. Coverage consisted of national and international news, including occasional town halls with political leaders and in-depth coverage of major events. 
The final edition of The Early Show aired on January 7, 2012, with that week's final Saturday edition being broadcast from the set of the CBS Evening News at CBS Broadcast Center, anchored by Rebecca Jarvis and John Miller, news anchor Betty Nguyen and weather anchor Lonnie Quinn. 
Unlike its competitors Today and Good Morning America, The Early Show did not have a Sunday edition, due to the continued success of CBS News Sunday Morning, which maintained a distinct newsmagazine format with long-form feature reports and in-depth interview segments. 
Industry insiders considered Shelley Ross' influence to be a serious threat to raising the profile of the program to turn it into a true competitor to NBC's Today and ABC's Good Morning America. However, Ross was fired as executive producer after only six months, following frequent feuds with staff (particularly Smith and Chen), who reportedly informed management that either Ross would have to go or they would resign on their own. 
In 2010, The Early Show was nominated for a GLAAD Media Award for "Outstanding TV Journalism Segment" for the segment "Reverend's Revelation: Minister Speaks Out About Being Transgender". 
Shiryayevsky is located on Khopyorsko-Buzulukskaya plain, on the left bank of the Buzuluk River, 6 km southwest of Preobrazhenskaya (the district's administrative centre) by road. Preobrazhenskaya is the nearest rural locality. 
Viswanath received his bachelor's degree from National Institute of Technology Karnataka and Ph.D. degree in electrical engineering and computer science from the UC Berkeley College of Engineering in 2000. 
This biographical article relating to a computer specialist is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about an Indian engineer, inventor or industrial designer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Run Baby Run is a Ghanaian action film directed by Emmanuel Apea and starring John Apea. The film received 8 nominations and won 4 awards at the African Movie Academy Awards in 2008, including the awards for Best Picture, Best Director and Best Screenplay. 
Enoch Sarpong Jr., a Ghanaian student living in the UK, is visited by his little sister from Ghana, who had mistakenly picked up the wrong suitcase at the airport. The suitcase contains a huge amount of cocaine. Enoch decides to sell the drugs, however the real owners of the drugs soon meet up with him, chasing him all across the UK and Ghana. 
Augeas is a free software  configuration-management library, written in the C programming language.  It is licensed under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License. 
Augeas uses programs called  lenses (in reference to the Harmony Project) to map a filesystem to an XML tree which can then be parsed using an XPath syntax, using a bidirectional transformation. Writing such lenses extends the amount of files Augeas can parse. 
Dhorbania, also known as Henchir Oued Nebhana, is a village and locality in Tunisia. It's also the site of Ancient city and former bishopric Bahanna, now a Latin Catholic titular see. 
Dhorbania is in the Kairouan Governorate of Tunisia, North Africa. It is located at latitude 36.19392n and  Longitude 10.02064e, in the hinterland of the Gulf of Hammamet, and south of Tunis. It is on the Oued Nebhana Stream, and it has a post code of 1160 in the Tunisian postal service. 
Ruins of the city  include a Christian basilica, baptistry, an Olive press and a bridge over the stream.  
Bahanna was important enough in the late Roman province of Byzacena to become one of the suffragan bishoprics of its capital Hadrumetum (modern Sousse)'s Metropolitan Archbishopric, but like most faded, presumably under Islam. 
The diocese was nominally restored in 1933 as Latin Catholic titular bishopric (Curiate Italian Baanna). 
Finding that all the ways of escape had been barred, he rushed into the haveli of Duni Chand which had a large open compound with a wall around it at village Gurdas Nangal, 6 km to the west of Gurdaspur. In it, Banda accommodated 1,250 men with a small number of horses. 
With this beggarly equipment in men, money and material and living in a small house with an open compound, Banda had defied the mighty Mughal Empire for over eight months. No better record than this challenge can be traced anywhere else in world history. 
Born in Godalming, and educated at the Royal Grammar School, Guildford, Lintott was Queens Park Rangers' first ever England international in 1908. 
The 2017 Liga 3 Final is a football match to determine the winner of the 2017 Liga 3 between Persik Kendal and Blitar United. The match will held in 17 December 2017 at Gelora Bumi Kartini Stadium, Jepara. 
This biographical article relating to a Turkish basketball figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
 Hungary men's national goalball team is the men's national team of Hungary. It takes part in international goalball competitions. 
New York hosted the 1984 Summer Paralympics where thirteen teams participated and the team finished eighth. 
During her time in Sudan, Beasley focused on working within Sudanese cultural boundaries to produce educational change. She stated that: 
"The most encouraging feature is in recognising the possibilities which are in the girls themselves, and feeling that it is they who may eventually overcome the many obstacles to development which have been placed in their way. The disheartening results in some districts are balanced by the embarrassing success in others. Perhaps if the work goes on quietly in the same unostentatious spirit at the end of the next twenty years there may be a proportionately greater tale to tell." 
Beasley submitted both her professional and personal papers to a variety of archives in England. Her paperes are widely recognised as a unique source for analysis of Sudan's colonial past and the education of women in Africa. They recall the early days of air travel in Africa, amongst other anecdotes. Her work in the Sudan has been studied, with a particular focus on her views on FGM, particularly by Sudanese anthropologist Rogaia Mustafa Abusharaf. They include: 
Adam Gilchrist is a retired international Australian batsman and wicketkeeper.  He scored centuries (scores of 100 or more) 33 times in his career. And he scored centuries in both Test and One Day International (ODI) matches organised by the International Cricket Council (ICC).  Describing his batting philosophy simply as "just hit the ball", he has been called "one of the most destructive batsmen the sport has ever seen". 
The 2012 Kraft Nabisco Championship was played at Mission Hills Country Club in Rancho Mirage, California, from March 29 through April 1. It was the 41st edition of the Kraft Nabisco Championship and its 30th year as a women's major. 
The field was 117 players, including 110 professionals and seven amateurs. The 36-hole cut was the top 70 players and ties; it was at 148 (+4) and 82 players advanced to the weekend. 
Amy Yang shot a six-under 66 to claim the lead after the first round on Friday. Lindsey Wright shot 67 for second place and world number one and 2010 winner Yani Tseng shot four-under 68 for third place. Defending champion Stacy Lewis was tied for sixtieth at 74 (+2). 
Daniel Paul Charles was a French musician, musicologist and philosopher. He was born on 27 November 1935 in Oran (Algeria) and died on 21 August 2008 in Antibes (France). 
He was a student of Olivier Messiaen at the Paris Conservatory of Music (First Prize, 1956), he received the aggregation in philosophy in 1959 and a PhD under the direction of Mikel Dufrenne in 1977. 
Daniel Charles has been invited by many universities to lecture (usually across the Atlantic, but also including Japan and the Philippines), and has published many articles and several books, five of which have been translated into German, and two into Japanese. 
Nicknamed "The Wizard", he is considered one of the most prominent and commercially successful artists ever to emerge from former Yugoslavia. 
Dino is recognised for his later solo work during which he established himself as one of the best-selling regional artists of all time. During his career, he has produced over a dozen chart-topping albums, held several record-breaking tours, won many awards including the Sixth April Award of Sarajevo, and has authored the first national anthem of Bosnia and Herzegovina. He is widely known for his distinctive voice, stage performances and poetic lyrics. 
On his mother's insistence, and contrary to his own wishes of attending music school, Dino enrolled into the Sarajevo Technical High School. After school hours, he performed in a music duo with his childhood friend and keyboard player Mirsad Lutvica with whom he later established the band "Merlin". 
In 2000, aged 38, Dino wrote and released his most successful album to date - the famous "Sredinom" (trans. Middle). The album was the top-selling album in Bosnia and Herzegovina and was sold in all of the former Yugoslav republics. 
The album eventually turned into a classic and became the highest selling album of the region in the last 30 years. Some estimates put the album sales at about 2,000,000 - a record breaking success considering that the whole population of Yugoslavia was about 20,000,000 people. 
Although Dino likes to keep his humanitarian activities private and out of public sight, it is known that he is an active donor of scholarships to underprivileged children in Bosnia and Herzegovina. He is a long-time member of the Hastor Foundation, the biggest organisation of its kind devoted to distributing scholarships to primary and high-school students in the country. Dino acts as a sponsor to over dozen students every year and has been a member of this programme since 2008. 
Dino worked for 5 years pro bono as the honorary and de facto president of the assembly of AMUS - the main association of music artists of Bosnia. He has been one of the founding members of this organisation in 2013. In early 2018 he resigned from his position as president due to the lack of available time at his disposal to run the association. 
During his career he has played numerous charity concerts. During the great floods, which have affected the region, Dino's team was heavily involved in humanitarian works - distributing water, food, blankets and other provisions to the most endangered parts of Bosnia and Serbia. 
Lepinotus inquilinus is a species of granary booklouse in the family Trogiidae. It is found in Africa, Australia, Europe and Northern Asia (excluding China), Central America, North America, Oceania, and Southern Asia. 
This biographical article relating to an Iranian sport wrestler or wrestling coach is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Rolf Dobelli (July 15, 1966) born in Luzern, Switzerland, is a Swiss author and entrepreneur. Dobelli is the author of The Art of Thinking Clearly (2011). Dobelli is a member of Edge Foundation, Inc., PEN International and the Royal Society of Arts. He is the founder of the  World Minds foundation. 
Dobelli studied philosophy and business administration at the University of St. Gallen where he graduated with a doctorate on the "Deconstruction of Economic Discourse" in 1995. He then went to work as the CFO and Managing Director in various Swissair subsidiaries. In 1999 he co-founded "getAbstract". 
From 2001 to 2009 Dobelli hosted a weekly television show "Seitenweise Wirtschaft" for the Swiss newspaper and media company, NZZ. He also wrote a weekly column on the Art of Thinking Clearly. 
He resigned from getAbstract in 2011 so that he could dedicate himself to writing. Dobelli's increasing dissatisfaction with the world of pure business was already reflected in his 2003 novel titled "35 - A Midlife Story". This was followed by his 2004 book, "And what do you do for a living" and his 2007 book "Who am I? 777 indiscreet questions." 
In 2020 Dobelli's published "Stop Reading the News, A Manifesto for a Happier, Calmer and Wiser Life". Martin Newman, reviewing the book for the Financial Review wrote, "'Stop Reading the News' explores the explosion of opinion-based news, the elevation of mediocrity over substance (The Kardashians!!), the way news creates the illusion of empathy, can elevate stress levels and builds a mindset that reinforces negativity". 
This biographical article relating to a Swedish ice hockey player is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Henri is a 2013 Franco-Belgian drama film directed by Yolande Moreau. It was screened in the Directors' Fortnight section at the 2013 Cannes Film Festival. The film received four nominations at the 5th Magritte Awards, including Best Film and Best Director for Yolande Moreau. 
This article related to members of the fly family Asilidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Underwater rugby (UWR) has been played in Australia since 2007 and as of 2016 is played in every State and the Australian Capital Territory. 
Underwater rugby has been played in Australia since 2007.  Its introduction is attributed to individuals based at the University of New South Wales Underwater Club including a former member of the Colombian National Team. 
After the ascent, Charles Barrington returned to Ireland and never visited the Alps again. He owned and trained a famous racehorse, "Sir Robert Peel", that won the first Irish Grand National in 1870. 
Barrington organized the first Irish mountain race in 1870, offering a gold watch to the winner of this running event, which was held on the Sugar Loaf mountain in County Wicklow. 
He died at his family home in Earlsfort Terrace in Dublin on 20 April 1901, and is buried in Mount Jerome Cemetery. 
The Compile trademark is being used as a brand label by Compile Heart to promote merchandise and games based on Compile properties. As of 2010, Compile Heart entered into a licensing deal with D4 Enterprise to create new video games based on franchises from Compile properties. This agreement does not affect the rights to the Puyo Puyo series as Sega retains ownership of the property. 
Compile debuted their most successful title, Puyo Puyo, on the MSX computer in 1991. Puyo Puyo is a falling-block puzzle game similar to Tetris (1984). The object of the game is to create groups of four or more "Puyos" of the same color as they fall from the top of the screen. This simple yet addictive concept was expanded on in a series of sequels over the course of two decades. 
Puyo Puyo reached North America and the PAL region in graphically altered form under the title of Dr. Robotnik's Mean Bean Machine for the Mega Drive/Genesis, as well as on the Super Nintendo (as Kirby's Avalanche in North America and Kirby's Ghost Trap in the PAL region). However, the series' unaltered appearance was Puyo Pop, a title used for games that were released on the PC Engine, Neo Geo Pocket Color and Game Boy Advance. 
Until 1993, Compile focused much of their development efforts on the shoot 'em up genre. In the 1990s, a few Compile personnel left the company to work for another video game development company, 8ing/Raizing (est. 1993). There they contributed to such games as Mahou Daisakusen (1993) and Battle Garegga (1996). 
Some employees who stayed with Compile until its end reincorporated as MileStone Inc. in April 2003, and continued to develop new shooters. 
Aleste was released on the MSX2 and ported to the Master System. A sequel, Aleste 2, was also released for the MSX2. Musha Aleste (titled M.U.S.H.A. in the US) was released on the Mega Drive in 1990. The game takes place in a unique Japanese futuristic setting. Super Aleste came out in 1992 for the Super Famicom and was retitled Space Megaforce in North America. Aleste is now available on cellular phones, courtesy of Aiky. 
Gunhed (retitled Blazing Lazers for North America) was released in 1989 and became a showpiece for NEC's PC Engine console. 
Developed jointly by Compile and Naxat Soft under the common label Nazac, Seirei Senshi Spriggan and Spriggan Mark 2 were respectively released in 1991 and 1992 for the PC Engine CD-ROM system. 
Games marked with a dagger are conversions of a pre-existing version of a game as opposed to being natively developed. 
Welsh units of measurement are those in use in Wales between the Sub-Roman period (prior to which the Britons used Roman units) and the 13th-century Edwardian conquest (after which English units were imposed). Modern Wales no longer employs these units even for customary purposes but instead follows the custom as elsewhere in Britain of using a mixture of metric and Imperial units. 
The Welsh seem to have used an eight-[n 4] or nine-day week, rather than a seven-day one, long after their conversion to Christianity. 
When Emperor Francis I of Austria died on 2 March 1835, his incapable son Ferdinand I succeeded to the throne. To preserve the Austrian autocratic system, Francis had taken precautions, and his last will ordered the establishment of a Secret State Conference. The panel held its constituent meeting on 12 December 1836. 
The composition represented a compromise between the ruling House of Habsburg-Lorraine and its ministers: Archduke Louis was brother of late Emperor Francis I, Archduke Karl was the brother of Ferdinand I, Metternich was responsible for foreign affairs and Kolowrat was responsible for domestic policy and finances. Metternich became the symbol of reaction and conservatism, but Kolowrat was considered liberal. 
The Secret State Conference's activities were overshadowed by the hostilities between Chancellor Metternich and his rival Kolowrat that finally led to the outbreak of the Revolution of 1848. Metternich was forced to resign and fled to England, and Kolowrat was appointed first Minister-President of Austria on March 20 but the office for only a month. 
He was the husband of Bessie Rischbieth, a South Australian feminist, social activist, and campaigner for women's rights. 
Rischbieth was born in Glenelg in the colony of South Australia to Charles Rischbieth, a Hanover-born merchant and business leader, and Elizabeth Susan Wills. He studied at Prince Alfred College. 
A noted athlete in his youth, Rischbieth played Australian Rules Football for Norwood. While in England, he also played rugby, representing the North of England in a match against Scotland. 
His father was businessman and colonist Charles Rischbieth. His cousin Oswald Rishbeth was a pioneer of academic geography in Britain. 
Mordella latesignata is a species of beetle in the genus Mordella of the family Mordellidae, which is part of the superfamily Tenebrionoidea. It was discovered in 1936. 
The list of shipwrecks in 1839 includes ships sunk, foundered, wrecked, grounded, or otherwise lost during 1839. 
The University of Puerto Rico (Spanish: Universidad de Puerto Rico, UPR) is the main public university system in the U.S. Commonwealth of Puerto Rico. It is a government-owned corporation with 11 campuses and approximately 58,000 students and 5,300 faculty members. UPR has the largest and most diverse academic offerings in the commonwealth, with 472 academic programs of which 32 lead to a doctorate. 
1908 - The Morrill-Nelson Act is extended to Puerto Rico, making the University a "Land Grant College," which authorizes use of federal land to establish colleges of agriculture, science and engineering. 
1923 - The University Act of 1923- the University reorganized administratively it independent Insular Department of Education, provides the Board of Trustees as the governing board, and make the position of Rector as the principal officer. In 1924 the governor appointed the first Rector.  
1924 - The administrative structure and identity of the University of Puerto Rico becomes independent from the Department of Public Instruction. 
1926- The School of Commerce (later School of Business Administration) and the School of Tropical Medicine were established. 
1935 - The U.S. Congress extended to Puerto Rico the benefits of Bankhead-Jones Act, which provided funding for research and the construction of more buildings. 
1942 - Act No. 135 of May 7, 1942, amendment to the University, created the Higher Education Council as the governing board of the institution and regulator of the higher education system in Puerto Rico. 
1946 - The University received accreditation from the Middle States Association of Colleges and Schools. 
1998 - Act No. 186 of August 7, 1998, provides for the gradual autonomy of regional schools as provided by the Board of Trustees, to lead to eleven autonomous units. 
July 2010, the Middle States Commission on Higher Education placed the accreditation of the University on probation citing concerns about shortfalls in the governance of the institution. By the end of 2011, all 11 campuses had regained full accreditation after demonstrating significant progress in this area. 
2017- The UPR's staff organized a strike in opposition to budget cuts proposed by the Financial Oversight and Management Board for Puerto Rico. 
2021- In June the Financial Oversight and Management Board cut $94 million from the UPR budget which would have drastically affected the institutions ability to operate. The local government intervened and assigned the money necessary before the August semester commenced. 
The campus radio station is called "WRTU Radio Universidad de Puerto Rico", and it was established in 1980. This is a public radio station with diverse musical and news programming. Its broadcasts both in FM and online. 
UPR has the highest selectivity index of all colleges and universities in Puerto Rico,[citation needed] it has also maintained a systemwide admission rate of 67% since 1997.[citation needed] Its enrollment rate has surpassed 90% during the past five academic years.[full citation needed] In terms of tuition, the cost per credit is US$124 per undergraduate credit and $300 per graduate credit.[citation needed] 
On August 24, 2020 the University announced ten investigations for preventing and mitigating the spread of Covid19 as part of $1.7 million the institution received from the local government. 
According to the QS world ranking 2022 published in 2021, the University of Puerto Rico ranks number 40 in Latin America having dropped from 37 in 2020, but still higher than previous rankings of 42 in 2018 and 62 in 2015. 
In 2020 the director of NASA grant consortium in Puerto Rico doctor Gerardo Moller, stated that 25% of the Hispanic employees hired by NASA are graduates of the UPR. 
Research activity, measured in terms of external funds received, has grown exponentially since 1985, doubling every five years. In 2007-2008 the UPR received over $87 million for research. 
Antonio Mignucci (PhD 1996), a biological oceanographer specializing in the management and conservation of marine mammals 
William A. Navas, Jr. (BS 1965), the first Puerto Rican to be named an Assistant Secretary of the Navy 
Heidelberg is a suburb of the southern New Zealand city of Invercargill. It is located to the southeast of the city centre. 
The area was called Conyerstown by its first European owner, Thomas Agnew. He sold the land to settlers Joseph and Martin Metzger, who were both connected to Heidelberg in Germany. 
Notable features of the predominantly residential suburb include Elizabeth Park, a secondary school (Aurora College), and one of the city's main marae, Murihiku Marae. The suburb is roughly bounded by Regent Street in the east, Pomona Street in the west, and Centre Street and Tramway Road in the north and south, respectively. 
Muizz-ud-Din Muhammad Shah II, born Karim Khan, was a ruler of the Muzaffarid dynasty, who reigned over the Gujarat Sultanate from 1442 to 1451. He expanded and strengthened the Sultanate. 
The river has rapids and is used for rafting. Timber was formerly rafted down it, but like the other short rivers in the region, it could not support a major sawmill industry at its mouth. In 1979 the river still had a salmon run, but numbers declined and in 1993 the river was included in a salmon action plan (SAP) under which fry were introduced from the Torne. 
Naked & Warm is the fifth studio album by American soul singer-songwriter and producer Bill Withers, released in 1976 by Columbia Records. 
He was born on 22 November 1902 in St. Albans, Vermont and received his education at Boston University. He is known for writing lyrics for such songs as "I'm Confessin' (That I Love You)" (with Doc Dougherty and Ellis Reynolds), "It's the Talk of the Town" and "Under a Blanket of Blue" (with Jerry Livingston and Marty Symes). He also ran his own publishing company. Neiburg died in New Haven, Connecticut, on 12 July 1978. 
Hibbertia juncea is a species of flowering plant in the family Dilleniaceae and is endemic to the Northern Territory. It is a small shrub with leaves reduced to minute scales, and white to cream-coloured or pink flowers arranged in leaf axils with seven to ten stamens. 
This species was first formally described in 1863 by George Bentham who gave it the name Pachynema junceum in Flora Australiensis. In 2009, James W. Horn changed the name to Hibbertia juncea in the International Journal of Plant Sciences. 
This hibbertia grows in savanna and is widespread and common from the Victoria River to north-eastern Arnhem Land in the northern part of the Northern Territory. 
Hibbertia juncea is classified as "least concern" under the Territory Parks and Wildlife Conservation Act 1976. 
Jeremy Whitley is an American comic book writer and artist, known as the creator and writer of the Marvel Comics series The Unstoppable Wasp, centred on Nadia van Dyne, of the Eisner-nominated series Princeless, and as a major writer of IDW Publishing, especially the My Little Pony: Friendship is Magic comic franchise. 
In 2011, Whitley created the comic series, Princeless, a series about a young black princess determined to break the norms of what a princess should be. According to Whitley, Princeless was conceived thus:  
Whitley currently lives with his wife Alicia and daughters Zuri and Amara in Raleigh, North Carolina. 
Macclesfield continue to field Senior and Junior teams in the Hills Football League Division 2 competition. 
Simon James Green (born 19 March 1970) is a former English cricketer.  Green was a right-handed batsman who bowled left-arm medium pace.  He was born in Bloxwich, Staffordshire. 
Bonnet Peak is a massif consisting of three separate peaks. It is near the source of Johnston Creek although its southern and eastern slopes drain into the Cascade River. Named in 1890 due to its appearance with a cap of snow. It is located in the Sawback Range of Alberta. 
In 2011, she became known for an exchange with Nicolas Bedos on the set of the show Au Field de la nuit. 
In 2021, she portrayed Nadine Gires in The Serpent, a British TV drama which tells the story of the serial killer Charles Sobhraj. 
On 21 October 2011, she became a student in audiovisual BTS and took part in the show  Au Field de la nuit , and took the floor to comment on the book that Nicolas Bedos promotes. The scathing exchange that followed was noticed during the broadcast on[clarification needed], 
On 5 September 2016 she became a reporter for the  Le Petit Journal presented by Cyrille Eldin on Canal +, but left the show three weeks later. At the same time, she announced that she has given up television. 
Abdullah Al-Eyaf works as an engineer for a living. He wrote a weekly column in Al-Riyadh newspaper 2007-2010. In 2007, he also co-established and edited a weekly cinema page for the Al-Watan newspaper. 
Abdullah has been a jury member of many film festivals such as Gulf Film Festival and Abu Dhabi Film Festival. 
Begum Jaan is a 2017 Indian Hindi period drama film. It is written and directed by National Film Award-winning director Srijit Mukherji and produced by Mukesh Bhatt, Vishesh Bhatt and Play Entertainment. The film is co-produced by Sakshi Bhatt and Shree Venkatesh Films with executive producer Kumkum Saigal. The cinematography is done by Gopi Bhagat. Lyrics, additional screenplay and dialogues have been penned by Kausar Munir and Rahat Indori. 
The film was released on 14 April 2017. Vidya Balan plays the lead role of a brothel's madam, set in the backdrop of late Indian Independence period of 1948. It is a Hindi remake of the critically acclaimed Bengali film Rajkahini (2015). The film managed to recover its costs and was declared "Average". 
As the movie ends, Ilyas and Hari are seen to be remorseful of their actions; Ilyas shoots himself and we are shown the remains of the brothel and the end to the Begum Jaan legacy. 
This film is the remake of a Bengali film, Rajkahini, which was released in 2015. Principal photography of the film began in June 2016 and was completed in August 2016 in Ranishwar block of Dumka district in Jharkhand. 
The first look of the movie introducing Vidya Balan as Begum Jaan was launched on 3 March 2017. The second poster of the movie was launched on 14 April 2017. The trailer of the movie was launched on 14 March 2017 to much critical and commercial acclaim. The trailer crossed 20 million views on Facebook and YouTube within a weeks time. 
As of June 2020[update], the film holds a 10% approval rating on review aggregator Rotten Tomatoes, based on ten reviews with an average rating of 3.86/10. 
Harlem Blues is an album by trumpeter Donald Byrd featuring performances recorded in 1987 and released on the Landmark label the following year. 
Mega Man Battle Network 2[a] is a video game developed by Capcom for the Game Boy Advance (GBA) handheld game console. It is the second game of the Mega Man Battle Network series. It was released in 2001 in Japan and 2002 in America and Europe. The story of the game starts after the events of Mega Man Network Transmission. It was released on the Wii U's Virtual Console in Japan on November 12, 2014 and in North America on January 8, 2015. 
The general gameplay is essentially identical to that of the original Mega Man Battle Network game; indeed, the two games utilize a significant amount of the same graphics. However, Battle Network 2 introduces several new concepts that augment the original game-system. 
In terms of health, Mega Man no longer heals fully and automatically after each battle. Furthermore, the game introduces the SubChip, a device similar in basic concept to a battle chip but one that can only be activated outside of battle. 
Additionally, players may access NetSquares in the game. These places serve as a sort of Town Square for NetNavis and their operators to relax, buy supplies, and exchange information. 
One final change was the replacement of the old armor system, which only affected damage received, with a style system that affects damage received, attack damage, physical appearance, among other benefits. During the course of the game MegaMan may take on one of five Styles (Guts, Team, Custom, Shield, and Hub), each of which will also be aligned with one of four elements (Heat, Wood, Elec, and Aqua). He can store up to two styles in his memory at once and change out when not battling. 
Three months following the events of Mega Man Battle Network (two following Network Transmission; both game facts), the story opens with the world in a time of peace following the defeat of the organization known as the WWW. However, NetCrime, as perpetrated by a NetMafia organization known as Gospel, is on the rise. Once again Lan Hikari (known as Netto Hikari  in the Japanese version) and his NetNavi MegaMan become involved and work to defeat Gospel's plot to destroy society. 
During the final battle it is revealed that the leader of Gospel is Sean Obihiro, a child who felt neglected by and resentful of society after his parents died in a plane crash. After defeating the Multi-bug Organism Gospel, Lan promises to be the boy's friend after he has paid for his crimes. After the credits, Bass is seen destroying copies of himself, and shows anger toward the human that made them (implying to Sean). He swears he'll exact his revenge on the humans and then disappears. 
Mega Man Battle Network 2 sold 124,349 units in Japan during 2001 and has been listed by Dengeki Online as the 91st best-selling video game in the region for that year. Famitsu sales data showed that the game was the 30th best-selling game of 2002 with a total of 344,230 units sold by the end of year. The magazine showed a total of 446,938 units sold in the country at that point. 
Battle Network 2 was a runner-up for GameSpot's annual "Best Role-Playing Game on Game Boy Advance" award, which went to Tactics Ogre: The Knight of Lodis. 
The 17th Hong Kong Film Awards ceremony, honored the best films of 1997 and took place on 26 April 1998 at Hong Kong Academy for Performing Arts, Wan Chai, Hong Kong. The ceremony was hosted by Carol Cheng and Cheung Tat Ming, during the ceremony awards are presented in 17 categories. 
The NHS Gender Identity Development Service (GIDS) is a nationally operated health clinic specialising in working with children with gender identity issues, including gender dysphoria. Although based at a Tavistock and Portman NHS Foundation Trust site, it is commissioned by NHS England and takes referrals from across the United Kingdom. It is the only gender identity clinic for people under 18 in the UK and is the subject of much controversy. 
Child and Adolescent Mental Health Services (CAMHS) provides the NHS support for children with mental health issues. However, CAMHS is organised by local government area and thus coverage varies significantly. The development of CAMHS within a four-tiered framework started in 1995. In 2000 the NHS Plan Implementation Programme required health and local authorities to jointly produce a local CAMHS strategy. 
GIDS takes referrals from all mental health care professionals, especially Tier 2 and 3 CAMHS specialists. GIDS is distinct from CAMHS as is it is nationally run, not by the local authority. However, in the CAMHS framework it sits in Tier 4, as a highly specialised service.[citation needed] 
In 2011, the GIDS started introducing the puberty blocker drug in the "early stages of puberty" because of pressure from people who felt they needed to travel to America and to Holland to obtain the drug. 
In 2016, the clinic was the subject of a Channel 4 documentary programme, told from the point of view of two satisfied trans children and their families. 
In July 2019, the Tavistock Centre was flooded which temporarily affected the IT servers at the clinic. 
In October 2019, a lawsuit was launched against GIDS by a mother of a patient at GIDS and Sue Evans, a nurse who formerly worked there. Later, Evans passed their role as complainant to Keira Bell, a previous service user. In December 2020 following the High Court judgement, GIDS suspended all new referrals to endocrinology. The Court granted a stay on further implementation of the judgement until 22 December 2020 or until appeals are exhausted. 
In December 2020 Dr Bell, a former governor of the Trust who was elected by the medical staff, and who had produced in February 2019 a damning report on the methods of the GIDS, reported that he now faced "disciplinary action" from the Trust. 
Children who present may identify with a number of different labels, including non-binary, transgender, genderqueer, questioning or otherwise as simply dysphoric or gender non-conforming. GIDS say that the way children identify is changing, which may be due to cultural and societal shifts. 
As the only gender identity clinic for children in the UK, the service has been the subject of much controversy related to the broader topic of gender dysphoria and transitioning in childhood. 
Conversely, there is a long wait time for a first appointment at GIDS, averaging at two years as of January 2020. GIDS blame high referral numbers and low staff numbers for this wait time. 
In September 2021, the Court of Appeal overturned the judgment of the High Court and once again allowed people under 16 to consent to receiving puberty blockers.   
In July 2020, it was reported that Sonia Appleby, the "Named Professional for Safeguarding Children" at the gender identity clinic, had been in dispute with her employers since November 2019. 
Academics Judith Suissa and Alice Sullivan listed her alongside Allison Bailey, Maya Forstater, and J. K. Rowling as women who have experienced campaigns of harassment because they speak publicly on sex and gender identity. 
Michaeli studied for a year in a local university with a major in humanities. She holds a Master's degree in electrical engineering and communications from the Saint Petersburg University of Telecommunications. During her studies she was chosen as Miss St. Petersburg in 1995. She took a year off of her university studies to live in Paris, where she worked as a model. 
She met Josef Samuelson, an Israeli businessman of Latvian-Jewish background. He was born in Riga, Latvia and immigrated to Israel in 1971 at the age of 11. He is 10 years her senior. They married in 1997. 
Michaeli wed her husband twice. Having no Jewish background of her own, Michaeli converted to Judaism and the couple remarried according to Halakha. In Israel, after the birth of her second son, she underwent an Orthodox Jewish conversion, culminating with the couple's remarriage, this time according to strictly religious rites, in 2000. 
After studying in an ulpan, Michaeli graduated from Bar-Ilan University with a diploma in business administration. 
Michaeli, after having had an Orthodox conversion, keeps a kosher home and has enrolled her children in state religious schools. Michaeli adheres to a Zionist philosophy within her family as well as in her career, stating "Judaism is at the basis of why we have this country to begin with. It's not just a religion." She lives in Rishon LeZion with her husband and their eight children. Her eighth child was born during her parliamentary term. 
Her media career began in 1998. In 2002 she joined the new Israel Plus Russian-language television station, where she worked as a journalist and presenter of Life's Pleasures, and the daily Morning program. 
In 2005, Michaeli joined Ariel Sharon's Kadima party towards the 2006 elections but it failed to win enough votes to secure her a Knesset seat. 
In December 2008, Michaeli accepted Avigdor Lieberman's offer to join his Yisrael Beiteinu party. She was placed ninth on its list for the 2009 elections. Michaeli became a member of the 18th Knesset when the party won 15 seats. 
Michaeli was reprimanded by the Knesset Ethics Committee for attempting to physically disturb Israeli-Arab MK Hanin Zuabi while Zuabi was delivering a speech about the 2010 Gaza flotilla raid. The Ethics Committee statement read, "The committee could not find a precedent in which an MK attempts to physically disturb another MK's speech by taking the stand without permission. A line was crossed that cannot be ignored." 
Litobrancha is a genus of common burrower mayflies in the family Ephemeridae. There is at least one described species in Litobrancha, L. recurvata. 
The Pabst Hotel occupied the north side of 42nd Street in Manhattan, New York City, between 7th Avenue and Broadway, in Longacre Square, from 1899 to 1902. It was demolished to make room for the new headquarters of The New York Times, for which Longacre Square was renamed Times Square. 
To the Pabst Brewing Company, the hotel and its restaurants were part of a nationwide program for promoting its beer. This facility, however, conflicted not only with the Times, but also with plans for New York's new subway system. 
Some people questioned the Times' motive for singling out this one violation, when there were so many others. 
After many delays, a judge decided against the hotel on November 18, 1901. The portico, he ordered in strong words, must be removed, by the city if necessary, at the hotel's expense. Regan and Thorley appealed, and the Times reported that although city officials could lawfully have acted on the order at once, they chose to delay, pending the outcome. 
Regan at the time was proprietor of the Woodmansten Inn, the Bronx, and arranged to become proprietor of the grand Knickerbocker Hotel, planned for the southeast corner of 42nd Street and Broadway. 
On September 24, 1902, the Pabst Brewing Company filed suit in federal court to recover damages from Thorley. 
On August 4, 1902, The New York Times announced that it would give up its long-time home on Park Row near City Hall and move to a neighborhood it predicted would soon be the commercial center of the city: Longacre Square. Its publisher, Adolph S. Ochs, had purchased the former Eno ground from the Subway Realty Company and obtained a long-term lease from Charles Thorley on the ground under the Pabst. The company would build a skyscraper on the triangular block for its own occupancy. 
Demolition of the hotel began November 24, 1902. It was the first building completely supported by a steel skeleton ever demolished. The Times reported that professional builders were keen to discover whether the structural members had begun to corrode, which might threaten the structural integrity of the building and the future of the construction method, but nothing alarming was discovered. 
On April 8, 1904, Longacre Square was renamed Times Square. The subway, including the Times Square station, opened to the public on October 27. The newspaper moved into its new building Sunday, January 1, 1905,[note 7] although the building wasn't quite complete. 
Adam Brooks (born May 6, 1996) is a Canadian professional ice hockey centre for the Montreal Canadiens of the National Hockey League (NHL). He has previously played for the Toronto Maple Leafs. 
While playing AAA hockey for the Winnipeg Hawks, both Brooks and his older brother Brett attended West Kildonan Collegiate. Brooks ended the season being named AAA Impact Player of the Year and MVP. 
On January 22, 2021, Brooks scored his first NHL goal with the Maple Leafs on Mikko Koskinen of the Edmonton Oilers. 
WBNO-FM (100.9 FM) is a radio station licensed to Bryan, Ohio, United States.  The station is currently owned by Impact Radio, LLC.  WBNO-FM broadcasts a classic rock music format, switching from adult contemporary during the summer of 2013. 
WBNO had carried the Classic Hits format from Dial Global until that format was discontinued on June 17, 2012. 
Scott Merrick (born 1985) is a Democratic Party former member of the New Hampshire House of Representatives, representing the 2nd Coos District starting  in 2004. He resides in Lancaster. While serving in the legislature, he also received his degree from Tufts University. 
Merrick was named a rising star, as one of New Hampshire's "Forty under Forty" by the New Hampshire Union Leader in 2009. 
Joseph Heathcote (born January 1878) was an English footballer. His regular position was as a forward. He was born in Ardwick, Manchester. He played for Berry's Association and Manchester United. 
This biographical article related to association football in England, about a forward born in the 1870s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Euxesta albitarsis is a species of ulidiid or picture-winged fly in the genus Euxesta of the family Tephritidae. 
This article related to members of the insect genus Euxesta is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Paul Stewart (born 28 October 1956) is a Scottish-American former professional basketball player and a former member of the Scottish national basketball team. 
Stewart was born in Glasgow to Scottish parents but moved to Canada shortly later. When he was 7 years old, his family moved again, this time to San Diego in California. He played college basketball for Santa Ana College and Cal State LA. 
After graduating, Stewart had a tryout with the Portland Trail Blazers. After failing to get a contract with the Blazers, he signed with USC Freiburg in West Germany. 
In 1979, Stewart was selected to the Scottish national basketball team. On 30 April 1982, Stewart had 26 points and 18 rebounds in a 77-64 victory against Iceland in the EuroBasket 1983 qualification. 
The Col. William Kelly House is a historic house located at 36 Tudor Place in Buffalo, New York, United States. 
It is a Colonial Revival style brick dwelling constructed in 1937. It has a modified square plan with a three bay front featuring a pedimented center entrance with a finely detailed Adamesque surround and engaged Doric order columns. 
This article about a Registered Historic Place in Buffalo, New York is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article related to a building or structure in Buffalo, New York is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
At that time, the P/B ratio of rubber prices in stock market got the peak as 10-20 times; also it was common to see the premium prices got increasing as eight to nine times. 
Since Fengrun and Yishanyuan were huge banks and their sub-agents were all over the China, their bankrupts led to a panic among people in Beijing, Guangzhou, Chongqing and other main cities. 
In the earlier 1910, Shanghai totally had 91 native banks. Due to the influence of this crisis, 48 of them (53%) went bankrupt, with a loss of 19.33 million Tael. After this crisis, most rubber companies still kept their business, but the reputation had been ruined. Although they still attempted to find some solutions to attract stock-holders, the price of most rubber companies in the stock market had fallen under their face value. 
In Zhejiang Province, 18 famous native banks closed in Nanjing, Zhenjiang, Yangzhou, Suzhou, Hangzhou and Ningbo. Except for Suzhou, the other five cities' all financial organizations suffered a destructive attack and bankrupted completely. 
Due to this crisis, the international rubber prices fell down below 5 shillings. After the outbreak of World War, rubber market was influenced by the shortage and problems of transportation, which led to a lower price of rubber. This situation bogged down until the late 1922. 
After the rubber crisis the Qing government introduced legislation that taxed speculative profits at a rate of more than fifty percent, leading to the further bankruptcy of two dozen banks in Shanghai. 
During the War of Spanish Succession, he switched sides from the Bourbon to the Habsburg party in 1705. 
This article about a property in Switzerland County, Indiana on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Studio One Forever is an upcoming documentary film by Marc Saltarelli about Studio One, an LGBT nightclub in West Hollywood, California. The film was initially scheduled to release in the United States in 2020, but it faced production delays and funding shortages due to the COVID-19 pandemic. 
This article about a documentary film with a lesbian, gay, bisexual or transgender theme is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This list of fictional ships lists artificial vehicles supported by water, which are either the subject of, or an important element of, a notable work of fiction. 
Frank Wilfred Jordan was born on 6 October 1881 in Canterbury, Kent, England, the son of Edward James Jordan and Eliza Edith King. He married Fanny Bentley Wood, a florist, in Canterbury, when based in Newhaven as a soldier on 7 December 1916. He died on 12 January 1941 in Coltham, Gretton Road, Winchcomb, Gloucestershire, England, aged 59. 
This flip-flop circuit became perhaps the most important circuits in computer technology,[citation needed] allowing binary data to be stored. 
Over the course of his career, Olmos has been a pioneer for more diversified roles and images of Hispanics in the U.S. media.[citation needed] His notable direction, production, and starring roles for films, made-for-TV movies, and TV shows include Wolfen, Triumph of the Spirit, Talent for the Game, American Me, The Burning Season, My Family/Mi Familia, Caught, 12 Angry Men, The Disappearance of Garcia Lorca, Walkout, The Wonderful Ice Cream Suit, American Family, and Dexter. 
In 2006, he co-produced, directed, and played the bit part of Julian Nava in the HBO movie about the 1968 Chicano Blowouts, Walkout. He also appeared in Snoop Dogg's music video "Vato". In the series finale of the ABC sitcom George Lopez, titled "George Decides to Sta-Local Where It's Familia"; he guest-starred as the plant's new multi-millionaire owner. More recently, he has been a spokesperson for Farmers Insurance Group, starring in their Spanish language commercials. 
Olmos joined the cast of the television series Dexter for its sixth season, as a "brilliant, charismatic professor of religious studies". 
Olmos starred in the second season of Marvel's Agents of S.H.I.E.L.D. as Robert Gonzales, the leader of a rival faction of S.H.I.E.L.D., for five episodes. 
Olmos narrated the 1999 documentary film Zapatista, in support of the Zapatista Army of National Liberation, a revolutionary group that has abstained from using their weapons since 1994. He also gave $2,300 to New Mexico governor Bill Richardson for his presidential campaign (the maximum amount for the primaries). 
He is also a supporter of SENS Research Foundation, a nonprofit organization dedicated to treating and curing diseases of aging by repairing the underlying damage caused by aging. A series of animations explaining the concept of SENS has been narrated by him. 
From 1979 to 1987, Olmos lived in West New York, New Jersey. In 1971, he married Kaija Keel, the daughter of actor Howard Keel. They had two children, Bodie and Mico, before divorcing in 1992. Olmos has four adopted children: Daniela, Michael, Brandon, and Tamiko. He married actress Lorraine Bracco in 1994. She filed for divorce in January 2002 after five years of separation. Olmos also had a long-term relationship with actress Lymari Nadal. They married in 2002, and separated in 2013. 
In 1993, Olmos was awarded an honorary Doctor of Humane Letters (L.H.D.) degree from Whittier College. 
In 1996, he was awarded an honorary Doctorate of Fine Arts from California State University, Fresno. In 2007, after a seven-year process, he obtained Mexican nationality. Asteroid 5608 Olmos is named in his honor. 
In 1992, a teenage girl accused Olmos of twice touching her in a sexual manner while they watched TV and flirted together.  Olmos paid the family a cash settlement of $150,000 in response to the allegations, but denied that they were true.  He claimed that the settlement was in fact meant to protect his son, Bodie Olmos, not him. 
Vidyanagar is a Locality of Hyderabad, Telangana, India. It formed Ward No. 86 of Greater Hyderabad Municipal Corporation. 
Vidyanagar has a large number of shopping areas. Local buildings of note include Durgabai Deshmukh Hospital, Andhra Mahila Sabha, and Maharaja Function Hall. 
Shopping outlets in the area include Spencer's, Reliance, Bata, Titan, Airtel, Vodafone, Reliance Digital, and an Idea showroom. 
Local schools in the area include Sri Aurobindo International School, Chaitanya Residential School, and The Mothers Integral School. 
The main bus route connecting the city is the 107 Dilsukhnagar to Secunderabad, route 3, which connects to Koti, Tarnaka, Moulali, Nacharam, and Habsiguda, 6H from Ecil to Mehdipatnam, 113I/M from Uppal to Mehdipatnam, 113Y from Uppal to Yosufguda. 
Hahncappsia alpinensis is a moth in the family Crambidae. It was described by Hahn William Capps in 1967. It is found in North America, where it has been recorded from Arizona, New Mexico and Texas. 
The Cowboy Cavalier is a 1928 American silent Western film directed by Richard Thorpe and starring Buddy Roosevelt, Olive Hasbrouck and Charles K. French. 
The contraction ratio of a windtunnel can now be calculated by:     C =    A  s e t t l    A  m       {\displaystyle C={\frac {A_{settl}}{A_{m}}}}   
In a return-flow wind tunnel the return duct must be properly designed to reduce the pressure losses and to ensure smooth flow in the test section. The compressible flow regime: Again with the continuity law, but now for isentropic flow gives: 
Conclusion: The Mach number is controlled by the expansion ratio       A  A  t h r o a t       {\displaystyle {\frac {A}{A_{throat}}}}   
Tony Zupo Field, originally known as Lawrence Park, is a stadium in Lodi, California.  It was primarily used for baseball and was the home of various versions of the Lodi Crushers, first in the California League from 1966 to 1969 and again in 1984 and later the collegiate wood bat Great West League in 2016.   The ballpark has a capacity of 3,000 people. 
On September 23, 2019, the main grandstands and press box of Tony Zupo Field were destroyed in a fire.  At the time, the damage was extensive, but the city and community were in hope of getting the destroyed area demolished and rebuilt in time for baseball season.   
This article related to a location in Belagavi district, Karnataka, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Walsh v Kerr  1 NZLR 490 is a cited case in New Zealand regarding the remedy of damages for breach of contract. 
Miles Davis Quintet: Freedom Jazz Dance: The Bootleg Series, Vol. 5 is a 3-CD compilation that collects studio recordings by jazz trumpeter Miles Davis that were recorded between 1966 and 1968. The album contains remastered versions, alternate takes, and conversations among the musicians. 
Davis recorded this music with what is sometimes called his second great quintet: Wayne Shorter on saxophone, Herbie Hancock on piano, Ron Carter on bass, and Tony Williams on drums. Most of the music was recorded for the album Miles Smiles at the 30th Street Studio, a former church in New York City, in 1966. 
Selwyn Jalil Lymon (born September 21, 1986) is a former American football wide receiver. He was signed by the Miami Dolphins as an undrafted free agent in 2008. He played college football at Purdue. 
As a high school athlete, Lymon excelled in two sports.  His ability in football enabled him to sign a scholarship to play at Purdue.  In basketball, his excellence led to Lymon being named a recipient of the Tiffany Gooden Award, given annually to the most outstanding male or female basketball player in the SAC. 
Box Office Bust features Larry Lovage, the main character of Leisure Suit Larry: Magna Cum Laude, whose uncle Larry, the original Larry Laffer calls upon his assistance at his movie studio (Laffer Studios), doing odd jobs and trying to uncover a mole from a rival studio who is attempting to sabotage Laffer Studios. 
The storyline was written by Allen Covert of Happy Madison Productions, and the voiceover cast includes Josh Keaton as Larry Lovage, Jeffrey Tambor as Larry Laffer, Jay Mohr, Patrick Warburton, Shannon Elizabeth and Carmen Electra. Artie Lange and Dave Attell were also featured as voice characters. 
Artie Lange, who voiced Big Al, said he was paid $30,000 for his 1.5-hour studio session. He has also stated that this installment has a higher budget than all the predecessors.[citation needed] 
Leisure Suit Larry: Box Office Bust was met with negative reviews. Aggregating review websites GameRankings and Metacritic gave the Xbox 360 version 26.08% and 25/100, the PC version 20.22% and 20/100 and the PlayStation 3 version 16.00% and 17/100. 
GameTrailers gave the game a 2.3 out of 10, making it the lowest rated game on the website; it also described the game as "A horrible joke in and of itself, if you buy Leisure Suit Larry: Box Office Bust the joke will be on you.  We can think of a good number of other uses for your two hands; and we're using ours to give this stinker two thumbs way down." 
Official Xbox Magazine (UK) gave the game a 1 out of 10, calling it an "astroturd" of a game. They also stated it was their worst rated game of the year so far, as well as going as far to say that it was the worst game on the Xbox 360 console thus far. 
Al Lowe thanked Vivendi Games on his website for keeping him away from what he called "the latest disaster". 
In PlayStation: The Official Magazine's September 2009 issue, they joked about punishing a PlayStation 3 owner's dog by making it play the Leisure Suit Larry game. The dog had urinated on his owner's PlayStation 3, which surprisingly still works.[citation needed] 
GameSpot nominated the game for "Flat Out Worst Game of the Year" in 2009. It "lost" to Stalin vs. Martians. 
Giant Bomb gave the game the Worst Game of the Year Award in 2009. Australian television show Good Game "honored" it as the Worst Game of 2009. 
Screwattack.com gave the game a SAGY award for the Worst Multiconsole game of 2009. Similarly, GamesRadar gave Leisure Suit Larry: Box Office Bust the title of the 28th worst game of all time. 
On 5 June 1965 he was the driver in charge of a relief train when at about seven miles from Crewe the fire suddenly blew back from the firebox of a BR Standard Class 7 steam locomotive No. 70051 Firth Of Forth, filling the cab with smoke and flames. Fireman Gwilym Roberts managed to climb out of the cab window and extinguish his clothing by rubbing against the plating, but Oakes stayed at the footplate to close the regulator, open the blower, and apply the brake. 
Roberts found his mate lying on the embankment next to the train, badly burned, but evidently having remained in the cab until the train stopped. Oakes suffered burns to approximately 80% of his body. The pain was such that he had to be suspended above his hospital bed and given large doses of morphine. A week after the accident, he died from his injuries. 
Oakes was buried in an unmarked grave in St Matthew's Church, Haslington, Cheshire. On 1 February 2018, a headstone was dedicated. It had been paid for by a group of railwaymen and donors to an appeal launched by Heritage Railway magazine. 
For his gallantry in ensuring the safety of his passengers, Oakes was posthumously awarded the George Cross on 19 October 1965. 
On 19 February 1981, Class 86 electric locomotive no. 86260 was named Driver Wallace Oakes GC. A memorial plaque in the offices above Crewe station reads: 
WHO THROUGH DEVOTION TO DUTY RECEIVED FATAL BURNS AT WINSFORD WHILST WORKING THE 2/5 PM EXPRESS CREWE TO CARLISLE ENGINE No 70051 DATE 5th JUNE 1965 FROM HIS FELLOW WORKMATES CREWE MOTIVE POWER DEPT. 
It is situated in Mookambika National Park, close to the Kodachadri hilltop. The surrounding forest and hills are typical of the tropical rain forest seen along India's Western Ghats. 
Kattinahole is surrounded by Sagar Taluk to the North, Thirthahalli taluk to the South, Hosanagara Taluk to the East, and Byndoor Taluk to the West. 
Local colleges are Sharavathi First Grade College, Sagar Gangotri College Of Law, Sahyadri Science College, Shravathi Dental College And Hospital and National Evening College Of Commerce. 
Talaguppa Railway Station (near to Sagar), Sagar Jambagaru Railway Station (near to Sagar), Shimoga Railway Station (near to Shimoga) are the closest railway stations. 
This article related to a location in Shimoga district, Karnataka, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 1998 Christchurch mayoral election was part of the New Zealand local elections of that year. Garry Moore of the centre-left Christchurch 2021 ticket was elected over thirteen other candidates, and replaced Vicki Buck as Mayor.  
International Kissing Day or World Kiss Day is an official holiday celebrated each year on July 6. The practice originated in the United Kingdom, and was adopted worldwide in the early 2000s. 
Another date, February 13, has also been identified as the International Kiss Day, falling in the week of Valentine's Day. 
The concept behind the International Kissing Day is that many people may have forgotten the simple pleasures associated with kissing for kissing's sake, as opposed to kissing as mere social formality or prelude to other activities. 
The PIC was originally conceived to solve problems in fluid dynamics, and developed by Harlow at Los Alamos National Laboratory in 1957. One of the first PIC codes was the Fluid-Implicit Particle (FLIP) program, which was created by Brackbill in 1986 and has been constantly in development ever since. Until the 1990s, the PIC method was used principally in fluid dynamics. 
Motivated by the need for better simulating penetration problems in solid dynamics, Sulsky, Chen and Schreyer started in 1993 to reformulate the PIC and develop the MPM, with funding from Sandia National Laboratories. The original MPM was then further extended by Bardenhagen et al.. to include frictional contact, which enabled the simulation of granular flow, and by Nairn to include explicit cracks and crack propagation (known as CRAMP). 
Recently, an MPM implementation based on a micro-polar Cosserat continuum has been used to simulate high-shear granular flow, such as silo discharge. MPM's uses were further extended into Geotechnical engineering with the recent development of a quasi-static, implicit MPM solver which provides numerically stable analyses of large-deformation problems in Soil mechanics. 
Annual workshops on the use of MPM are held at various locations in the United States. The Fifth MPM Workshop was held at Oregon State University, in Corvallis, OR, on April 2 and 3, 2009. 
The uses of the PIC or MPM method can be divided into two broad categories: firstly, there are many applications involving fluid dynamics, plasma physics, magnetohydrodynamics, and multiphase applications. The second category of applications comprises problems in solid mechanics. 
The PIC method has been used to simulate a wide range of fluid-solid interactions, including sea ice dynamics, penetration of biological soft tissues, fragmentation of gas-filled canisters, dispersion of atmospheric pollutants, multiscale simulations coupling molecular dynamics with MPM, and fluid-membrane interactions. In addition, the PIC-based FLIP code has been applied in magnetohydrodynamics and plasma processing tools, and simulations in astrophysics and free-surface flow. 
As a result of a joint effort between UCLA's mathematics department and Walt Disney Animation Studios, MPM was successfully used to simulate snow in the 2013 computer-animated film Frozen. 
PIC methods may be based on either the strong form collocation or a weak form discretisation of the underlying partial differential equation (PDE). Those based on the strong form are properly referred to as finite-volume PIC methods. Those based on the weak form discretisation of PDEs may be called either PIC or MPM. 
MPM solvers can model problems in one, two, or three spatial dimensions, and can also model axisymmetric problems. MPM can be implemented to solve either quasi-static or dynamic equations of motion, depending on the type of problem that is to be modeled. Several versions of MPM include Generalized Interpolation Material Point Method ;Convected Particle Domain Interpolation Method; Convected Particle Least Squares Interpolation Method. 
The time-integration used for MPM may be either explicit or implicit. The advantage to implicit integration is guaranteed stability, even for large timesteps. On the other hand, explicit integration runs much faster and is easier to implement. 
Unlike FEM, MPM does not require periodical remeshing steps and remapping of state variables, and is therefore better suited to the modeling of large material deformations. In MPM, particles and not the mesh points store all the information on the state of the calculation. Therefore, no numerical error results from the mesh returning to its original position after each calculation cycle, and no remeshing algorithm is required. 
The particle basis of MPM allows it to treat crack propagation and other discontinuities better than FEM, which is known to impose the mesh orientation on crack propagation in a material. Also, particle methods are better at handling history-dependent constitutive models. 
In simulations with two or more phases it is rather easy to detect contact between entities, as particles can interact via the grid with other particles in the same body, with other solid bodies, and with fluids. 
Steve Irwin's Wildlife Warriors is an Australian factual television series. It aired on Network Ten on 6 October 2012. It stars Bindi Irwin, Terri Irwin, and Robert C. Irwin. The show is a tribute to Steve Irwin. 
This article about a television show originating in Australia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 1994 1. divisjon, Norway's second-tier football league, began play on 1 May 1994 and ended on 2 October 1994. The league was contested by 24 teams, divided in two groups. Due to an expansion from 12 to 14 teams in Tippeligaen, the top two teams of each group won promotion to Tippeligaen and the bottom two teams were relegated to the 2. divisjon. This was the first season the two groups were named with numbers instead of letters. 
Jonathan Scott Crispin (born January 19, 1981) is a former American basketball player for the Penn State Nittany Lions and UCLA Bruins. 
Crispin attended his hometown Pitman High School from 1995 to 1999. He became a four-year starter on the varsity basketball team, two of which were alongside his older brother Joe. As a senior, he earned an "All-Group All-State" second-team honor. For three straight years he earned Group I All-State honors. During his prep basketball career, Crispin led the Panthers to two conference titles, two South Jersey crowns and two Group I NJ State Championships (1997 & 1998). 
As a junior in 1998, Jon scored a school-record 62 points (21-35 FG, 12-19 threes) in a South Jersey Group I playoff game versus Penns Grove High School. He eventually ended his prep career as fourth on Gloucester County's all-time scoring charts after collecting 2,319 points. His brother Joe finished top in Gloucester County history after having scored 2,651 points. 
Jon was a multi-sport star, also having lettered twice in baseball and three times in football. He was All-Tri-County Conference in football twice and once in baseball. Jon received multiple high-major Division I offers for football and garnered significant attention from MLB scouts as a pitcher. 
After college, Jon spent two years playing professional basketball overseas (in Spain and Ireland), as well as in the ABA in the States. During and following his professional playing career, Jon was  filmed in numerous television commercials including Ruby Tuesday's, Nike, and Coca-Cola, as well as modeled for print advertisements. 
When he resided in Los Angeles, California, Jon began his broadcasting career working for Fox Sports Radio, Fox Sports, Time Warner SportsNet, the Big Ten Network, and ESPN as a radio show host, college basketball analyst, and in-game color commentator. Jon is currently the lead basketball analyst and color commentator for the Big Ten Network in Chicago, Illinois. 
Mushroom Alley is a clone of Atari, Inc.'s Centipede arcade game developed by Victory Software and published by Mogul Communications for the VIC-20 and Commodore 64 1983. A ZX Spectrum port followed in 1984. 
Richard III is a biography of said King of England by American historian Paul Murray Kendall. The book, published in 1955, has remained the standard popular work on the controversial monarch. 
"The most powerful indictment of Richard is the plain and massive fact that the princes disappeared from view after he assumed the throne, and were never reported to have been seen alive.  This fact ... weighs heavily against the indications of his innocence.... only positive evidence that someone murdered the princes will tell against this indictment."
The work was critically very well received and was a runner-up for the National Book Award in 1956, also picked one of the best books of the year by the American Library Association. 
In the Chicago Tribune, A. L. Rowse called it "The best biography of Richard III that has been written.", whereas Saturday Review's Geoffrey Bruun opined: "A definitive biography of Richard III. It is a noteworthy performance." The Times Literary Supplement wrote: "Brilliantly successful... combines sound scholarship with literary distinction... his descriptions... are always stimulating and sometimes beautiful."[citation needed] 
Indian National Defence Workers Federation is a trade union in India, affiliated to the Indian National Trade Union Congress, that organizes civilian workers in factories and other establishments under the Ministry of Defence. 
INDWF opposes privatization of Defence units and ordnance factories. Sri. Ashok Singh is the president and Sri. R. Srinivasan is the General Secretary of INDWF 
The Last Unicorn is a 1982 soundtrack album composed and arranged by Jimmy Webb and performed by America with the London Symphony Orchestra. The album contains the film score for the 1982 film The Last Unicorn, which was based on a novel by Peter S. Beagle. America did get some airplay, especially in Germany where the song was a top 100 hit for seven weeks peaking at number 38. 
The title song is performed jointly by America and the London Symphony Orchestra, and plays in the film's opening credits while scenes based on The Hunt of the Unicorn tapestries form a backdrop. It is referred to later as a leitmotif by the film score. 
Kyle Anderson of the website Nerdist wrote that Jimmy Webb and America were among the "many great people [who] were involved" with the 1982 film, and that the album's "songs work pretty well". 
Black powder (or gun powder) was invented by China during the 9th century; these inventions were later transmitted to the Middle East and Europe. The direct ancestor of the firearm is the fire lance. The prototype of the fire lance was invented in China during the 10th century and is the predecessor of all firearms. 
The musket first appeared in the Ottoman Empire by 1465. In 1598, Chinese writer Zhao Shizhen described Turkish muskets as being superior to European muskets. The Chinese military book Wu Pei Chih (1621) later described Turkish muskets that used a rack-and-pinion mechanism, which was not known to have been used in European or Chinese firearms at the time. 
During the early modern age, these hand-held cannons evolved into the match lock, wheel lock, dog lock, and flintlock rifle, respectively, then the breech loader and finally the automatic weapon. As ignition devices, matchlocks, wheellocks, snaplock, flintlocks and percussion caps were used in turn. The paper cartridge was introduced sometime before 1586, and the bayonet came to use in 16th century France. Hand grenades, thrown by grenadiers, appeared around the same time. 
Early cartridge firearms had to be cocked and caught by the "sear", which holds the hammer back, before each shot. Pulling the trigger allows the hammer or striker to fly forward, striking the "firing pin," which then strikes the "primer," igniting an impact-sensitive chemical compound (historically, first fulminate of mercury, then potassium chlorate, now lead styphnate) which shoots a flame through the "flash hole" into the cartridge's propellant chamber, igniting the propellant. 
The first successful rapid-fire firearm is the Gatling gun, invented by Richard Jordan Gatling and fielded by the Union forces during the American Civil War in the 1860s. It is operated by a hand crank and rotates multiple barrels. The Gatling gun needs a four-man crew to function, has had many upgrades since its introduction, and has seen use in many conflicts. 
The battle rifle was a post-World War II development pushed primarily by the United States that desired a select-fire rifle that retained the long range of the M1 Garand (the US service rifle during World War II and the Korean War). Influenced by the US, NATO members adopted battle rifles of their own. In practice, the powerful cartridge of the battle rifle proved to be difficult to control during fully automatic fire and the concept was not further developed. 
During World War II, the term assault rifle was coined. However, during the Vietnam era, the M16 was developed. The AK-47 or "Kalashnikov" became the most widely developed rifle for countries on a global scale. 
"Far Side of Crazy" is a song by the new wave group Wall of Voodoo from their album Seven Days in Sammystown. It was released as the album's lead single in late 1985, with an accompanying music video combining black and white and full color footage. The song was also featured in the 1985 movie Head Office. 
The single failed to chart in all territories except Australia, where it reached #23 in June 1986 and stayed in the Top 100 for 21 weeks. 
Norwood is an unincorporated community in Township 13, Benton County, Arkansas, United States. It is located is south Benton County near the Washington County line on Arkansas Highway 16. The community had a school which is now closed and listed on the National Register of Historic Places. 
This article about a location in Benton County, Arkansas is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
From 2011 to 2013, Cuthbert starred as Alex Kerkovich in the three seasons of the ABC comedy Happy Endings. From 2016 to 2020, she had a recurring role as Abby Phillips on the Netflix series The Ranch, before becoming a main cast member in the series' second season. She received praise for her performance on the Canadian comedy series Jann (2020), being nominated for the Canadian Screen Awards for Best Performance in a guest role. 
Cuthbert is considered a sex symbol and has appeared in numerous magazines, such as Maxim, Complex, and FHM. In 2013, Maxim magazine named her "TV's most beautiful woman". 
Elisha Ann Cuthbert was born in Calgary, Alberta, the daughter of Patricia, a housewife, and Kevin, an automotive design engineer. She grew up in Greenfield Park, Quebec. In 2000, she graduated from Centennial Regional High School and moved to Los Angeles at the age of 17. As a child, she participated in Girl Guide programs as a member of Girl Guides of Canada. 
When she was nine, Cuthbert started modelling children's clothing and also became a foot model. She made her first televised appearance as an extra in the horror-themed series for children, Are You Afraid of the Dark?; she later became a regular on the show. Cuthbert co-hosted Popular Mechanics for Kids with Jay Baruchel, filmed in Montreal. Her reporting captured the attention of Hillary Clinton, who invited her to the White House. 
Cuthbert landed a role in a feature film in the family drama Dancing on the Moon (1997). She appeared in other Canadian family films and in an airplane thriller, Airspeed. In 2000, Cuthbert co-starred in Believe, a Canadian film with Ricky Mabe. The following year she starred in the Canadian television movie, Lucky Girl, and was awarded a Gemini Award for her performance. 
Soon after moving to Hollywood she was cast as Kim Bauer, daughter of federal agent Jack Bauer in the television series 24. She appeared in the show's first three seasons, but not in its fourth; she guest-starred in two episodes in the fifth season. She also reprised her role as Kim Bauer in 24: The Game and again guest-starred in five episodes of the seventh season and in two episodes of the eighth season. 
Cuthbert appeared in the music video for Weezer's "Perfect Situation" in early 2006, playing the group's fictional original singer who threw a tantrum that led to Rivers Cuomo, the roadie, becoming the band's frontman. She also had a small role in Paris Hilton's music video for the song "Nothing in This World". 
In December 2009, ABC said Cuthbert had joined the cast of The Forgotten in a recurring role as Maxine Denver, a Chicago professional. It was expected for Cuthbert to play the role of Trixie in sports action- comedy film Speed Racer (2008), but Christina Ricci was eventually chosen. 
In 2012, Cuthbert was host of the American Music Awards. In October 2012, she appeared in The Gaslight Anthem's music video "Here Comes My Man", playing the girlfriend of a man who mistreats her until she imagines a romantic relationship with a character in a film and chooses to end her real relationship. 
In February 2014, Cuthbert signed to play the female lead role in Liz Feldman and Ellen DeGeneres' new NBC sitcom pilot One Big Happy. Cuthbert stars as Lizzy, a lesbian who gets pregnant just as her straight male best friend Luke (played by Nick Zano) meets and marries the love of his life, Prudence. Six episodes of the show were ordered on 9 May 2014, and it debuted mid-season in early 2015. The series was cancelled after one season.[citation needed] 
In 2015, Cuthbert joined Seann William Scott in a sequel to the 2011 comedy Goon. Goon: Last of the Enforcers began production in June in Toronto. Liev Schreiber and Alison Pill reprised their roles from the first film. 
In 2016, Cuthbert joined the cast of Netflix's The Ranch, a comedy series. In 2020, she started the film Eat Wheaties!. She is set to star the horror movie The Cellar, Bandit and the comedy Friday Afternoon in the Universe. For her performance in the comedy series Jann (2020), she was nominated for the Canadian Screen Awards for Best Guest Performance. 
Complex has ranked her in The 25 Hottest Canadian Women, The 100 Hottest Women of the 2000s, The 25 Hottest Blonde Bombshell Actresses, and The 50 Hottest Celebrity Sports Fans. In 2013, GQ magazine listed her among The 100 Hottest Women of the 21st Century and The 100 Sexiest Women of Millennium. 
Cuthbert has two younger siblings and enjoys painting, is an ice hockey fan and Los Angeles Kings season-ticket holder. In 2005, she maintained a blog on the NHL website, though she did not post for most of the season. 
Cuthbert and hockey player Dion Phaneuf, then the captain of the Toronto Maple Leafs, announced their engagement in September 2012, They married on 6 July 2013 at St. James Catholic Church in Summerfield, Prince Edward Island. Living in Ottawa during the hockey season, Cuthbert and Phaneuf spend their summers at their waterfront estate outside New London, Prince Edward Island in his parents' home province. The couple have one daughter together. 
The race organizers RCS Sport invited twenty teams to participate in the race. Each team sent a squad of nine riders, so the Giro began with a peloton of 180 cyclists. Out of the 180 riders that started this edition of the Giro d'Italia, a total of 127 riders made it to the finish in Milan. 
Tim Maloney of CyclingNews stated that Team Polti's Ivan Gotti, who had won the previous year's race following Pantani's disqualification, desired to prove he is a legitimate contender. He added that the young rider Danilo Di Luca will be competing in his second Giro and he will aim for a stage victory. 
The race route was revealed by the organizers in Milan at the Teatro Lirico. This running of the Giro contained three individual time trial events, one of which was the prologue the race began with. There were a total of ten stages that contained categorized climbs; five of which contained climbs of higher categories, while the other five stages held only categorized climbs of lesser degree. The remaining nine stages were primarily flat stages. 
Of the mountain stages, three ended with summit finishes: stage 5 to Peschici, stage 9 to Abetone, and stage 18 to Prato Nevoso. One other stage had a summit arrival, the demanding stage 20 climbing time trial up the Sestriere. 
The race began in Rome to celebrate the Great Jubilee, with the opening prologue passing historic sites such as the Colosseum and Imperial Forum. The race then headed down the coast to Scalea through the first week, before turning east to Matera, then heading north through Apulia, travelling along a length of the Adriatic coast. 
In the 2000 Giro d'Italia, five different jerseys were awarded. For the general classification, calculated by adding each cyclist's finishing times on each stage, and allowing time bonuses for the first three finishers on mass-start stages, the leader received a pink jersey. This classification is considered the most important of the Giro d'Italia, and the winner is considered the winner of the Giro. 
There was also a mountains classification, which awarded a green jersey. In the mountains classifications, points were won by reaching the top of a mountain before other cyclists. Each climb was categorized as either first, second, or third category, with more points available for the higher-categorized climbs. The highest point in the Giro (called the Cima Coppi), which in 2000 was Colle dell'Agnello, afforded more points than the other first-category climbs. 
The fourth jersey represented the intergiro classification, marked by a blue jersey. The calculation for the intergiro is similar to that of the general classification, in each stage there is a midway point that the riders pass through a point and where their time is stopped. As the race goes on, their times compiled and the person with the lowest time is the leader of the intergiro classification and wears the blue jersey. 
Other less well-known classifications, whose leaders did not receive a special jersey, were awarded during the Giro. Other awards included the Bilboa most combative trophy classification, which was a compilation of points gained for position on crossing intermediate sprints, mountain passes and stage finishes. Russian Dmitri Konyshev won the most combative classification. The Top Runner Trophy Liquigas classification was won by Francesco Casagrande. 
An example of the law being put into practice was the Morrison Incident of 1837, in which a merchant ship bearing Japanese citizens was fired upon. 
Homeward Bound was a New Zealand television soap opera. It was first broadcast on TV3 on 11 June 1992 and ran for 22 episodes, finishing on 29 October 1992. Created by Ross Jennings, Homeward Bound was TV3's bid for NZ On Air funding for a local soap opera, however, it ultimately lost out to TVNZ's Shortland Street and was reformatted as an hour-long drama series. 
Plots centered on the domestic and professional lives of the extended Johnstone family and the residents of Riverside, a fictional rural community just south of the Bombay Hills. The area encompassed a pub and beer garden, a general store and garage, a community hall, a school, a church, a sawmill and a rubbish tip. 
Homeward Bound was produced by Soap (NZ) Ltd, a joint venture between Isambard Productions and Communicado, with funding from NZ On Air. The series was broadcast on TV3 on Thursdays at 7.30pm from June until October 1992. 
On September 15, 1917, he was commissioned an ensign in the United States Navy Reserve Force and was later promoted to lieutenant during the First World War.  He resigned from the Navy on December 13, 1918.  His naval service enabled him to become a member of the New York Commandery of the Naval Order of the United States. 
On December 1, 1941, Morgan was placed on active duty, serving during World War II as he had remained in the Naval Reserve between the wars.  On August 15, 1942, he was promoted to the rank of commander.  He served with the Office of Strategic Services (OSS) and rose to the rank of captain by the end of the war.  His brother, Commander Henry S. Morgan, also served with the OSS during the war. 
On June 15, 1915, he married Louise Converse (b. 1894) in Boston, Massachusetts. She was the daughter of Frederick Converse, a noted composer. Together, they had three children: 
Junius Morgan died on October 19, 1960. His wife survived him and later died on December 18, 1974. They are both buried at Cedar Hill Cemetery (Hartford, Connecticut), along with his father and grandfather. 
He served as commodore of the New York Yacht Club from 1933 to 1935.  Both his father and grandfather had previously served as commodore of the club. 
His family's main residence was the 'Salutation' estate, which is located on Long Island in Glen Cove, New York. This home was built around 1929 for Junius Morgan and his wife. The property is no longer owned by the Morgan family, but it is still in private hands and used as a residence. 
This location was used to portray the Larrabee family's mansion in the movie Sabrina. The movie made extensive use of this mansion's interiors during the filming. 
The Berlin Conference of 1954 was a meeting of the "Big Four" foreign ministers of the United States (John Foster Dulles), Britain (Anthony Eden), France (Georges Bidault), and the Soviet Union (Vyacheslav Molotov) from 25 January to 18 February 1954. 
The ministers agreed to call a wider international conference to discuss a settlement to the recent Korean War and the ongoing First Indochina War between France and the Viet Minh, but it failed to reach agreement on issues of European security and the international status of Germany and Austria, then under four-power occupation after World War II. 
Some effects of the Berlin Conference were that the leaders were unable to reach an agreement. There was a "fear of freedom" between the East and the West on matters such as free elections in Germany and Austria. The Soviet Union  was not willing to place any trust in either country. Eight weeks from the end of the conference, they planned the Geneva Conference. 
 The Burma Star Association is a British veterans' association for ex-servicemen and women of all services who served in the Burma Campaign of World War II. The criterion for membership is the award of the Burma Star for service in Burma during World War II for the necessary qualifying period or the Pacific Star with Burma Clasp. 
The Association was first formed on 26 February 1951 to promote comradeship and the welfare of its members. The arduous nature of the Burma Campaign has been recognised and permission granted to the members to wear a replica of the Burma Star in a lapel badge and cap badge. 
The Association's Patron is Prince Philip, the Duke of Edinburgh and its President is John Slim, 2nd Viscount Slim, the son of Bill Slim, who commanded the 14th Army in Burma. 
This article about an organisation in the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Sir Walter Clarence Huggard QC (d.  21 June 1957) was a British barrister, acting High Commissioner for the Bechuanaland Protectorate and Swaziland and Chief Justice of the Straits Settlements. 
Sir Walter was educated at Methodist College Belfast and Dublin University where he was First Honourman and Senior Moderator in Legal and Political Science. He received an LLD and was called to the Bar at King's Inn in 1907. 
Sir Walter was later Judge of the High Courts of Basutoland, the Bechuanaland Protectorate and Swaziland and was legal advisor to the High Commissioner from 1937. In 1938, 1940, 1942, 1945 and 1946 he fulfilled the role of acting High Commissioner for the Bechuanaland Protectorate and Swaziland 
The wilderness wraps around the mountain from west to northeast, and borders Timberline Lodge and Mount Hood Meadows ski lifts on some of the south and east slopes of the mountain. 
Journeys to the summit are popular. There are opportunities for experienced and novice mountaineers to traverse glaciers, snowfields and steep volcanic soil, and to deal with rapidly changing and difficult to predict weather.  More than 10,000 climbers annually make the attempt, making Mount Hood's summit the most visited snowclad peak in America. 
Numerous trails circle the mountain, from Lolo Pass on the northwest (which the Pacific Crest Trail crosses) to Cloud Cap on the northeast to the ski areas on the south. There are several historic structures (predating the wilderness designation), one of which is the remains of a stone lodge near Cairn Basin on the northwest side. Numerous pristine areas are easily accessible, such as Elk Cove on the north side of the mountain near the tree line. 
Wilderness permits are required, but free, to enter the area and can be filled out at ranger stations or at kiosks along trails where they enter the wilderness. Climbers ascending to or near the summit are required to register (and sign out at return) in Timberline's day lodge, or at other wilderness permit registration kiosks. Mountain Locator Units can be rented in Government Camp and at some area recreation businesses. 
U.S. Wilderness Areas do not allow vehicles, including bicycles. Although camping and fishing are allowed with proper permit, no roads or buildings are constructed and there is also no logging or mining, in compliance with the 1964 Wilderness Act. Wilderness areas within National Forests and Bureau of Land Management areas do allow hunting in season. 
In 1993, Crain was awarded the Magazine Publishers of America's Henry Johnson Fisher Award, the magazine industry's highest honor. She died in Cape Cod and was inducted  into the Advertising Hall of Fame that year. 
This biographical article related to a football defender from Switzerland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A New Day... ended on 15 December 2007, after a 5-year run of more than 700 shows and 3 million spectators. It reached one of the highest concert grosses in music history, $400,000,000. 
The 2 disc home video contains more than 5 hours of never-before seen footage, including the concert and 3 exclusive documentaries: Because You Loved Me (A Tribute to the Fans), A New Day: All Access and A New Day: the Secrets. It contains subtitles in 9 languages. The inside booklet includes richly detailed photographs and generous liner notes. 
The show was first filmed as a CBS special in celebration of the opening night performance entitled Celine in Las Vegas, Opening Night Live which aired on 25 March 2003. The special only featured 8 performances of songs from the original setlist plus a Behind the Scenes / Backstage featurette hosted by Justin Timberlake. 
The originally scheduled DVD release date (autumn 2004) was postponed because of changes and improvements made to the show since the initial filming. The show was recorded in autumn 2003 (26, 27, 28, 29 and 30 November 2003) and included: 
"Nature Boy," "At Last," "Fever," "Et je t'aime encore," and "What a Wonderful World" were included on the A New Day... Live in Las Vegas CD, released in June 2004. 
"The First Time Ever I Saw Your Face" was filmed during Celine in Las Vegas, Opening Night Live although it does not appear on any official release. 
Other songs that have not been included neither on cd nor on DVD include:   "Have You Ever Been in Love", "God Bless America", "Happy Xmas (War Is Over)", "In Some Small Way", "Can't Help Falling In Love", "Taking Chances" and "The Christmas Song". 
In addition, two instrumentals: "A New Love" and "Aria Di Lucia De Lammermoor" have been omitted as well. 
There is no video performance of "Nature Boy" and "At Last".  There is no video nor audio performance of "God Bless America" and "Happy Xmas (War Is Over)". 
"The Power of Love," "I Drove All Night," "I Surrender," and "I Wish" from the DVD were first released on the deluxe edition of Dion's album Taking Chances from November 2007. An exclusive sneak preview from the show was also included. 
A New Day... was shown on television in selected countries, including the Netherlands (first part on 18 November and second one on 25 November 2007 on SBS 6), Spain (29 November 2007 on TVE2), South Africa (first part on 2 December and second one on 8 December 2007 on SABC 3), Italy (25 December 2007 on Italia 1), and Quebec (bonus features on 20 January 2008 and the show on 27 January 2008 on TVA). 
A New Day... was also broadcast to movie theatres in some countries, including Poland (Multikino on 5 December 2007) and the United States (various theatres on 17 December 2007). 
Outside Canada, the DVD was also very successful and peaked at number 1 in the United States, United Kingdom, France, Japan, Switzerland, Netherlands, Belgium, Denmark, New Zealand and Estonia. It reached number 2 in Portugal and Sweden, number 3 in Argentina, Australia, Ireland and Greece, number 4 in Austria, number 6 in Italy and number 7 in Czech Republic. Live in Las Vegas - A New Day... also debuted in the top 10 in Finland and Germany. 
The Right Stuff conducted business via paper and United States postal service beginning in 1993.  It advertised in magazines such as The New Yorker, Boston, New York, Chicago, and Philadelphia magazines, similar publications in Washington D.C., and California, and university alumni magazines for the target universities.  The Right Stuff went to the web in 1997. 
Originally, membership was limited to affiliates of Ivy League, the Seven Sisters, MIT, Duke, Northwestern, Stanford,  Berkeley, Chicago, and Johns Hopkins.  Over time, the list of eligible universities has expanded to about 70 top-tier schools, and any medical school. 
Competing niche sites targeting high intelligence or graduates of elite universities have either closed entirely, no longer work with current browsers, or are otherwise essentially moribund.  These include docdates.com, fastcupid.com, intellectconnect.com, ivydate.com, mymitra.com, and sweetongeeks.com. 
As of July 2015, a six-month membership costs $75.00. The membership is discounted for full-time students, recent graduates, and residents of certain states. The Right Stuff requires its members to provide proof of student, graduate, or faculty relationship to one of the listed universities or medical schools. 
The New South Wales Aborigines Protection Association, also known as NSW Aborigines Protection Association, Association for the Protection of Aborigines, Aborigines Protection Association and Aboriginal Protection Association, was a private body which supported Aboriginal Australians in New South Wales, Australia. Specifically, it administered Maloga Mission until the residents moved to Cumeroogunga (which it then administered), and the mission stations at Warangesda and Brewarrina. 
The organisation grew out of the Committee to Aid the Maloga Mission, which was created by founding missionary Daniel Matthews on Maloga Mission in 1878. The New South Wales Aborigines Protection Association was established in 1880 "for the purpose of ameliorating the present deplorable condition of the remnants of the Aborigine tribes of this colony". 
After the Board for the Protection of Aborigines was created by the New South Wales Government on 26 February 1883, it started subsidising the three stations, which however continued to be administered by the Association. In  1892, Association income dwindled and the management of the stations was handed over to the Board. The Association continued until at least 1895, by which time they also had some oversight of La Perouse Mission. 
Founded in 1997 their primary goal is to promote high-level English-language publications from Cyprus, Greece, and the Eastern Mediterranean region in general. Their focus on Eastern Mediterranean enables them to carry titles from authors worldwide who have the region at the core of their work. 
Armida was the first publishing company in Cyprus to establish an active e-books program, and in sense of volume produced and sold, the company is currently the market leader in Cyprus in production, distribution, and sales of ebooks in English. 
In addition, the company is also the leading exporter of literary rights of Greek Cypriot literature to foreign publishers, with an extensive network of collaborating partner publishers throughout Europe, and the world. 
Armida is also an active member of the Independent Publishers Guild (UK) and the Independent Book Publishers Association (USA). Armida is a founding member of the Cyprus Association of Book Publishers, itself a part of the Federation of European Publishers (FEP). Armida worked in collaboration with the Cyprus PEN Centre, and published the quarterly magazine 'In Focus'. 
Was predominantly Greek books distributed in Cyprus and Greece. In that period they co-published books with Aiora Press for the Greek market and also acquired rights to German titles. This early period is also noteworthy as they focused on acquiring translation rights compared to the present where they are a net exporter of the aforesaid rights. 
Armida is spearheading the effort to promote and popularize Cypriot fiction outside the narrow confines of the island. Subsequently, the company has become the premier rights-exporter for Cypriot fiction. Its extended network of collaborations includes multiple titles in multiple languages including Albanian, Arabic, Bulgarian, Croatian, Czech, English, German, Macedonian, Romanian, Turkish, Serbian, Spanish, Lithuanian, etc. 
Armida publishes a range of books in both English and Greek. The following is a list of there most notable titles, in both English and in Greek 
East Victoria Park is a suburb of Perth, Western Australia, located within the Town of Victoria Park. 
In parliament, Colboc serves on the Committee on Cultural Affairs and Education. In addition to her committee assignments, she is part of the French-Portuguese Parliamentary Friendship Group. 
Lawrence Douglas "Larry" Wilder Jr. (born February 17, 1962) is a former member of the Virginia House of Delegates from Richmond. He is the son of former Virginia governor L. Douglas Wilder. 
This article about a member of the Virginia House of Delegates is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
FabricLive.23 is a DJ mix compilation album by Death in Vegas, as part of the FabricLive Mix Series. 
FabricLive.23 was well-received by Allmusic writer David Jeffries, who gave it three and a half stars out of five, calling it "a satisfying mix that's more headphones than dancefloor...step two in Death in Vegas' thrilling rebirth as a heady mavericks". Andrew McLachlan, reviewing the album for PopMatters, also viewed it positively, calling it "a great record...a record for Death in Vegas fans but also for electronica fans". 
Assistant directors to the film were Ajayan and G. S. Vijayan and art direction by Krishnan Kutty. The film was a Superhit at the box office.[citation needed] 
Two good friends, Nandan and Sunny, are singers in their senior year of college. Nandan is a hard working introvert while Sunny is well rounded, sporty, and loved among his friends. Nandan and Sunny have girlfriends Devi and Thara, respectively, who match them exactly in personality. Sunny also has another very loyal pal named Vinod who tends to get a bit annoying sometimes, but Sunny appreciates him nevertheless. 
On one of Nandan's tours to his hometown, he stays in a hotel and discovers that the receptionist is Devi. He calls her later, telling her, "Sukhamo Devi?" (Are you doing alright, Devi?), the title of the movie. He eventually meets her husband, Dr. Venugopal, who tells Nandan to move on with life, and that the arranged marriage wasn't his choice either. 
Sukhamo Devi marks the directorial debut of Venu Nagavally. The film is based on his own life experience. 
The soundtrack was composed by music Raveendran to the lyrics penned by O. N. V. Kurup. The soundtrack was well received and includes in the evergreen melodies of all time in Malayalam film music. K. J. Yesudas and K. S. Chithra have lent their voice for the soundtracks of the film. 
The Peace and Development Party was established on 25 October 2014. Its founder and current party leader is Garik Grigoryan. The party currently has no parliamentary representation within the National Assembly and acts as an extra-parliamentary force. 
The party did participate in the 2015 Nagorno-Karabakh parliamentary elections, winning just 0.86% of the popular vote and failing to win any seats in the National Assembly. Following the election, the party released a statement criticizing the lack of democracy in the country. The party opted not to participate in the 2020 Artsakhian general election. 
The party advocates for peace in the Caucasus region, the right for Artsakh citizens to determine their own future, fighting corruption and authoritarianism, and supporting the economic development of Artsakh. 
In 1946, Nadia began work on pests at the Slough laboratory and received a Ph.D and Sc.D from Imperial College. She was known for her exceptional teaching ability and she also conducted research on the diapause of flour moths, the ecology and population dynamics of various insects. Some of her significant research included studies on the dispersal and flight of Hemiptera including leafhoppers. 
Waloff retired in 1978, but in 1990, she was still publishing as a member of the Department of Pure and Applied Biology, Imperial College. 
Valorie Burton is a life coach, author, motivational speaker and entrepreneur. She is the founder of the Coaching and Positive Psychology Institute (CaPP). 
Burton has been featured on the TODAY Show and the Dr. Oz Show and has made regular appearances on CNN and HLN. She has written for Oprah Magazine, Essence Magazine and many others. She was a columnist for BlackAmericaWeb.com and is a frequent guest on CNN's Reclaim Your Career segment. 
Burton is a former Miss Black Texas USA, Miss Black USA "top 10" finalist, and a runner-up to Miss Texas. Ms. Burton is a credentialed member of the International Coach Federation and a member of the National Speakers Association. 
Burton graduated from the University of Pennsylvania with a master's degree in applied positive psychology. She is also a graduate of Florida State University and has a master's degree in journalism from Florida A&M University. 
Burton is author of several books including Successful Women Think Differently,  What's Really Holding You Back, and Happy Women Live Better, Rich Minds Rich Rewards, How Did I Get So Busy, Listen to Your Life, Why Not You? 28 Days to Authentic Confidence, Start Here Start Now, Get Unstuck, Be Unstoppable, and Where Will You Go From Here?,  and Successful Women Speak Differently. 
In Rich Minds, Rich Rewards (2001), she describes ways to focus "on what's truly important in life." In What's Really Holding You Back? (2005), Burton tackles fear, uncertainty and anxiety and how people can free themselves of fear. Library Journal calls How Did I Get So Busy? (2007) more than a "quick fix."  Her book Why Not You? (2008), contains practical tips and a questionnaire for readers to "identify which four confidence levels they embody." 
In 2020, Burton released her most recent book, "Life Coaching for Successful Women" and advice on New Year's resolution to loudly tell your goals and start with baby steps. Burton also gave decision-making advice, "Without understanding God deep in our hearts, there is no success". 
This is a list of the current and past directors of the National Intelligence Service of South Korea and its predecessor organisations, the Korean Central Intelligence Agency and the Agency for National Security Planning. 
A splanch is a type of single-family home that was popular in the New York metropolitan area from the 1950s through the 1970s. The name is a fusion of split level home and ranch, two architectural styles that influenced the design. 
The splanch's popularity diminished in the 1980s, and few examples exist that were built in that decade, and by the 1990s, they were gone from the drawing board altogether. Presently, many are updated and renovated to suit the needs of their current owners. 
Damon Jones  (born 17 March 1993) is a British professional boxer who has challenged once for the British middleweight title. 
 The Wilderness or Desert of Paran is said to be the place where Hagar (the Egyptian servant girl of Abraham's wife Sarah/Sarai and, by Sarah's suggestion, was made his wife and bore him a son Ishmael) was sent into exile from Abraham's dwelling in Beersheba (Genesis 16:1). Hagar "departed, and strayed in the wilderness of Beer-sheba" (Genesis 21):
Paran is later mentioned in the Book of Numbers as a place where the Israelites temporarily settled during the Exodus: 
Then the Israelites set out from the Desert of Sinai and traveled from place to place until the cloud came to rest in the Desert of Paran. (Numbers 10:12)
These are the words Moses spoke to all Israel in the desert beyond the Jordan--that is, in the Arabah--opposite Suph, between Paran and Tophel, Laban, Hazeroth and Dizahab.  (Deuteronomy 1:1)
He said: "The LORD came from Sinai and dawned over them from Seir; he shone forth from Mount Paran. He came with myriads of holy ones, from his right hand went a fiery law for them."  (Deuteronomy 33:2)
1 Kings 11:17-18 states that when Hadad the Edomite fled from Edom to Egypt, he passed through Midian and Paran on the way to Egypt. 
It is not certain precisely where the wilderness of Paran is to be located. It is often associated with Mount Sinai in Egypt, and there is some evidence that it may originally have referred to the southern portion of the Sinai Peninsula. However the Deuteronomy 1:1 text suggests it could be east of the Jordan River. 
The minor prophet Habakkuk references that "God is coming from Teman, the Holy One from Mount Paran" in Habakkuk 3:3. 
Eusebius' mention of Chodollagomor refers to a possible earlier mention of Paran in Genesis 14:6, which states that as he and the other kings allied with him were campaigning in the region of Sodom and Gomorrah, they smote "the Horites in their mount Seir, unto El-paran, which is by the wilderness". (KJV) 
Sebeos, the Armenian Bishop and historian, describing the Arab conquest of his time, wrote that the Arabs "assembled and came out from Paran". 
in 1989, Professor Haseeb Shehada, in his translation of the Samaritan Torah, suggested an identification of the wilderness of Paran with the desert of Western Arabia, which is known today as the Hijaz. 
The Arab geographer Al-Muqaddasi mentioned in his book that the Red Sea branches into two "at the extremity of al-Hijaz at a place called Faran". 
According to Wahb ibn Munabbih, there was a Tal Faran ("Hill of Faran") on the outskirts of Mecca, mentioned in his book Kitab al-Tijan, a Pre-Islamic Arabic folklore compilation. Ibn Munabbih further suggested an identification for Tal Faran as the 'mound of the Two runaways', a place where the Jurhum tribe found Hagar and Ishmael and thought of them as two runaways. 
the link between Paran and the Arabs (actually the Arabic language), who are also called Ishmaelites after Ishmael (among other names), is very early although somewhat vague.
The Purified National Party (Afrikaans: Gesuiwerde Nasionale Party) was a break away from Hertzog's National Party which lasted from 1935 to 1948. 
In 1935 the main portion of the National Party, led by J. B. M. Hertzog, merged with the South African Party of Jan Smuts to form the United Party. A hardline faction of Afrikaner nationalists, led by D. F. Malan, strongly opposed the merger. Malan and 19 other MPs defected to form the Purified National Party, which he led for the next fourteen years in opposition. 
In 1939 the question of South African participation in World War II caused a split in the United Party. Hertzog's Nationalist wing broke away and merged with the Purified National Party to form the Reunited (Herenigde) National Party. This party went on to defeat the United Party in the election of 1948. 
This article about a South African political party is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Clistoceratidae is one of six families of the Somoholitoidea superfamily. They are an extinct group of ammonoid, which are shelled cephalopods related to squids, belemnites, octopuses, and cuttlefish, and more distantly to the nautiloids. 
Tokkei Security Hiratsuka General Gymnasium is an arena in Hiratsuka, Kanagawa, Japan.This is an anime spot based on Slam Dunk (manga).  
Sakshi Malik is an Indian actress, fitness influencer and model, known for her role in the film Sonu Ke Titu Ki Sweety and its associated song, "Bom Diggy Diggy". 
Sakshi was born in Kanpur, Uttar Pradesh. She completed her Bachelor of Technology at the Jaypee Institute of Information Technology, Delhi. During college, she started to appear in fashion shows. 
After graduation, Malik moved to Mumbai and started modelling for television commercials of brands, including Nykaa and PC Jeweller. In 2018, she made her debut in Bollywood by acting in the film Sonu Ke Titu Ki Sweety. Her song from the film, "Bom Diggy Diggy", became popular on the Internet in India. She was also in the music video for Armaan Malik's single "Veham". 
Her photo was used as a commercial sex worker in the 2020 Telugu movie V, for which she approached the Bombay High Court. In March 2021, the High Court ordered Amazon Prime to take down the movie because use of her photo "without consent is prima facie impermissible, unlawful and entirely illegal"; the movie was promptly removed from the platform. The producers and the actor settled their disputes after a month. 
The physiology of plant memory is documented in many studies and is understood to have four main physiological mechanisms that work together in synchrony to provide the plant with basic memory functions, and are thought to be precursors to advanced memory functions found in animals. These four mechanisms are the storing and recalling, habituation, gene priming or epigenetics, and the biological clock. 
Duane Raymond Hall, II (born February 6, 1967) is an American attorney and politician. Elected to the North Carolina House of Representatives 11th district in 2012, Representative Hall was chosen by his colleagues to serve as Freshman Leader. Re-elected in 2014, Rep. Hall was ranked as one of the most effective Democratic members of the North Carolina General Assembly's 2015-2017 session.  
In 2018 North Carolina Governor Roy Cooper appointed Representative Hall to serve as Chairman of the North Carolina Courts Commission. In his final term, ending in 2019, Representative Hall was the primary sponsor of more successful legislation than any other Democratic member of the House, including the landmark Raise the Age bill, which raised the age of juvenile jurisdiction.  
In 2013, Hall sponsored a successful bill that encouraged mediation between landlords and homeowners associations. He has been a major critic of a 2013 North Carolina voter I.D. law that was passed following Shelby County v. Holder. 
Hall is currently in private law practice in Raleigh , North Carolina, specializing in Real Estate law, eminent domain and personal injury. 
He made a single first-class appearance for the team, during the 1829 season, against England. Faulkner scored 1 not out in the first innings, and 9 in the second innings. 
DSN1, MIND kinetochore complex component, homolog (S. cerevisiae), also known as DSN1 or MIS13, is a protein which in humans encoded by the DSN1 gene. 
DSN1 along with MIS12, DC8, PMF1, CBX5, ZWINT is a component of the kinetochore-associated multiprotein complex which is required for correct chromosome alignment during the metaphase of cell mitosis. 
  Admiral George Losack (died 19 September 1829) was an officer of the British Royal Navy who saw service in the American Revolutionary War the French Revolutionary and Napoleonic Wars.  
After the Peace of Amiens Jupiter returned to Britain and was paid off. On the commencement of the Napoleonic Wars Losack returned to service as captain of the 98-gun ship of the line HMS Prince George. He was subsequently promoted to rear-admiral in 1808, vice-admiral in 1813 and full admiral in 1825 without returning to active service. he died in Milan in September 1829. 
This biographical article related to the Royal Navy is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Joel Clifford Dreessen (born July 26, 1982) is a former American football tight end. He was drafted by the New York Jets in the sixth round of the 2005 NFL Draft. He played college football at Colorado State. 
Dreessen was born in Ida Grove, Iowa, and graduated from Fort Morgan High School in 2000. In 1999, Fort Morgan was the Colorado 3A State champions. Dreessen was also a member of the all-state team in Colorado that year. 
On October 28, 2007, Joel Dreessen caught his first NFL touchdown pass, a 28-yard reception in the fourth quarter from quarterback Sage Rosenfels against the San Diego Chargers at San Diego's Qualcomm Stadium. It was Houston's only touchdown in a 35-10 loss, and Dreessen was named Houston's top offensive player despite only one reception.  Dreessen re-signed with the Texans in 2009 for a reported three-year, $3.6 million deal.[citation needed] 
Near the end of the 2009 season, Dreessen had become the starter at tight end due to the injury of Owen Daniels. Dreessen caught the first touchdown pass in the Texans' last game against the New England Patriots from Matt Schaub. 
Dreessen signed with the Denver Broncos on March 23, 2012 for three years and $8.5 million. In 2012, he caught 41 receptions as well as 5 touchdowns while playing in 16 games with 15 starts. Dreesen played in 13 games in the 2013 season, recording seven catches and one touchdown. 
A native of San Pedro, California, Lovitto was a competent outfielder with blazing speed who batted over .300 in his minor league career, but never fulfilled expectations at the Major League level. One of his former managers, Billy Martin, wrote, in his autobiography, that Lovitto could have had a great career if not for injuries. 
In a four-season career, Lovitto was a .216 hitter (165-for-763) with four home runs, 53 RBI, and 22 stolen bases in 306 games. 
The Expulsion (German: Die Austreibung) is a 1923 silent German drama film directed by F. W. Murnau. The film is now considered to be lost. The film's sets were designed by the art directors Erich Czerwonski and Rochus Gliese. Location shooting took place in the Riesengebirge. 
Ludmilla asks her new husband to sell the farm and move to the village, as she cannot stand being isolated in the mountains. The son agrees, hoping it will make Ludmilla love him. They go to the village to sign a deed of sale. The son drinks heavily, decides to marry Aenne to Lauer, and then has second thoughts about selling the farm.  
Unable to find her husband, who has gone to the notary to cancel the sale, Ludmilla asks Lauer to take her home. A blizzard has begun, and they are unable to make it back up the mountain. They take refuge in Lauer's cabin instead, where they begin to make love. The son, however, follows their tracks in the snow. He finds them in the cabin, and brutally assaults Lauer. 
The next morning, the son and Ludmilla return to the farm, their marriage in ruins. They discover that the mother and father have decided to leave their beloved home, now that it has been sold, and have already packed all their things. 
Assetz Capital is a British peer-to-peer or "marketplace" lender which allows private and institutional investors to lend money directly to small businesses (SMEs) and property developers. 
Assetz Capital was the first secured P2P lender in the United Kingdom.  The company, founded by Stuart Law, was launched in March 2013. 
In May 2013, Assetz Capital became the first peer-to-peer lending company to launch peer-to-peer backed buy-to-let mortgages. In September 2013, Yahoo! Finance credited Assetz Capital as the fastest-growing peer-to-peer lending company in the UK. 
In January 2020, Assetz Capital filed its first set of audited statutory accounts (audited by Kay Johnson Gee LLP, a local Manchester based firm), for the year ended 31 March 2019. Prior to this point, the company was filing unaudited small company accounts. 
Assetz Capital's headquarters is in Manchester, and it has offices in London and Edinburgh. Assetz Capital has a nationwide network of Relationship Directors who help guide borrowers through the lending process. 
In December 2012, HM Treasury announced the start of a consultation period to regulate the peer-to-peer industry and in April 2013 Assetz Capital and the other leading peer-to-peer lenders obtained interim permissions from the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA). Assetz Capital received full FCA authorisation in September 2017. 
Advertised returns in 2017 were 3.75% to 15% gross but will vary from lender to lender. These returns are subject to taxation and losses arising from defaults. 
Assetz Capital has a number of investment accounts. Target rates of interest vary based on the types of loans they invest in, security types, diversification of the investment, ease of access to funds in normal market conditions, and any additional cover such as a provision fund. 
This biographical article relating to an American baseball pitcher born in the 1870s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The episode begins with Wolverine in the Danger Room training against robots that look like Cyclops, clad in a tuxedo. Meanwhile, Jean Grey and Cyclops are getting married. Jean throws the bouquet for the girls (Jubilee attempts to restrain Rogue from flying and cheating), but the flowers fall on top of a box that Beast was carrying. 
After the wedding is over, the reverend transforms back into Morph. He is still deeply disturbed at the fact that he was left behind to die (this happened in the Night of the Sentinels (Part 2) episode after he was shot and the X-Men thought he was dead). Still clad in her wedding gown, Jean goes to the Danger Room and apologizes to Wolverine. 
The president pardons Beast of all the charges against him and he is released from prison. Graydon Creed, who is the leader of Friends of Humanity, sends in one of his men dressed up as a mutant to terrorize everyone. Soon the Friends of Humanity start anti-mutant riots. 
Morph is appalled by this and does not really desire revenge on his former allies, but he has developed a split personality with his evil personality being dominant. He poses as Magneto and sends a fake distress call to Professor X, saying he needs his help and is in some kind of trouble in Antarctica. So, Xavier goes after him alone and tells the X-Men it's a personal matter. 
Gambit, Beast and Wolverine go to a bar to play pool, where the Friends of Humanity attack them. Clayton Creed records the attack on video and uses the footage to slander Beast, as he appeared to be involved in a riot and terrorizing civilians. Wolverine gets mad at hearing this and goes out for a drive. 
Morph transforms into Wolverine and gets inside the X-Mansion. He then transforms into Rogue and tells Gambit that she is able to touch other people. Gambit unwittingly later goes up to the real Rogue, kisses her, and falls unconscious. 
Meanwhile, Morph transforms into Storm and tells Jubilee to go to a place to protect some mutants. It was a trap, as Morph had sent her to the headquarters of Friends of Humanity, where she was recognized and caught. 
After hearing of another riot, Storm and Rogue go to stop them. Storm was badly injured when Morph transforms into the police chief and orders everyone to shoot her. Storm is taken away in an ambulance. Mister Sinister is revealed to be monitoring the whole process and then the episode ends in a cliffhanger. 
The episode starts off with Cyclops and Jean Grey on a sailboat headed for an island.  Meanwhile, Beast is getting attacked by the Danger Room, but is eventually able to stop it.  Morph, outside of the X-Mansion, feels as if he belongs there.  Mister Sinister approaches him, and convinces him to turn back to his evil side.  He then states that Cyclops and Jean Grey will be his. 
Later, Wolverine and Jubilee find Morph trying to escape in the X-Jet carrier. Wolverine tries to reason with Morph and he explains why he got left behind and that Wolverine went back to look for him. Morph remains unmoved and he shapeshifts into Wolverine, attacking him. Jubilee is unsure which Wolverine is real and she accidentally blasts the real one, allowing Morph to escape in the jet. 
Jubilee visits Storm at the hospital and tells her of Morph's return. Meanwhile, Morph lands on the island and returns to Mister Sinister.  Cyclops is shocked to see him alive, but Morph reveals he is back for revenge and was the minister that married him and Jean Grey. He continues to blame Cyclops for leaving him behind and prepares to shoot him, but is stopped by Mister Sinister. As he explains how he found Morph, the X-Men enter. 
Cyclops and Jean Grey vow to get properly married again one day.  Morph escapes, while Wolverine vows to find him - remembering Morph as the only person that could make him laugh. 
During the flashback scene images of Cyclops' past, a shot of him wearing a classic yellow & blue style X-Men uniform, and fighting the Super-Adaptoid (a green robot with the powers of the original "Marvel Comics' The Avengers") is a scene based out of Uncanny X-Men issue #29. As Morph changes back into true form outside the X-Men Mansion, he makes reference to a 1990s Saturday Night Live skit as he says, "Making copies." 
Following Morph's death in the pilot episode after being struck by a Sentinel, the character became extremely popular and re-appeared in the second season under demand from fans. However, this was not initially planned and it was originally intended that Morph's character continued to be presumed dead by the X-Men throughout the series. 
Toon Zone published a review covering both chapters, describing the episode mostly positively, its only critical point being the episodes' conclusion. Both chapters of the episode have an entry on Rotten Tomatoes. 
The 1973 Limerick Senior Hurling Championship was the 79th staging of the Limerick Senior Hurling Championship since its establishment by the Limerick County Board. 
On 25 November 1973, Kilmallock won the championship after a 2-12 to 2-04 defeat of Killeedy in the final. It was their third championship title overall and their first championship title since 1967. 
Chlorobutanol is formed by the reaction of chloroform and acetone in the presence of potassium or sodium hydroxide. It may be purified by sublimation or recrystallisation. 
Chlorobutanol has proven effective at stimulating parthenogenesis in sea urchin eggs up to the pluteus stage, possibly by increasing irritability to cause stimulation. For the eggs of the fish Oryzias latipes, however, chlorobutanol only acted as an anesthetic. 
The touch hole in the rear (breech) of the cannon was primed with finer gunpowder (priming powder) or from a quill (from a porcupine or the skin-end of a feather) pre-filled with priming powder, then ignited. 
The linstock slow match or the spark from the flintlock ignited the priming powder, which in turn set off the main charge, which propelled the shot out of the barrel. When the gun discharged, the recoil sent it backwards until it was stopped by the breech rope, a sturdy rope made fast to ring bolts let into the bulwarks, with a turn taken about the gun's cascabel (the knob at the end of the gun barrel). 
A complete and accurate listing of the types of naval guns requires analysis both by nation and by time period. The types used by different nations at the same time often were very different, even if they were labelled similarly. The types used by a given nation would shift greatly over time, as technology, tactics, and current weapon fashions changed. 
French ships used similarly standardized guns of 36-pound, 24-pound, 18-pound, 12-pound, and 8-pound calibers, augmented by carronades and smaller pieces. In general, larger ships carrying more guns carried larger ones as well. 
The carronade was another compromise design. It fired an extremely heavy shot but, to keep down the weight of the gun, it had a very short barrel, giving it shorter range and lesser accuracy. However, at the short range of many naval engagements, these "smashers" were very effective. Their lighter weight and smaller crew requirement allowed them to be used on smaller ships than would otherwise be needed to fire such heavy projectiles. It was used from the 1770s to the 1850s. 
The number of clerics in the Parliament has declined significantly since 1980. According to Yasmin Alem, it is difficult to explain this decline, however, some factors may have played a role in this trend: Popularity of clerics has waved since the new generation of voters has less emotional ties to the revolution, and political factions and coalitions adapted stratagems leading to de-clericalization. 
Imber tropicus is a moth of the family Sphingidae and only member of the genus Imber. It was described by Maxwell Sydney Moulds in 1983. It is found in the tropical north of Australia, including the Northern Territory, Queensland and Western Australia. 
Siphocampylus loxensis is a species of plant in the family Campanulaceae. It is endemic to Ecuador.  Its natural habitat is subtropical or tropical moist montane forests. It is threatened by habitat loss. 
Some of the ranges' main attractions are: the four popular surf beaches, Piha, Muriwai, Te Henga (Bethells Beach), Karekare; an extensive network of bush walks and tracks; and panoramic views of the east and west coasts and the city. A road, aptly named Scenic Drive, runs a good portion of the length of the ranges from Titirangi to Swanson. Auckland City Council operates an information centre on Scenic Drive, called Arataki Visitor Centre. 
The beaches are typical of west coast beaches north of Taranaki in that they are all black sand beaches. They have a reputation of being dangerous for swimmers due to rips and large swells. Surf Life Saving Clubs patrol designated areas of the four most popular beaches during the summer months. Piha Surf Life Saving Club is the oldest of these, being founded in 1934. 
The Ark in the Park conservation initiative, a partnership between Forest and Bird and the Auckland Council, is working to reintroduce some of the species made extinct in the Cascades Kauri Park section of the ranges. The project was started in 2003 and now covers 2,300 hectares (5,700 acres). 
Although some people objected to giving their religion, 69.6% had no religion, 19.5% were Christian, and 4.9% had other religions. 
Of those at least 15 years old, 552 (28.6%) people had a bachelor or higher degree, and 216 (11.2%) people had no formal qualifications. The employment status of those at least 15 was that 1,038 (53.8%) people were employed full-time, 354 (18.4%) were part-time, and 57 (3.0%) were unemployed. 
Ted Genoways (born April 13, 1972) is an American journalist and author.  He is a contributing writer at Mother Jones and The New Republic, and an editor-at-large at Pacific Standard.  His books include This Blessed Earth and The Chain: Farm, Factory, and the Fate of Our Food. 
In 2003, while he was still a doctoral student at the University of Iowa and working at the Iowa Review, Genoways was hired by the University of Virginia to edit the Virginia Quarterly Review. He served as editor for the next nine years, during which time the magazine received six National Magazine Awards, two Utne Independent Press Awards, and an Overseas Press Club Award. In 2012, Genoways announced that he was stepping down as editor of VQR to pursue his writing career. 
Genoways has since become a contributing writer at Mother Jones and The New Republic, as well as an editor-at-large at Pacific Standard. His essays and poetry have appeared in The Atlantic, Bloomberg Businessweek, Harper's, The New Republic, The New York Times Magazine, Outside, Poetry, and the Washington Post Book World. He has received a James Beard Foundation Award for Investigative Reporting, a MOTHER, and the James Aronson Award for Social Justice Journalism. 
In October 2014, Genoways published the book The Chain: Farm, Factory, and the Fate of Our Food, which Eric Schlosser in the New York Times Book Review called an "important book, well worth reading, full of compelling stories, genuine outrage and the careful exposure of corporate lies." 
According to Publishers Weekly, his next book Tequila Wars: The Bloody Struggle for the Spirit of Mexico is scheduled to be edited by John Glusman at Norton. "Tequila Wars examines agave farming in Mexico and aims to 'tell the story of the modern tequila industry.'" 
Of the eight candidates who fought the presidential election, four were affiliated with the FDR alliance: 
In the July 2007 parliamentary election, the FDR won a total of 15 out of 147 seats: 11 for the RPM and four for PARENA. 
After being released, he was at the Uppsala Synod in 1593 as one of the twelve assessors. And in 1595 he was ordained Bishop of Skara. 
He was considered a fine and hardworking person who dedicated much time and care to the University in Uppsala and the Church. In his old age, he was weakened by age and sickness and the archdiocese was said to have been neglected. 
Many poems in his style, or borrowing his themes, have been attributed to Walter on insufficient evidence. For example, he was not the author of the satirical Apocalypse of Golias once attributed to him. In addition to his poems, Walter wrote a dialogue refuting Jewish thought and biblical interpretation and a treatise on the Trinity, and he was possibly the author of Moralium dogma philosophorum. He died of bubonic plague early in the 13th century. 
In the 1993 campaign he was elected deputy in the State Duma of the Russian Federation for the first time, and since then has been re-elected as an independent deputy three times, serving until the 2007 elections when the single constituency seats were abolished. 
He served as an adviser on film, TV and radio to Vladimir Yakovlev during the latter's tenure as the Governor (mayor) of St Petersburg. 
In 1999 Nevzorov collaborated with the ORT TV channel and often appeared as a political commentator on Sergey Dorenko's Saturday night news show. 
Later he abandoned political journalism and devoted himself to horse-riding. He founded a horsemanship school, Nevzorov Haute Ecole, and wrote the book The Horse: Crucified and Risen. He continues to make occasional excursions in politics. He directed two documentaries, produced several journal articles and publications, and maintains a blog where he expresses his views of fervent atheism and bitter criticism towards the Russian government. 
Marshall Purnell (born June 8, 1950) is a prominent African-American architect and 2008 president of the American Institute of Architects. 
Marshall E. Purnell, FAIA is a very accomplished architect in America today. In 2006, Marshall was elected as the first African American architect to serve as the national president on the American Institute of Architects in 150 years; an organisation that did not allow membership of African Americans until 1923.  His inauguration marked a significant step to diversifying the fields of Architecture and Design. 
Purnell has quite a reputable background as he was also the president of the National Organisation of Minority Architects in 1985 and 1986.  In addition, he is a former national President of The American Institute of Architects (2008) and the National Organization of Minority Architects (1985, 1986). As the Design Principal of Devrouax & Purnell Architects Planners, some firm projects include: 
The firm has won AIA Design Awards at the local, regional and national level.  Additionally, at the same time, Mr Purnell was a Principal of the graphics design firm Design Communications for over ten years. 
National Organization of Minority Architects, NOMAC, (President 1985 & 1986) National Organization of Minority Architects Counsel 
University of Michigan Taubman College of Architecture & Planning Distinguished Service Award (2007) 
Chen Kuen Lee moved to Germany in 1931 and in the same year started to study architecture at the Technische Hochschule Berlin, from which he graduated in 1937. Simultaneously he worked in the studio of Hans Poelzig. He finished his diploma in 1939. 
By providing interior spaces with different ambient qualities for the users open floor plans with interleaving rooms were created. For many of his buildings Lee himself took care of the interior design. Numerous designs for furniture, lighting, and other fitments were created. 
Lee finished 63 buildings; in addition, there are around 40 draft designs that have not been realized. Besides his residential buildings he designed several industrial plants as well as the interior of Chinese restaurants in Berlin, Karlsruhe, Stuttgart, and Munich. 
Chen Kuen Lee is the author of several essays and two books published in Taiwan on the Neues Bauen movement, the principles of which are explained by taking various buildings designed by him as examples. 
Sato began his professional career signing with the Philadelphia Phillies organization in 2000  before making his on field debut for the Batavia Muckdogs of Minor League Baseball in 2001 hitting .261 with 4 home runs and 21 RBI's. In 2002 he played again in Batavia as well as the Gulf Coast League. He was promoted to the Lakewood BlueClaws for the 2003 season and hit .247 with 6 home runs and 42 RBI's. 
Sato was selected in the seventh round by the Saitama Seibu Lions in 2003 draft upon returning to Japan, where he would play from 2004 until 2011. 
Sato briefly played in Fortitudo Baseball Bologna in the Italian Baseball League in 2012 as well as Chiba Lotte Marines in 2013. 
This biographical article relating to a Japanese baseball outfielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
For the first time an NLA season is run with a 3-point system. A team gets now 3 points for a win after 60 minutes, instead of 2. 
A tied game after 60 minutes results in an overtime of 5 minutes, which is played 4 vs. 4 (this is not a rule change). But now, if a team scores a goal it gets two points while the other team also gets a point. 
If the game still remains tied after the overtime, there will be a penalty shootout with 3 shots per team. The winner team will get two points and the other team one point. 
After the conclusion of the regular season, the bottom 4 teams will compete in a 4-team elimination playoff, with the losing team advancing to determine which team will face the champions of the National League B. The winner of the best-of-7 series will play in the National League A next season, while the losing team will play in the National League B. 
In early 2018, before the building was finished, an episode of PBS' Impossible Builds featured the building, which they referred to as the "scorpion tower", and described it as "one of the most complex skyscrapers ever to make it off the drawing board." 
A notable feature of the building is the curving exoskeleton, allowing the interior space to have fewer columns. The exoskeleton is composed of 5,000 pieces of glass fiber reinforced concrete. These pieces were shipped from Dubai early in the construction process. The exoskeleton is located in front of a glass facade. 
The building contains 84 residences, consisting of a two-story duplex penthouse, 4 townhouses, 10 full-floor residences, and 70 half-floor units. 
A swimming pool is installed at the top of the building, covered by a curving, faceted metal ceiling that reflects the water. The double-height space is occupied by the pool on one side and a seating area on the other. A similar metallic canopy design is used for the bar. A full two-room treatment spa, hair and beauty salon, acai and juice bar fueled by Raw Republic, and a sunbathing area is also installed, alongside a multimedia tower. 
This article about a building or structure in Florida is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Golden Butterfly (German: Der goldene Schmetterling)  is a 1926 Austrian-German silent drama film directed by Michael Curtiz and starring Hermann Leffler, Lili Damita and Nils Asther. It was based on the 1915 short story "The Making of Mac's" by British author P. G. Wodehouse. The film was released in the United Kingdom as The Golden Butterfly, in a form shortened to 5 reels, and had a limited release in the US under the title The Road to Happiness. 
The film was shot at the Johannisthal Studios in Berlin and on location in London and Cambridge. The film's sets were designed by the art director Paul Leni. It was made as a co-production between the Austrian Sascha Film and the German Phoebus Film. It was released in Britain by the Stoll Pictures company. It was the last film directed by the Hungarian Michael Curtiz in Germany before he emigrated to the United States. 
The 1999 Hector Mine earthquake occurred in Southern California, United States, on October 16 at 02:46:50 PDT. This seismic event had a moment magnitude of 7.1 and occurred after around 20 foreshocks. The earthquake caused minimal damage due to the distance of its epicenter from any population centers, and it deformed nearby faults vertically and horizontally.  
This German road or road transport-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
MariJo Moore is a writer of mixed Cherokee, Dutch and Irish ancestry, who frequently draws upon Native American culture in her poetry. She won the title of Writer of the Year (2002) by the Wordcraft Circle of Native Writers and Storytellers, one of the most prestigious awards in the Native American literary world. 
 Arumugam was an Indian politician and former Member of the Legislative Assembly. He was elected to the Tamil Nadu legislative assembly as an Indian National Congress candidate from Tirunelveli constituency in 1952 election. He was one of the victors from the constituency, the other being Somayajulu. 
This article about an Indian National Congress politician from Tamil Nadu is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Xylastodoris is a genus of true bugs in the family Thaumastocoridae. There are at least two described species in Xylastodoris. 
Love in a Wood; Or, St James's Park is a 1671 comedy play by the English writer William Wycherley. His debut play, it was first staged at the Theatre Royal, Drury Lane by the King's Company. 
The original cast included Charles Hart as Ranger, Richard Bell as Vincent, Edward Kynaston as Valentine, John Lacy as Alderman Gripe, William Wintershall as Sir Simon Addleplot, Michael Mohun as Dapperwit, Elizabeth Boutell as Christina, Elizabeth Cox as Lydia, Mary Knep as  Lady Flippant, Katherine Corey as  Mrs Joyner and Elizabeth James as Isabel. The published version of the following year was dedicated to the Duchess of Cleveland, mistress of Charles II. 
Born in Bologna, at the age of 15, he began training, despite the opposition of his family, under Carlo Antonio Rambaldi. When Rambaldi left for Turin in 1714, he moved to work under  Marcantonio Franceschini and his son Giacomo Franceschini. he stayed in that studio till 1729. 
In 1729, he moved for three years to Poland, to paint for the House of Rzewuski in Lviv, where he completed a number of portraits and frescoes on sacred subjects for the Carmelite Church. 
After a spell in Mantua, Sabbioneta, and Viadana, between 1726 and 1727, he was commissioned by Antonio Cavazza to paint Joseph retrieves the Silver Cup from Benjamin's Bag (now in Credito Romagnolo, Palazzo Magnani, Bologna). 
Pedretti painted lunettes in the nave for the church of Basilica of San Domenico in Bologna. He painted altarpieces in the church of the Immaculate Conception of Crevalcore. One of his pupils was the wax sculptor Anna Morandi Manzolini. 
He was named a member of the Accademia Clementina, and elected twice, the "prince" of the academy (1754 and 1770). His son, Vincenzo Pedretti, was also a figure painter in Bologna. 
No Place Like Home is a BBC situation comedy series, created, and written by Jon Watkins. It was directed, produced by Robin Nash, starring William Gaunt and Patricia Garwood as Arthur and Beryl Crabtree. Arthur has a brand new life planned with Beryl now that the last of their four children have left home...or so he thinks!  
No Place Like Home was broadcast for five series between 1983 and 1987. Technically, six series were made, but  series 3 (7 episodes), which was intended for broadcast in 1985, was subsequently aired from January 1986, back to back with series 4 (6 episodes). This resulted in both of these series merging to become an extended series 3, with 13 episodes, ending in April 1986. 
Later in October 1986, a new series 4 of seven  episodes aired, and a final fifth series of 8 episodes was broadcast in 1987. The sitcom featured the first regular roles on television for Martin Clunes and Marcia Warren. 
The eldest Crabtree son, Paul, last appeared during series 4 and the character was not recast due to the death of actor Stephen Watson on his honeymoon during the filming of series 4.  
The first two series of No Place Like Home were released in 2006; the last three series have yet to be released. 
Espen Hoff (born 20 November 1981) is a retired Norwegian professional footballer, born in Larvik. He is primarily a winger, but may also play as an attacking midfielder, whilst at Lyn he occasionally featured on the left wing. With 406 top division appearances, Hoff has made the sixth-highest number of appearances in Eliteserien. 
Espen Hoff was signed from Odd Grenland before the start of the 2006 season in Norway. As a junior, he played for Larvik Turn, before moving to Skien and Odd Grenland in 1999. 
At Odd Grenland, he scored 37 goals in 155 league matches, and additional 20 goals in 30 Norwegian Cup games. He also appeared in 6 European Cup games, without netting. He won the Norwegian Cup with Odd Grenland in 2000. 
This biographical article related to a Norwegian association football midfielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Simeon and Margarita currently reside in what was Simeon's boyhood home, Vrana Palace, near Sofia.  It was returned to them by the Bulgarian Constitutional Court. The property is operated under an agreement with the Municipality of Sofia,[citation needed] which allows the use of part of the estate as a public park;[citation needed] in return, the remainder and residence have reverted to the ownership of the family.  The legality of this transaction is disputed by Bulgarian politicians. 
WGMN is a news/talk broadcast radio station licensed to and serving Roanoke, Virginia. WGMN is owned and operated by Three Daughters Media. The station went on the air in 1946 as WROV-AM and broadcast a Contemporary hit radio format in the 1970s. WROV had a Golden Oldies format from 1989 to 1998, then became an ESPN affiliate and changed call letters to WGMN. The station switched to a news-talk format in June 2019. 
Founded on the ruins of a Gallo-Roman villa named "Le Palat", and later a 17th-century leper colony, the estate was sharecropping land that came to the ownership of the Comte de Malet-Roquefort. The word "gaffet" translates to leper. 
From 25 hectares the vineyard area extends 22 hectares, with a grape variety of 66% Merlot, and the remainder split between Cabernet Franc and Cabernet Sauvignon. 
probably meaning "Birg, beloved of Selbrad", next to a drawing of an ibex or stag scratched into the stone from perhaps the same time, but whose the authenticity is also debated. The inscription was generally considered to be fake shortly after its discovery. 
The discovery of a parallel inscription in grave 172 of the "Unterer Stollen" cemetery in Bad Krozingen in 2001, reading 
revived discussions regarding the authenticity of the Kleines Schulerloch inscription. Still, in 2003, Looijenga concluded that the inscription is an obvious falsification. In 2012, Findell, accepting the Bad Krozingen inscription as genuine, noted that most scholars still objected to its authenticity and considered the Kleines Schulerloch inscription to be at least "suspect". 
Cape Ann is a rocky cape in northeastern Massachusetts, United States on the Atlantic Ocean.  It is about 30 miles northeast of Boston and marks the northern limit of Massachusetts Bay. Cape Ann includes the city of Gloucester and the towns of Essex, Manchester-by-the-Sea and Rockport. 
Cape Ann was first mapped by the explorer John Smith. He had given it the name Cape Tragabigzanda, after his mistress in Istanbul.[citation needed] He had been taken as a prisoner of war and enslaved in the Ottoman Empire. His mistress had fallen in love with him, but Smith later escaped in Russia. 
When Smith presented his map to Charles I, he suggested that Charles should feel free to change any of the "barbarous names" (meaning the many Native American place names he had adopted) into English ones. The king made many such changes, but only four survive today. One was Cape Ann, which Charles named in honor of his mother Anne of Denmark. 
This colony predated Massachusetts Bay charter and colony. For that reason, members of the colony were referred to as "old planters". The first Great House in New England was built on Cape Ann by the planters. This house was dismantled on the orders of John Endecott in 1628 and moved to Salem to serve as his "governor's" house. When Higginson arrived in Salem, he wrote that "we found a faire house newly built for the Governor" which was remarkable for being two stories high. 
By 1634 the name of Cape Ann was already established, as it is mentioned and depicted on maps in William Wood's New England's Prospect first published in that year. 
On November 18, 1755, Cape Ann was the epicenter of an earthquake, which is extremely rare for Massachusetts.  There were no seismographs at that time; but, based on available data, the tremor was estimated at magnitude 6.5. It caused serious damage in the Boston area, but no casualties. 
By the mid-1800s, Cape Ann was known for its specialization in granite production, specifically in creating paving blocks for roads and streets and were used across the United States from New York to San Francisco. 
The entirety of Cape Ann lies within Essex County. Anchored by the city of Gloucester, the nexus of the local fishing industry, other towns on Cape Ann include Rockport, at the tip of the cape, and the towns of Essex and Manchester-by-the-Sea, which are located where Cape Ann joins the mainland. 
At the end of Cape Ann, and splitting Gloucester into two parts, is the Annisquam River. Many locals who live in Gloucester and Rockport refer to the land east of the Annisquam as "The Island". 
Cape Ann is the location of the fictional town of Sea Harbor, the setting of the Seaside Knitters mysteries by author Sally Goldenbaum. Sea Harbor is on the coast, with Gloucester as its nearest neighbor town. Cape Ann is also featured as the setting for the Harry Chapin song "Dogtown," which is also the name for an abandoned town on the Cape. 
The fictional "Gloucester Island" in 1966 Cold War comedy film The Russians Are Coming, the Russians Are Coming is located off Cape Ann and was named for the city of Gloucester.[citation needed] 
The book Slaughterhouse Five mentions Cape Ann as the honeymoon location for the main character Billy Pilgrim. 
The movie The Perfect Storm was filmed in Gloucester in 2000.   Setting out for the one last catch that will make up for a lackluster fishing season, Captain Billy Tyne (George Clooney) pushes his boat, the Andrea Gail, out to the waters of the Flemish Cap off Nova Scotia; based on actual events in 1991. 
Cape Ann is the title of the fifth and final section of T. S. Eliot's poem, "Landscapes," which lists the coastal birds of the region. Additionally, the title of his poem The Dry Salvages refers to a cluster of rocks "off the N.E. coast of Cape Ann, Massachusetts." 
The fictional town of Paradise, setting of the Jesse Stone novels, is near Cape Ann, which is briefly mentioned in Night and Day. 
The Global Energy and Water Exchanges project (abbreviated GEWEX, formerly named the Global Energy and Water Cycle Experiment from 1990 to 2012) is an international research project and a core project of the World Climate Research Programme (WCRP). 
In the beginning, the project intended to observe, comprehend and model the Earth's water cycle. The experiment also observes how much energy the Earth receives, studies how much of that energy reaches surfaces of the Earth and how that energy is transformed. Sunlight's energy evaporates water to produce clouds and rain, and dries out land masses after rain. Rain that falls on land becomes the water budget which can be used by people for agricultural and other processes. 
GEWEX is organized into several structures. As GEWEX was conceived projects were organized by participating factions, this task is now done by the International GEWEX Project Office (IGPO). IGPO oversees major initiatives and coordinates between national projects in an effort to bring about communication between researchers. IGPO claims to support communication exchange between 2000 scientist and is the instrument for publication of major reports. 
Another example is the floods that hit the Midwest U.S. in 1993. The energy that drove moisture into the air occurred in the Gulf, and strong winds and lack of cooling in coastal regions permitted the moisture to travel 1000 miles until conditions were ripe for rain. As the rain fell it cooled the air and dissipated heat, and as new moisture arrived, the process continued. When the sun did come out, it heated wet ground, which created more rain. 
Aerosols over the ocean can cause a lack of sufficient heat in the middle of the day to create sufficiently humid air. When the air reaches land, which may be warmer, there may be inadequate convection and other processes to create rains, and this can cause droughts. To better see these events progress, scientists need data and models to see what elements of the data are most useful in determining rainfall. 
GEWEX is being implemented in phases. The first phase comprises information gathering, modelling, predictions, and advancement of observation techniques and is complete. The second phase addresses several scientific questions such as prediction capacity, changes in Earth's water cycle, and the impact on water resources. 
One of the biggest impacts of the Aerosol analysis has been the demonstration of the fairly large impact of anthropogenic aerosols, smoke patterns, even daily ripples of aerosols can be observed off the coasts of some developing nations and extend hundreds of miles over surrounding oceans. Some have questioned whether this aerosol pollution is partly to blame for long-term drought in places like the African Sahel. 
There are three panels in GEWEX: The Coordinated Energy and Water Cycle Observations Project (CEOP), GEWEX Radiation Panel (GRP), and GEWEX Modeling and Prediction Panel (GMPP). 
The Coordinated Energy and Water Cycle Observations Project (CEOP) is the largest of the panel projects. There are several regional project areas most of these are now covered by CEOP 
GEWEX Radiation panel (GRP) is a collaborative organization with a goal of reviewing theoretical and experimental knowledge of radiative processes within the climate system. Sixty percent of the energy that comes to Earth from the Sun is transformed by the earth. The goals of this collaboration is to determine how energy is transformed as it inevitably is radiated back into space. 
At the onset of GEWEX there was inadequate information on how radiation redistributed, both horizontally and vertically. 
BSRN is a global system of less than 40 widely spread radiation measuring devices designed to measure changes in radiation at the Earth's surface. The information obtained is stored at the World Radiation Monitoring Center (WRMC) at the ETH (Zurich). 
Established by Radiation Sciences Program(NASA) and GEWEX in 1998 to analyze satellite and field data to determine the distribution of aerosols, how they are formed, transformed and transported. 
The GEWEX cloud assessment was initiated by the GEWEX Radiation Panel (GRP) in 2005 to evaluate the reliability of available, global, long-term cloud data products, with a special emphasis on ISCCP.   
GEWEX Atmospheric Boundary Layer Study (GABLS) is a more recent addition to GEWEX. The study is tasked with understanding the physical properties of the atmospheric boundary layers for better models which include representation of boundary layers. 
Global Land/Atmosphere System Study (GLASS) tries to understand the impact on land surface parameters on the atmosphere. Changes in land as a result of natural and man-made activities results in the ability to alter the local climate and affect wind and cloud formation. 
The Poland women's national under-20 volleyball team represents Poland in international women's volleyball competitions and friendly matches under the age 20 and it is ruled by the Polish Volleyball Federation That is an affiliate of Federation of International Volleyball FIVB and also a part of European Volleyball Confederation CEV. 
Kirill Knyazev (born June 9, 1983) is a Russian professional ice hockey player, who currently plays for Izhstal Izhevsk in the Supreme Hockey League (VHL). He is a veteran of 331 games in the Kontinental Hockey League (KHL) spanning 7 clubs. 
This biographical article relating to a Russian ice hockey winger is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
AudioDamn! is a Soul/Pop/Rock trio from Germany. The band made up of Austrians Oliver "Oli" Wimmer (vocals/guitar) and Ali Grumeth (guitar/bass/vocals) and German Daniel "Mudi" Mudrack was formed in 2011 in Mannheim, Germany. They released their self-titled debut EP AudioDamn! EP on Jan 8, 2016 featuring the singles "Radar" and "Lights Out". The band is signed to the Epic Records label since 2015. 
In November 2015, the band was picked as Elvis Duran's Artist of the Month and was featured on NBC's Today show broadcast nationally in the United States where they performed live their single "Radar".   
His first coaching job didn't last very long as Taylor left Harvard after the 1969-70 season to continue his playing career. Two years later he returned to coaching for good, helping the newly appointed Bill Cleary reach the frozen four in both 1974 and 1975. A year later, after recording the two worst records in Yale's history, Paul Lufkin was relieved of his duties and Taylor was tabbed as his successor. 
Taylor's health began to decline in later years and he was eventually diagnosed with cancer. He lost his fight against the disease on April 27, 2013, but not before he was able to witness Yale, the team he had coached for almost three decades, win its first national title under former assistant Keith Allain, which it was able to do two weeks before Taylor's death. 
Just before World War II she was a champion swimmer holding several Dutch East Indies swim records as well as Asian swimming records. 
After the war she became an artist having studied art at school. She also was an artist and interned in the Japanese camps of World War II. She survived as did a number of her colour illustrations reflecting camp life in the women's camp and now at the museum Museon. 
Her other work produced after the war is in private hands. She was not prolific due to family responsibilities but with her habit of illustrating her letters to her very large correspondence contacts has ensured that her work is well spread and in many hands. 
The shooting of Christopher Penley, a 15-year-old boy, occurred on January 13, 2006, at Milwee Middle School in Longwood, Florida. During class, Penley took out an Airsoft gun that was designed to look realistic. Penley ran from the room and eventually entered a restroom area.  SWAT officers arrived on the scene and tried to negotiate with him. Penley pointed the Airsoft gun at an officer, who responded by shooting Penley. 
He was transported to Orlando Regional Medical Center where he remained on life support for two days before dying of his wounds. Several of his organs were removed and used as transplants. Seminole County Sheriff Don Eslinger said the boy was suicidal and would not respond to negotiators who tried to talk him down in the bathroom. 
Some students at the school told the media after the incident that they knew he had "something planned". Police have been criticized for initiating action instead of waiting for Penley's father to arrive so that his father might convince him to surrender. The Orlando Sentinel reported that Ralph Penley was not told of events until after his son was shot. The Florida Department of Law Enforcement investigated the shooting and found it entirely justified, as Penley aimed a weapon at the deputy. 
Penley's organs were donated by his family. His death gave nine people vital organs. Christopher Penley has also had a game room at the Landmark Church dedicated to him and a Youth center. The youth center the Adolescent Life Coaching Center opened in honor of Christopher Penley's memory and to give a place for the voice of youth to be heard. 
Penley's family filed a lawsuit against police; however, a judge dismissed the suit after determining that the shooting was justified. 
An England team toured Australia between November 1920 and March 1921.  The tour was organised by the Marylebone Cricket Club and matches outside the Tests were played under the MCC name.  The tour itinerary consisted of 13 first-class matches, including a series of 5 Test matches against Australia in which The Ashes were at stake. 
The tour was the first to have Test status after the First World War. It followed tours by the Australian Imperial Forces cricket team which played a number of first-class matches in England, South Africa and Australia immediately after the war. The last Ashes series had been the 1912 Triangular Tournament held in England that year. 
Although the tourists were relatively successful in their first-class matches against the Australian state teams, losing only one, the Test series "resulted, as everyone knows, in disaster" and England became the first team ever to lose every match in a five-Test series. 
Wisden commented that the chief cause of England's failure was the bowling, because all of the bowlers used were expensive and recorded high averages. Much has been made of Australia's ability to recover from the effects of the war more quickly than England and Wisden commented that "English cricket had not had time to regain its pre-war standard". 
When the party was originally selected, Reggie Spooner was invited to be the team captain but he was obliged to stand down for domestic reasons.  Vallance Jupp had been selected too but was unable to travel.  Jupp's withdrawal was shortly before departure and meant that his replacement Bill Hitch had to catch a later boat than the main party.  There was another withdrawal when Jack Hearne was taken ill during the Second Test and could not play again that season. 
There was a controversy over Rockley Wilson who sent match reports by cable to the Daily Express.  As a result, MCC resolved at a meeting the following May to bar players from reporting on matches in which they were involved. 
Australia used 14 players in the Test series.  Eight players took part in all five matches including the captain Warwick Armstrong. 
The English team had a stopover in Colombo en route to Australia and played a one-day single-innings match there against the Ceylon national team, which at that time did not have Test status. 
Schreiner took his examen artium at Christiania Cathedral School in 1849, and graduated from the Royal Frederick University with the cand.philol. degree in 1855. He studied in Berlin for one year and also worked as a teacher of the secondary school Nissens Latin- og Realskole. 
Schneiner started his own school in 1859, but sold it in 1862 to work for a year as a research fellow at the university. He wrote his only academic paper, Om Forholdet mellom rythmus og metrum, but it was not published until 1866, when Schreiner had returned to the school system. Schreiner worked at Christiania Cathedral School from 1863 to 1872. From 1870, he was acting principal while Frederik Ludvig Vibe was ill.  
In 1872, Schreiner was made the principal at Skien Latinskole a post he held until 1876. He was at Drammen Latinskole from 1877 to 1893 and Kristiania Cathedral School (the school had changed spelling) from 1894 to 1907. 
Schreiner was a Commander, Second Class of the Royal Norwegian Order of St. Olav. Despite having only worked one year at a university, as research fellow, Schreiner was also made a member of the Norwegian Academy of Science and Letters from 1887. He was also invited to sit on the assessment committee for professor candidates at the university. In December 1875, he was a part of the majority of the committee which appointed Johan Peter Weisse as professor, in preference to Jan Johanssen. 
The Sixers had acquired the first overall draft pick from the Boston Celtics on June 19, four days before the 2017 NBA draft began in exchange for their third overall draft pick that year (which became Jayson Tatum) and another first round pick in 2019, their own or the Kings which ever is better (Sixers would get the pick if it was #1 overall). They used the 2017 first overall pick to select Markelle Fultz, who missed most of his rookie season due to injuries. 
The compound was first synthesized by Horst Prinzbach and his associates in 1987, by a 14-step sequence starting from isodrin. In the process they also synthesized [2.2.1.1]pagodane C22H24 and several derivatives. 
Prinzbach remarked that "the obvious need for [the short name 'pagodane'] can be readily understood in view of the von Baeyer/IUPAC and Chemical Abstracts nomenclature", undecacyclo[9.9.0.01,5.02,12.02,18.03,7.06,10.08,12.011,15.013,17.016,20]icosane. 
The scheme depicted here may be shortened to 14 one-pot operations with 24% overall yield. Yet, this variation requires the use of tetrachlorothiophenedioxide instead of tetrachloro-dimethoxycyclopentadiene in two of the early steps. While lesser steps and higher yield look attractive at first sight, this approach had to be given up due to high cost and restricted availability of the dioxide. 
Cardiff Bay Barrage (Welsh: Morglawdd Bae Caerdydd) lies across the mouth of Cardiff Bay, Wales between Queen Alexandra Dock and Penarth Head. It was one of the largest civil engineering projects in Europe during construction in the 1990s. 
The origin of the scheme dates back to a visit by Nicholas Edwards, the Secretary of State for Wales, to the largely-derelict Cardiff docklands in the early 1980s. An avid opera enthusiast, Edwards envisaged a scheme to revitalise the area incorporating new homes, shops, restaurants and, as a centrepiece, an opera house at the waterside. However the tidal nature of Cardiff Bay, exposing extensive mudflats save for two hours either side of high water, was seen as aesthetically unappealing. 
Edwards credited the solution to this perceived problem to a Welsh Office civil servant, Freddie Watson. Watson proposed building a barrage stretching across the mouth of Cardiff Bay from Cardiff Docks to Penarth, which would impound freshwater from the rivers Ely and Taff to create a large freshwater lake, thus providing permanent high water. By making the area more appealing, investment was to be attracted to the docklands. 
The development was also inspired by the redevelopment of Baltimore Inner Harbor in the US, where a largely derelict port area was transformed into a thriving commercial district and tourist attraction. 
The barrage was consequently seen as central to the regeneration project. In 1987, prior to approval of the construction of the barrage, the Cardiff Bay Development Corporation was established to proceed with redeveloping the docklands, a sixth of the entire area of the city of Cardiff. 
In November 1999, the barrage was completed, with the sluice gates closed at high water, to retain the seawater from the Bristol Channel within the 500 acre (200 hectare) bay. 
At first major water quality problems ensued which required the bay to be drained dry overnight and refilled each day.[citation needed] 
Eventually, oxygenation systems (based on those used at the Swansea Barrage) were installed which improved water quality and allowed the composition of the bay to become entirely freshwater, the only saltwater ingress being that from the three locks providing access to and from the severn estuary for the proliferating number of boats using Cardiff Bay. This salt water sinks to the bottom of the bay which is then sucked back out to sea via a trainage basin connected to a salt water shaft.   
The Cardiff Bay Development Corporation was wound up on 31 March 2000, handing over control of the completed project to Cardiff Council. Soon afterwards the plaque at the Penarth end of the barrage was removed and an entirely new plaque erected midway along the barrage. The new plaque made no mention of Cardiff Bay Development Authority. The bronze figure of the CBDC symbol of the mermaid, however, remained on the roundabout, at the entrance to the Penarth end of the barrage. 
The barrage has played an important role in the regeneration of the area. Attractions such as the Wales Millennium Centre, the National Assembly for Wales, shopping and watersports have since moved onto the waterfront. In 2000 the Cardiff Bay Development Corporation was dissolved, and the Welsh Assembly awarded a contract to Cardiff County Council to manage the barrage, as Cardiff Harbour Authority (CHA). 
The Cardiff Bay Barrage has won awards as a feat of engineering from the British Construction Industry and achieved the Institution of Civil Engineers Brunel Medal. 
The bronze mermaid which stands on the roundabout at the Penarth end of the barrage was designed by Cardiff graphics artist Roger Fickling and comprised the official logo of the Cardiff Bay Development Corporation. It was installed on Vale of Glamorgan land because of tensions between the CBDC and Cardiff Council (see above). 
The freshwater lake had problems with blue-green algae initially which made it impossible to swim in the water or participate in water sports. These issues have now largely been resolved though some toxic algae remain in some of the dock areas in the bay. 
Desisa quadriplagiata is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Stephan von Breuning in 1938. It is known from India. 
Dmitriyevka is located 29 km north of Liski (the district's administrative centre) by road. Pochepskoye is the nearest rural locality. 
Directors of the series including several renowned Hong Kong directors such as Ann Hui, Allen Fong and Derek Yee. 
Originally, the show was filmed in black and white, and each episode lasted only 15 minutes. It was later expanded to 30 minutes per episode. Starting 1978, each episode lasted 60 minutes. In May 2006, a new season comprising 10 episodes started to air on TVB Jade. 
The film was produced and directed by R. Padmanaban. P. Neelakantan wrote the screenplay and dialogues. The film was shot at Modern Theatres. 
Lyrics were penned by Palavangkudi Sama, S. G. Chellappa Iyer, Udumalai Narayana Kavi and T. K. Sundara Vathiyar. No music composer was credited. 2 songs sung by Kothamangalam Seenu - Bhoomi Iyarkai Kaana Kaana and Kalai Gnaaname Arulvaai became popular. 
This article about a Tamil-language film of the 1940s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Yekar was elected from the Daporijo constituency in the 2014 Arunachal Pradesh Legislative Assembly election, standing as an Indian National Congress candidate. 
The militants stopped the two trains about a kilometre from Ludhiana station by pulling their emergency cords, triggering emergency brakes. They proceeded to open fire inside the trains at around 9:35 p.m. (IST), killing at least 80 passengers. 
On the second train, the Dhuri-Hisar passenger train, the militants fired indiscriminately. After the attackers fled, the train moved back to Badduwal station, where the rescue team arrived with doctors. Local villagers helped the survivors with food, water, medicine, and mental support. 
The attacks came less than five hours after polling closed in a national election already marred by violence and interrupted by the assassination of ex-Prime Minister Rajiv Gandhi around a month prior. 
Later that year, in December 1991, militants killed 49 more passengers, mostly Hindus, travelling on train from Ludhiana to Ferozepur. 
Wire binding is a popular commercial book binding method, and is known by a number of different names including twin loop wire, wire-o, double loop wire, double-o, ring wire and wirebind. With this binding method, users insert their punched pages onto a "C" shaped spine and then use a wire closer to squeeze the spine until it is round. Documents that are bound with wire binding will open completely flat on a desk and allow for 360 degree rotation of bound pages. 
There are three common hole patterns used in binding documents with double loop wire.  Each hole pattern has specific sizes and applications where it is best suited.  Here is a quick overview of the different options. 
Filippo Guastavillani was born in Bologna on September 28, 1541, the son of Bolognese patricians Angelo Michele Guastavillani and Giacoma Boncompagni. His mother was the sister of Pope Gregory XIII. He was the cousin of Cardinal Filippo Boncompagni. 
As a young man, he received the tonsure in Bologna.  There, he was a member of the Council of the Forty from 1571 to 1576.  He was also Bologna's Gonfaloniere of Justice. 
He participated in the papal conclave of 1585 that elected Pope Sixtus V. The new pope named him Governor of Montis Castelli Tudertini in 1585.  On January 7, 1587, Cardinal Guastavillani opted for the deaconry of Sant'Eustachio. He was the Camerlengo of the Holy Roman Church from May 14, 1584 until his death.  He was also Governor of Bologna and Ferrara. 
He died in Rome on August 17, 1587. He was initially buried in Santi Apostoli.  The next year, his remains were transferred to Bologna and buried in the Church of San Francesco. 
Plagiomimicus mimica is a species of moth in the family Noctuidae (the owlet moths). It is found in North America. 
This biographical article related to a Brazilian association football forward born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Markham studied at the University of Oxford and taught there for 40 years. He was Fellow and History Tutor at Hertford College, Oxford, from 1931 until 1973. 
Markham corresponded with film director Stanley Kubrick over a never-realised project of Kubrick's on Napoleon Bonaparte. 
The San Francisco Residence Parks are located in the western neighborhoods of San Francisco. The first of the master-planned residence parks to be built on the West side of the city was Presidio Terrace in 1905. This was followed by St. Francis Wood, Sea Cliff, Lincoln Manor, West Clay Park, Forest Hill, Balboa Terrace, Ingleside Terraces, and Jordan Park. 
After the 1906 earthquake and fire in San Francisco, residence parks in San Francisco were promoted to white collar residents as an alternative to new housing developments in the East Bay and South Bay Peninsula.  Sales increased significantly in the 1920s, and by the 1930s most tracts in San Francisco residence parks were already constructed. 
Sidi Yaya Keita (born 20 March 1985) is a Malian former professional footballer who played as a defensive midfielder. 
Keita's cousin, Seydou Keita, was also a footballer and a midfielder. He too represented Lens and, with great individual and team success, also played for FC Barcelona. 
Ebb and Flow (also called ebb flood and flood drain) are two phases of the tide or any similar movement of water. The ebb is the outgoing phase, when the tide drains away from the shore, and the flow is the incoming phase when water rises again.  The terms are also common in figurative use. 
Ebb and Flow is a form of hydroponics that is known for its simplicity,  reliability of operation and low initial investment cost.  Pots are filled with an inert medium which does not function like soil or contribute nutrition to the plants but which anchors the roots and functions as a temporary reserve of water and solvent mineral nutrients. The hydroponic solution alternately floods the system and is allowed to ebb away. 
E&F utilizes the fact that the solution is not left in constant contact with the roots of plants, to avoid the need for oxygenating or chilling of the solution. Instead it relies on characteristics of root function to provide passive oxygenation at a high level which tends to suppress pathogen growth. 
Simplicity is maintained through usage of a single, two-directional path for the solution. Water flows in and out using the same tube. When the pump has raised water into the tray, briefly submerging the roots, the pump is rendered inactive using a switch, typically a timer, and the water flows back down the same tube. This eliminates the need for more than one sealed fitting and reduces overall complexity of the system.  
Aeration of an ebb and flood system is an important aspect of its operation. Automatic displacement eliminates air which has been de-oxygenated by the roots as the water rises to its highest flood stage. When the pump turns off, gravity pulls the water downwards, which re-exposes the space around the roots to the air. 
Ebb and flow hydroponic systems are also quiet, while using less power than other hydroponic systems, which means that they can be used in environments where acoustic signature and excessive plumbing is objectionable, such as residential or classroom applications where space is at a premium. 
Ebb and flow systems are flexible, with few practical drawbacks. Though typically known for compact cultivation of plants having smaller stature, it has been used for growing large plants, using buckets ranging in size from 1 gallon to 5 gallons, making use of high-volume pumps such as those in large aquariums, decorative fountains and koi ponds.  
A second drawback is that the roots tend to grow together, meaning removal of harvested or damaged plants can be somewhat problematic in plants having well-developed root systems. Commercial crops harvested at one time are somewhat immune to concerns related to that aspect of the system, but in the event of pathogenic invasion the problem can quickly spread, as all the roots share the same flood source. 
Sami Ullah Khan is a Pakistani politician who is member-elect of the Provincial Assembly of the Punjab. 
He was elected to the Provincial Assembly of the Punjab as a candidate of Pakistan Peoples Party (PPP) from Constituency PP-144 (Lahore-I) in 2002 Pakistani general election. 
He was re-elected to the Provincial Assembly of the Punjab as a candidate of Pakistan Muslim League (N) from Constituency PP-144 (Lahore-I) in 2018 Pakistani general election. 
This article about a Member of the Provincial Assembly of the Punjab is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Truman is an unincorporated community located in the town of Kendall, Lafayette County, Wisconsin, United States. Truman is located on Truman Road, County Highway Z, and County Highway O. 
This article about a location in Lafayette County, Wisconsin is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Justice David H. Souter delivered the opinion of the Court. The Court considered the interaction between prior sexual harassment cases and the Restatement of Agency, and found that the City is responsible for the employer's actions based on Title VII, subject to an affirmative defense. 
Koch was born in Charleston, Illinois, and spent his youth in Indianapolis before attending Northwestern University. He published a book of poetry, I'll Remember Indiana, in 1948, and a book about Indiana basketball, Tournament Trail, in 1950. Later with Mad he published four books under the magazine's imprint. Koch moved to California in 1957, and was married three times. 
Koch was also one of the primary writers for radio performers Bob and Ray. It was this association that brought him to the attention of Mad when some of the show's scripts were reproduced in the magazine with caricatures of the star duo drawn by Mort Drucker. Mad eventually published ten Bob & Ray articles in the space of a year and a half, but Koch went on to write more than 300 other pieces for the magazine between 1958 and 1995 on a variety of subjects. 
Koch's professional association with the duo lasted 33 years, though contact was infrequent. Bob Elliott recalled that he and Ray Goulding would only learn where their ongoing storyline segments were headed next by ripping open the envelopes mailed in by Koch: "It was great when the Tom Koch package arrived." Following Koch's death, Elliott told the New York Times that he had only met Koch three times, and that Goulding had met him just once. 
In 1965, Mad #95 included "43-Man Squamish", written by Koch and illustrated by George Woodbridge. The absurdist article detailed the convoluted rules of an imaginary sport, and made enough of an impression to be mentioned in both men's New York Times obituaries, including the first sentence of Koch's. 
In the article, new terminology is introduced with no explanation; much of the humor derives from the reader's half-successful attempts at gleaning a meaning from context. Exactly what everyone on the team is supposed to do, exactly what penalties apply, and exactly when or why the "yellow caution flag" is to be flown remains far from clear, even after repeated readings. 
The teams must play a sudden-death overtime to break a tie, unless both Left Overblats are out of the game on personal fouls. If this is the case, the tie is settled by the teams lining up on opposite sides of the flutney (inherently difficult on a pentagonal shape) and shouting dirty limericks at each other until one side breaks up laughing. 
When an insufficient number of players precludes a regulation 43-Man Squamish match, a simplified version may be played: 2-Man Squamish. The rules are identical, except in 2-Man Squamish, the object is to lose. 
There is a brief reference to 43-Man Squamish as a Trivial Pursuit question in the "Weird Al" Yankovic video "White and Nerdy" (2006). 
In Endymion, by Dan Simmons, the narrator describes himself dodging pursuers "like a deep brooder on a forty-three man squamish team herding the goat in for the goal." 
For Mad issue #241 (Sept. 1983) Koch followed up with a similarly unplayable board game which he named Three Cornered Pitney. The four pages of rules featured illustrations by Jack Davis. 
Warren Easton Charter High School is a secondary school in New Orleans, Louisiana. The Warren Easton Charter Foundation governs the school, which is chartered by New Orleans Public Schools. 
The school was founded in 1843 as Boys High School. It was the first high school in the State of Louisiana and as a public school was formed to educate the working-class population of the city of New Orleans. By 1855 the school had expanded to four locations. After the Civil War in 1867, the four Boys High Schools were merged into Consolidated Boys High School.[citation needed] 
Prior to 2005, the school was directly under the authority of the Orleans Parish School Board. In 2005, as Hurricane Katrina was about to hit, the New Orleans Regional Transit Authority (RTA) designated Easton as a place where people could receive transportation to the Louisiana Superdome, a shelter of last resort. After Hurricane Katrina hit New Orleans, the school was closed for one year. 
In 2006, the school re-opened as a charter school and became Warren Easton Charter High School. n 2007, actress Sandra Bullock adopted the school. Bullock contributed thousands of dollars to the school and also helped to build an on-campus health clinic. 
In the 1930s the school hosted German language classes for adults. Chinese and Spanish are offered to students as a foreign language as of 2015. 
In May 2011 Little Roy collaborated with Prince Fatty and the Mutant Hi-Fi to record Sliver/Dive cover of Nirvana's early single. An album of Nirvana songs, Battle for Seattle, was released in September 2011 on Ark Recordings. 
World University was an accredited university based in Puerto Rico, which was in operation from 1965 to 1989. 
World University was a dynamic, innovative unmatched[original research?] institution of higher learning. One of its unique[original research?] courses, Dev. of World Cultures was unparalleled[original research?] introducing the students to a universe of knowledge in the fields of religion, music, philosophy, science, and technology. Dr. Lorraine Casby, Ph.D, Ed.D. was one of its leaders. 
This Caribbean-related university, college or other education institution article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Kentucky State Treasurer is elected every four years along with the governor and other statewide officials. The treasurer, who can serve two terms, acts as the state's chief elected fiscal officer. The salary is $110,000 a year.  
The current treasurer, Allison Ball of Prestonsburg, Kentucky, is the first Republican elected to the post since 1944. She succeeded the term-limited Democrat Todd Hollenbach of Louisville, who instead became the 30th District Court judge. 
A Manager was any of a set of specialized components of the classic Mac OS operating system, including those that comprised the Macintosh Toolbox. Each of these Managers was responsible for handling system calls from applications running on the Macintosh, and could be built into the ROM or be loaded into RAM by the system. 
Many of these Managers and their functions have been ported to or re-implemented in the Carbon application frameworks. Some of the Managers included in various versions of the Mac OS include: 
The 1993 Princeton Tigers football team was an American football team that represented Princeton University during the 1993 NCAA Division I-AA football season. Princeton finished third in the Ivy League. 
Though unranked in the preseason national rankings, Princeton's seven-game win streak to open the season saw it enter the weekly top 25 in mid-October, reaching as high as No. 16. After its season-ending loss to unranked Dartmouth, Princeton dropped out of the poll and ended the year unranked. 
Princeton played its home games at Palmer Stadium on the university campus in Princeton, New Jersey. 
In 1974, Mustaqi was selected for the first time as a representative in the People's Assembly as part of the eighth legislative term until  the 12th legislature in 1992. During mid-80's, he was appointed First Deputy Minister of Defence. During the 9th Congress of the Party in November 1986, he succeeded as candidate-member of the Politburo of the Party of Labour of Albania, and eventually rose in July 1990 as member of the Politburo, where he remained until June 1991. 
"The Good Ones" is the season premiere of the eighth season of the American television police sitcom series Brooklyn Nine-Nine, and the 144th overall episode of the series. The episode was written by executive producer David Phillips and co-producer Dewayne Perkins and directed by co-executive producer Cortney Carrillo. It aired on August 12, 2021, on NBC, airing back-to-back with the follow-up episode, "The Lake House". 
The episode received positive reviews from critics, who praised the show's take on the George Floyd protests, although some were still skeptical about its approach to the themes it raised. 
In June 2020, amidst the COVID-19 pandemic, Rosa (Stephanie Beatriz) announces that she is quitting the precinct and her career after the George Floyd protests. Jake's (Andy Samberg) reaction accidentally starts a chain of events in the precinct that culminates with a blackout. 
In July 2021, it was announced that the first episode of the season would be titled "The Good Ones" and that David Phillips and Dewayne Perkins would serve as writers, while Cortney Carrillo would direct. 
Brian Tallerico of Vulture gave the episode a 4 star rating out of 5 and wrote, "The season premiere of Brooklyn Nine-Nine needed to feel familiar to fans of the show while recognizing how the world has changed since it debuted nearly a decade ago. The writers pulled off that tricky dynamic; now let's see if they can maintain the balancing act for the entire final stretch or if this season will be one of the bad ones." 
Born in 1939 in Nassawadox, Virginia, Elmore attended the University of Richmond. He was a retired businessman who was the owner and chief executive officer of Shore Disposal, Inc., of Maryland's Eastern Shore, from 1965 to 1998. 
Delegate Elmore had been a member of House of Delegates since January 8, 2003. He served on the House Ways and Means Committee and its revenue subcommittee. He was also the 2005 chair of the Maryland Rural Caucus. 
After initially filing to run for reelection, Elmore withdrew from the race in late June 2010 while spending several days in the hospital receiving treatment for a cracked vertebra he suffered the previous winter. 
Thorkildsen was born on 19 July 1845 in Christianssand, Norway to parents Gunvald Christian Thorkildsen and Berte Thorkildsen.  He married Johanne Dich, the daughter of the parish priest Sigismund Christian Dich. 
Palestine: Peace Not Apartheid is a New York Times Best Seller book written by 39th President of the United States Jimmy Carter. It was published by Simon & Schuster in November 2006. 
The ultimate purpose of my book is to present facts about the Middle East that are largely unknown in America, to precipitate discussion and to help restart peace talks (now absent for six years) that can lead to permanent peace for Israel and its neighbors.  Another hope is that Jews and other Americans who share this same goal might be motivated to express their views, even publicly, and perhaps in concert. I would be glad to help with that effort.
 Some Israelis believe they have the right to confiscate and colonize Palestinian land and try to justify the sustained subjugation and persecution of increasingly hopeless and aggravated Palestinians; and 
  Some Palestinians react by honoring suicide bombers as martyrs to be rewarded in heaven and consider the killing of Israelis as victories.
To bring an end to what he calls "this continuing tragedy", in Chapter 17 ("Summary"), Carter calls for a revitalization of the peace process based on the following three "key requirements": 
a. The security of Israel must be guaranteed ...  b. The internal debate within Israel must be resolved in order to define Israel's permanent legal boundary ... 
c. The sovereignty of all Middle East nations and sanctity of international borders must be honored ...
"It's not Israel. The book has nothing to do with what's going on inside Israel which is a wonderful democracy, you know, where everyone has guaranteed equal rights and where, under the law, Arabs and Jews who are Israelis have the same privileges about Israel.  That's been most of the controversy because people assume it's about Israel. It's not.
"I've never alleged that the framework of apartheid existed within Israel at all, and that what does exist in the West Bank is based on trying to take Palestinian land and not on racism. So it was a very clear distinction."
In his op-ed "Reiterating the Keys to Peace", published in The Boston Globe on 20 December 2006, Carter summarizes "[s]ome major points in the book": 
Critics claim that Carter crossed the line into anti-Semitism. Abraham Foxman, the national director of the Anti-Defamation League, initially accused Carter of "engaging in anti-Semitism" in the book; Foxman told James Traub later that he would not call the former president himself an "anti-Semite" or a "bigot". Ethan Bronner also asserted that Carter's "overstatement" in the book "hardly adds up to anti-Semitism." 
Carter has responded to negative reviews in the mainstream news media in an op-ed published in the Los Angeles Times (which was excerpted in The Guardian and elsewhere): 
He also wrote a "Letter to Jewish Citizens of America" explaining "his use of the term 'apartheid' and sympathizing with Israelis who fear terrorism." 
On 26 December 2006, WCVB-TV (an ABC-TV affiliate), reported that "[a]bout 100 students, faculty and alumni of Brandeis University have signed an online petition to push the administration to bring former President Carter to campus to discuss his new book on Palestine, without being required to debate it." 
The Boston Globe reported that since it initially revealed "that Carter felt unwelcome on the Waltham campus, people have argued over whether he is unwilling to answer for his views, or whether Brandeis, which was founded by the American Jewish community, can't tolerate criticism of Israel. The latter is a view that some professors hope they can dispel by reviving the Carter visit." 
The speech, which occurred on 23 January 2007, was "closed to the public and limited to 'members of the university community only'"; nevertheless, Dershowitz said that he still planned to "attend and question Carter": "'I will be the first person to have my hand up to ask him a question,' he said. 'I guarantee that they won't stop me from attending.'" 
 On 18 January 2007 news outlets reported Brandeis's announcement that while Dershowitz could not attend Carter's speech, after it ended he would have the stage for a "rebuttal."
As a result of the visit, major donors told Brandeis University that they would no longer give it money in "retaliation", according to Stuart Eizenstat, chief domestic policy adviser and executive director of the White House Domestic Policy Staff during Carter's presidency and a current trustee of Brandeis, as quoted in The Jewish Week in mid-February 2007. 
On 22 February 2007 Carter participated in a "conversation" about Palestine Peace Not Apartheid with former Secretary of State Madeleine Albright at the Carter Center, moderated by Conflict Resolution Program Director Matthew Hodes. The event sold out in early January 2007. It was simultaneously webcast in the Carter Center's online "multi-media" section, and the Center's website now includes a direct link to the "archived webcast." 
In the 2008 Constituent Assembly election he was elected from the Panchthar-1 constituency, winning 12920 votes. 
In 1984, he was accepted as a member of Spanish prestigious national ballet company. He traveled the world with the Spanish National Ballet, performing in important venues such as the Metropolitan Opera House (Lincoln Center) of New York and the Kremlin Palace in Moscow. During his stint with the Spanish National Ballet, he also became a principal solo performer known for his phenomenal stamina and athleticism. 
The line was electrified in three stages, with the section between Bern and Wylerfeld being electrified in 1919. The SBB electrification of the line to Thun in 1927 meant that the line to Zollikofen was also electrified. The remainder to Biel was electrified before 1928. 
The bar-bellied pitta (Hydrornis elliotii) is a species of bird in the family Pittidae. It is found in Cambodia, Laos, Thailand, and Vietnam.  Its natural habitat is seasonal tropical forest. 
Mohamed Ouattara is an Ivorian professional footballer who plays as a defender for Sudanese club Al-Hilal Club. 
This biographical article related to football in Ivory Coast is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Born in Utica, New York, Beekman moved to Hawaii as a young man in the early 1930s and lived there the remainder of his life. Severe deafness, which began at the age of 16, and the Great Depression kept him from going to college as a young man. He became fluent in the Japanese language, enabling him to write about the Japanese experience from Japanese language sources not available in English. He also became a scholar in Japanese immigrant history.[citation needed] 
He was a reporter for the Honolulu Star-Bulletin and later wrote features and a weekly book review for more than 20 years at Pacific Citizen, a weekly newspaper directed to Americans of Japanese descent. Beekman championed the rights of Japanese Americans with articles and letters to the editor of Honolulu dailies, along with local political commentaries. 
Beekman married Take Okawa, a former Japanese-language schoolteacher educated in Tokyo and Hawaii, who collaborated with her husband on several Japanese immigrant stories. 
Several of the stories in Hawaiian Tales, published in 1972, dealt with pre-, post-, and wartime experiences of Japanese immigrants. 
Anthony Wilson (born 8 October 1947) is a Trinidadian vocalist, bass guitarist and songwriter, best known for his time with soul and funk band Hot Chocolate. He co-wrote the Hot Chocolate hits "Love Is Life", "Emma",  "Brother Louie" and "You Sexy Thing". 
Wilson was born in Trinidad, and was involved with music from the age of 16. He was a member of the group Soul Brothers, who released three singles. He was a founding member of Hot Chocolate in 1968, and left the band in 1976. Wilson is credited with persuading Hot Chocolate's lead singer Errol Brown to commit his songwriting ideas to paper. He shared lead vocal duties with Brown on Hot Chocolate's early hits. 
AH receptor-interacting protein (AIP) also known as aryl hydrocarbon receptor-interacting protein, immunophilin homolog ARA9, or HBV X-associated protein 2 (XAP-2) is a protein that in humans is encoded by the AIP gene. The protein is a member of the FKBP family. 
AIP may play a positive role in aryl hydrocarbon receptor-mediated signalling possibly by influencing its receptivity for ligand and/or its nuclear targeting. AIP is the cellular negative regulator of the hepatitis B virus (HBV) X protein. Further, it's been known to suppress antiviral signaling and the induction of type I interferon by targeting IRF7, a key player in the antiviral signal pathways. AIP consists of an N-terminal FKBP52 like domain and a C-terminal TPR domain.  
AIP mutations may be the cause of a familial form of acromegaly, familial isolated pituitary adenoma (FIPA). Somatotropinomas (i.e. GH-producing pituitary adenomas), sometimes associated with prolactinomas, are present in most AIP mutated patients. 
AIP has been shown to interact with the aryl hydrocarbon receptor, peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor alpha and the aryl hydrocarbon receptor nuclear translocator. Further, it has shown that AIP can interact with IRF7 to exert its novel function of negatively regulating antiviral signal pathways. 
Ackermann started his career as a rugby union player, appearing for Western Province and Transvaal. He also played in eight test matches for South Africa between 1955 and 1958. 
In 1962, Ackermann was one of a number of high profile South African players to switch to rugby league. He was selected by the RLSA to play in a three match series against Great Britain, who were returning from their 1962 tour of Australia and New Zealand. Ackermann played in all three games, scoring a try in the second game. 
In 1963, he was part of the team which toured Australia and New Zealand, captaining the side in the two games against Australia. Following the collapse of rugby league in South Africa after the tour, Ackermann was forced to retire due to the ban on rugby league players from participating in rugby union. 
F.W. Webb Company, founded in 1866, is a wholesale distributor of residential, commercial, industrial and institutional products with over 80 locations in nine states throughout the northeast. 
The company was founded in Boston in 1866 by John Stults as the city's second wholesale dealer in plumbing fixtures. Over the course of the next 140 years the company has shared a rich history of growth and innovation with the region it serves. Purchased in 1933 by Roger Pope, the company is now under the third generation of Pope family ownership. 
F.W. Webb Company offer products and services to commercial and residential contractors as well as industrial and institutional professionals.  Core markets include plumbing, heating, HVAC, commercial refrigeration, and PVF (pipe valves fittings). The company also offers building and process controls, propane gas equipment and parts, ductwork, water systems, commercial and industrial pumps, fire protection and fabrication, thermoplastic piping, and high purity (sanitary) process components. 
In addition to the wholesale trade, the company serves retail customers, contractors, and interior designers at approximately 40 Frank Webb's Bath Centers throughout the northeastern United States. These showrooms feature a range of products from different manufacturers, and include customer interaction displays configured before purchases are made, to provide immediate feedback to customers regarding design questions. 
Irvine Transportation Center (also referred to as Irvine Station) is a passenger rail and bus terminal in the Irvine Spectrum district of southeastern Irvine, California, United States. Located on the southwest end of the decommissioned Marine Corps Air Station El Toro, it is served by Amtrak California's Pacific Surfliner route, two Metrolink commuter rail lines, and multiple Orange County Transportation Authority (OC Bus) bus routes. 
The $13 million Irvine Transportation Center opened on June 1, 1990 when Irvine was officially added to the Amtrak timetable as a stop on the route of the San Diegan (later renamed the Pacific Surfliner). On 25 August 2008, a new four-story parking structure was opened to expand available parking at the station by 1,500 spots. 
FlyAway Bus coach service to Los Angeles International Airport was formerly provided from the station, but was discontinued due to low ridership. 
Nikolaos Savidis started is professional career with Ethnikos Katerini. In 2010, he was transferred to his hometown's club Panserraikos failing to make any appearances in the 2010-2011 season. In 2011, he was transferred to Pontioi Katerinis. After the club's merger with Iraklis Savidis was entered in the merged club's squad and he made his debut for Iraklis in an away draw against Doxa Kranoulas. 
The third son of Alexander Trotter of Dreghorn, near Edinburgh, he was born on 19 September 1802. He entered the Royal Naval College at Portsmouth in 1815. 
He married, in November 1835, Charlotte, second daughter of Major-General James Pringle of the East India Company's service. 
Asymptote Architecture is an American architecture practice, based in Long Island City, New York. Asymptote Architecture is known for multidisciplinary architectural designs that often incorporate digital technologies. 
Husband and wife team Hani Rashid and Lise Anne Couture co-founded Asymptote Architecture in 1989. The firm began with building designs in the United States, and subsequently expanded to international projects. 
One of their most famous early designs was their 1988 winning entry for the Los Angeles Westcoast Gateway Competition; an international jury of designers chose their submission, "Steel Cloud," out of more than 150, but when the monument received a poor reception from locals, it was not built due to lack of funding. In 1992, Asymptote was invited by The New York Times to design a hypothetical building for Times Square. 
The Missoni Baia is a residential development being developed by the OKO Group, located at 777 NE 26TH Terrace in Miami, Florida. 
Asymptote's first project built overseas was the 1997 Univers Theatre in Aarhus, Denmark. The project was awarded the Danish building of the year award by the Architects' Association of Denmark. 
In the early years of its practice, Asymptote has produced experimental art installations and exhibition design work involving multimedia technologies, such as the Virtual Museum (2000) at the Solomon R. Guggenheim Museum in New York City, DOCUMENTA XI in Kassel, Germany, the Schirn Kunsthalle Frankfurt and the Ministry of Public Works in Madrid, Spain. 
In 2003, Asymptote held its first extensive solo exhibition, a survey of its work at the Netherlands Architecture Institute (NAI). 
Favale was born in Irsina, Italy and was ordained to the priesthood in 1962. He served as bishop of the Roman Catholic Diocese of Vallo della Lucania, Italy, from 1989 to 2011. 
This article about an Italian Catholic bishop or archbishop is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Internet Stream Protocol (ST) is a family of experimental protocols first defined in Internet Experiment Note IEN-119 in 1979, and later substantially revised in RFC 1190 (ST-II) and RFC 1819 (ST2+). The protocol uses the version number 5 in the version field of the Internet Protocol header, but was never known as IPv5. The successor to IPv4 was thus named IPv6 to eliminate any possible confusion about the actual protocol in use. 
The Internet Stream Protocol family was never introduced for public use, but many of the concepts available in ST are similar to later asynchronous transfer mode protocols and can be found in Multiprotocol Label Switching (MPLS). They also presaged voice over IP. 
ST arose as the transport protocol of the Network Voice Protocol, a pioneering computer network protocol for transporting human speech over packetized communications networks, first implemented in December 1973 by Internet researcher Danny Cohen of the Information Sciences Institute (ISI) as part of ARPA's Network Secure Communications (NSC) project. 
Its second version, known variously as ST-II or ST2, was drafted by Claudio Topolcic and others in 1987 and specified in 1990. It was implemented in the Terrestrial Wideband Network and its successor, the Defense Simulation Internet, where it was used extensively for distributed simulations and videoconferencing. This version later formed the core technology for transporting voice calls and other realtime streams within Canada's Iris Digital Communications System.  
The final version of ST2, which was also known as ST2+, was drafted by the IETF ST2 Working group and published in 1995 as RFC 1819. ST2 distinguishes its own packets with an Internet Protocol version number 5, although it was never known as IPv5. 
ST uses the same IP address structure and the same link layer protocol number (ethertype 0x800) as IP. 
Biketown (stylized as BIKETOWN), also known as Biketown PDX, is a bicycle-sharing system in Portland, Oregon, that began operation on July 19, 2016. The system is owned by Portland Bureau of Transportation (PBOT) and operated by Lyft, with Nike, Inc. as the title sponsor. At launch, the system had 100 stations and 1,000 bicycles serving the city's central and eastside neighborhoods, with hopes to expand outward. 
Planning for a modern bicycle-sharing system for Portland began in 2009, under the direction of PBOT. Beginning in 1994, a group of Portlanders experimented with a free community bike sharing system called the "Yellow Bike Project"; the program, inspired by a similar scheme in Amsterdam and operated by the Community Cycling Center, was declared a failure three years later after many of the bikes were subject to vandalism, theft and disrepair. 
In December 2011, Metro approved the allocation of a $2 million federal grant to PBOT for the development of a bike share system. Alta Bike Share, a national operator of similar systems headquartered in Portland, was contracted in September 2012 to be the system's operator. The $4 million cost of the system and inability to secure a corporate sponsor led to several delays in the planned launch. 
In March 2014, selected supplier Bixi declared bankruptcy, forcing another delay in the system's launch to 2015. Planned operator Alta Bike Share would later be sold to Motivate in October. 
In September 2015, the Portland City Council approved a new contract with Motivate to move forward on the bikeshare program. Motivate went on to place a $1.5 million order placed with Social Bicycles to manufacture and deliver "smart" bicycles that include on-board computers and other technologies. 
In January 2016, Portland-area based Nike signed a $10 million, five-year deal to be the program's sponsor, naming it "Biketown". On June 13, 2016, officials announced various details for the program, including a launch date of July 19. More than 1,000 Portlanders signed up for the first batch of annual memberships by launch day, and almost 2,500 during the first month of the service. 
The service launched on July 19, 2016, during a ceremony in which 150 riders took an inaugural ride across the Tilikum Crossing bridge. During the service's first month, almost 59,000 rides were taken. Holders of annual memberships  accounted for 36 percent of rides taken during that period. 
The placement of Biketown stations that replaced public street parking sparked some controversy over a "lack of outreach" by PBOT. 
Biketown operates with three payment options for riders. A single-ride fare of $2.50 includes 30 minutes of riding. A day pass ($12) includes 180 minutes of riding and the ability to rent up to 4 bicycles at a time (at a cost of $6 each). An annual membership of $12 per month includes unlimited rides within a 90-minute daily limit, as well as the 4-bicycle maximum available to day-pass users. 
Riders making extended trips over their allotted time limit are charged 10 cents per additional minute. A fee of $2 is charged for locking a bicycle at a public rack within the system area; a fee of $20 is charged for the doing the same outside of the system area. A $1 account credit is awarded for bringing a bicycle from a public rack to a designated station. 
The city's contract with operator Motivate includes provisions to introduce a discount to 500 low-income residents of $35 per year. 
In June 2016, PBOT announced plans to add "adaptive bikes", such as handcycles and tricycles, that can be rented for people with disabilities. They will be branded as Biketown but will be organized through local adaptive bike shops, rather than at the standard street kiosks. 
The original fleet of Biketown bicycles were retired in September 2020 after their replacement e-bicycles entered service. The remaining 750 bicycles were donated to a bikeshare operator in Hamilton, Ontario, Canada. 
In front of the rampart is a ditch, about five metres wide and up to one and a half metres deep. The internal height of the rampart is up to two metres. The gateway lies in the northwest, the rampart bends inwards at this point, in a pincer shape, and the northern flank has been pushed out in the shape of a nose or salient. 
A moat, roughly 50 metres long, in the interior of the castle is thought to be from an earlier fortification on the same site. This internal ditch is now only about half a metre deep, three metres wide and runs from north to south. 
The circular rampart was archaeologically investigated in 1964 and a survey by Eugen Ixmeier of the Bavarian State Office for Protected Monuments followed in 1970. Topographic photographs were published in 1979 (see literature). 
In spring 2007, the eastern part of the archaeological site was damaged by a windthrow and the subsequent cleanup operation. This resulted in the loss of part of the exposed wall sections. 
The Bavarian State Office for Protected Monuments has designated the site as a ringwork of the Early Middle Ages and allocated it the index monument number D 6-5830-0007. 
The sandstones on which the castle stands form the summit area of the hill and are slipping downhill to some extent on the underlying clay and clay marl rocks of the Feuerletten. Extensive redevelopment measures have been carried out to try and prevent further deterioration of the ruins. The rocks have been designated by the Bavarian State Office for the Environment as geotope number 674A010. Because the geotope is part of the Hassberge Castle Trail, information boards have been erected here. 
Appias ada, the rare albatross, is a butterfly of the  family Pieridae. It is found on the Moluccas, New Guinea, Indonesia, Australia and the Solomon Islands. 
Occurrence records show the habitat of A. ada to range from open woody trees to sparse grasses. Of the various species, only A. a. caria is apparent in Australia, to which it is endemic. The larva rests on the midrib of a leaf, spinning a slik pad on which it sits. Adults often fly rapidly along watercourses, and have been recorded all months excluding March. The mitochondrial genome for A. ada has been sequenced. 
In calculus, the extreme value theorem states that if a real-valued function     f   {\displaystyle f}   is continuous on the closed interval     [ a , b ]   {\displaystyle [a,b]}  , then     f   {\displaystyle f}   must attain a maximum and a minimum, each at least once. That is, there exist numbers     c   {\displaystyle c}   and     d   {\displaystyle d}   in     [ a , b ]   {\displaystyle [a,b]}   such that: 
The extreme value theorem is more specific than the related  boundedness theorem, which states merely that a continuous function     f   {\displaystyle f}   on the closed interval     [ a , b ]   {\displaystyle [a,b]}   is bounded on that interval; that is, there exist real numbers     m   {\displaystyle m}   and     M   {\displaystyle M}   such that: 
This does not say that     M   {\displaystyle M}   and     m   {\displaystyle m}   are necessarily the maximum and minimum values of     f   {\displaystyle f}   on the interval     [ a , b ] ,   {\displaystyle [a,b],}   which is what the extreme value theorem stipulates must also be the case. 
The extreme value theorem is used to prove Rolle's theorem.  In a formulation due to Karl Weierstrass, this theorem states that a continuous function from a non-empty compact space to a subset of the real numbers attains a maximum and a minimum. 
The following examples show why the function domain must be closed and bounded in order for the theorem to apply.  Each fails to attain a maximum on the given interval. 
Defining     f ( 0 ) = 0   {\displaystyle f(0)=0}   in the last two examples shows that both theorems require continuity on     [ a , b ]   {\displaystyle [a,b]}  . 
In particular, if     W =  R    {\displaystyle W=\mathbb {R} }  , then this theorem implies that     f ( K )   {\displaystyle f(K)}   is closed and bounded for any compact set     K   {\displaystyle K}  , which in turn implies that     f   {\displaystyle f}   attains its supremum and infimum on any (nonempty) compact set     K   {\displaystyle K}  .  Thus, we have the following generalization of the extreme value theorem: 
Slightly more generally, this is also true for an upper semicontinuous function. (see compact space#Functions and compact spaces). 
We first prove the boundedness theorem, which is a step in the proof of the extreme value theorem. The basic steps involved in the proof of the extreme value theorem are: 
So far, we know that     B   {\displaystyle B}   is an interval of non-zero length, closed at its left end by     a   {\displaystyle a}  . 
A real-valued function is upper as well as lower semi-continuous, if and only if it is continuous in the usual sense. Hence these two theorems imply the boundedness theorem and the extreme value theorem. 
Samm-Art Williams (born Samuel Arthur Williams; January 20, 1946) is an American playwright and screenwriter, and a stage and film/TV actor and television producer. Much of his work concerns the African-American experience. 
He was nominated for a Tony Award and a Drama Desk Award for his play Home (1979), which moved from the Negro Ensemble Company to a Broadway production in 1980. In the mid-1980s, he received two Emmy nominations for his work for TV series.  The Black Rep of St. Louis, Missouri produced the premier of his play The Montford Point Marine (2011). 
Samm-Art Williams was born in 1946 in Burgaw, North Carolina, the son of Samuel and Valdosia Williams. His mother was a school teacher, and Williams attended segregated public schools through high school. 
As Samm Williams, he entered New York City theater as an actor in 1973, performing in the play Black Jesus. With New York's Negro Ensemble Company (NEC), Williams appeared in such plays as Nowhere to Run, Nowhere to Hide (St. Mark's Playhouse, 1974) and Liberty Calland (St. Mark's Playhouse, 1975), before taking on the name Samm-Art Williams for Argus and Klansman and Waiting for Mongo (St. Mark's Playhouse, 1975). 
Williams, a 6' 8" lefty, was once a sparring partner of boxer Muhammad Ali. Samm was recruited to work with Ali, who was afraid of lefties.[citation needed] 
He made his screen debut playing "Roger" in the Richard Price novel adaptation The Wanderers (1979), and played a subway police officer in director Brian De Palma's Dressed to Kill (1980). An earlier film, the independent blaxploitation feature The Baron, a.k.a. Baron Wolfgang von Tripps and Black Cue, made circa 1977, was released direct-to-video by Paragon Video in 1996. 
As Samm Williams, he wrote the play Welcome to Black River, produced by the Negro Ensemble Company (NEC) at St. Mark's Playhouse in 1975; and as Samm-Art Williams, The Coming and Do Unto Others, both at the Billie Holiday Theatre in Brooklyn in 1976; A Love Play produced by the NEC that same year; The Last Caravan (1977); and Brass Birds Don't Sing, at New York City's Stage 73 in 1978. 
Williams participated in the NEC Playwrights Workshop, under the guidance of playwright-in-residence Steve Carter, who strongly influenced his work. About Carter, Williams has said "that no single individual has influenced my writing to the degree that Steve Carter has." 
Williams went on to play Matthew Henson in the historical drama TV movie Cook and Peary: The Race to the Pole (CBS, 1983). He starred in the PBS American Playhouse dramas Denmark Vesey (1985; title role) and The Adventures of Huckleberry Finn (as Jim; 1986).  In the mid-1980s he appeared in television series including The New Mike Hammer, 227, and Frank's Place, a CBS dramedy for which he also served as a story editor. His film work during this time included a role in Blood Simple (1984). 
Williams wrote the PBS productions Kneeslappers (1980) and Experiment in Freedom (American Playhouse, 1985); episodes for the series Cagney and Lacey, The New Mike Hammer, Miami Vice, and  The Fresh Prince of Bel Air; the "John Henry" episode of the Showtime cable network series Shelley Duvall's Tall Tales and Legends; and the NBC special Motown Returns to the Apollo (1986), among other work.  He wrote a CBS series pilot titled Lenny's Neighborhood. 
Williams wrote and directed the comedy The Dance on Widows' Row, produced by the New Federal Theatre at Manhattan's Harry De Jur Playhouse at Henry Street Settlement from June 25 - July 30, 2000. 
In 2006, Williams held auditions for his play The Waiting Room, to be performed that spring at the Raleigh Little Theatre's Gaddy-Goodwin Teaching Theatre in Raleigh, North Carolina. 
In 2011, The Black Rep of Saint Louis, Missouri produced the world premier of his play The Montford Point Marine, starring J. Samuel Davis.  Montford Point was where the first black Marines trained. 
Williams is Artist-in-Residence at North Carolina Central University, where he teaches classes on equity theater and the art of playwriting. His producing for television also includes story-editing and script-writing for the CBS television series Frank's Place in 1987-88, ABC-TV's Hangin' with Mr. Cooper, NBC-TV's The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air, the short-lived UPN sitcom series Good News and the Fox TV sitcom series Martin. 
The village is administrated by a Sarpanch, who is an elected representative of the village as per the constitution of India. Current position is held by Gurpreet singh 
This article related to a location in Jalandhar district, Punjab, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He was born in Albany, New York, in 1670. He was Sheriff of Ulster County, New York in 1709. He served as a Major in the Ulster County Regiment. 
Shares in the patent changed hands frequently, and the terms under which the land was sold or leased were so varied and complex that it impeded settlement of the district and clouded the title to most of its tracts until well after the American Revolution. 
KAUJ (100.9 FM, "MyFM 100.9") is a radio station licensed to serve Grafton, North Dakota.  The station is owned by Simmons Broadcasting Inc. 
In July 2001, KXPO-FM swapped formats and call letters with KAUJ (106.7 FM in Walhalla, North Dakota, now KYTZ). The station was assigned the KAUJ call letters by the Federal Communications Commission on July 2, 2001. KAUJ aired an Oldies format featuring satellite-fed programming from Scott Shannon's The True Oldies Channel from ABC Radio before flipping to Classic Rock in 2014 
Sometime in 2021 KAUJ dropped its "Rock Farm" classic rock format (which moved to KYTZ 106.7 Walhalla) and rebranded as "MyFM 100.9" with an unknown format. 
This article about a radio station in North Dakota is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a historic property or district in Madison County, New York, that is listed on the National Register of Historic Places, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Frishberg was educated at Abingdon School from 1985 until 1990 where he was a keen rugby and tennis player. He then studied at Balliol College, Oxford. 
Frishberg was part of the Great Britain team at the 2004 Paralympics in Athens, and at the 2008 Paralympics in Beijing. The team came in fourth place both times just failing to secure a bronze medal on both occasions after losing out to the United States and Canada respectively. 
He was appointed Assistant Coach to the British wheelchair rugby team in 2013, a position he held until the start of 2017. 
This biographical article relating to a United Kingdom sportsperson is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to wheelchair rugby is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
During the early 20th century, the south end saw newcomers from eastern Europe aside from German immigrants, resulting in brother neighborhoods such as the Hungarian Village. 
The local schools the German immigrants constructed and managed were so superior that English-speaking residents of Columbus chose to attend them, such as one that once stood at Fulton Street east of S. Fourth Street. 
Further decline occurred later due to the closing of the local breweries during Prohibition. After the war, the south end was zoned for manufacturing, leading to the erosion of the area's residential feel. In World War II, the streetcar tracks and wrought-iron fences were confiscated for the war effort. By the 1950s, the area had become a slum and the city decided to demolish one-third of the neighborhood. 
With the Village nearing complete destruction, Frank Fetch defied the common wisdom and purchased a house on S. Wall Street, determined to rebuild the neighborhood. Fetch would create the German Village Society. In June 1960, the society hosted the first Haus und Garten Tour, which attracted visitors and the local media to eight restored homes and two gardens. Today, the tour is one of the city's most popular events. Frank Fetch Park was named after him. 
The area is mostly a residential neighborhood of sturdy, red-brick homes with wrought iron fences along tree-lined, brick-paved streets. 
The German Village Guest House has been recognized as one of the best in the Midwest by the New York Post, The Plain Dealer, and the St. Louis Post Dispatch, and positively reviewed by the Washington Post and The Tennessean. It was rated as the "Best Columbus Hotel 2010" by City Search. 
Although German Village is an eclectic community, the area is known as a Columbus "gayborhood." While there are no gay establishments within German Village, the neighboring Brewery District and Merion Village have several. 
German Village is bound by Pearl Street on the west; East Livingston Avenue on the north; Lathrop Street, Brust Street, Grant Avenue, Jaeger Street, and Blackberry Alley on the east; and Nursery Lane on the south (Columbus City Planning Commission, Annual Report 1964). 
German Village was the home of the first restaurant in the Max & Erma's chain. In 1972, the restaurant was opened by Barry Zacks. The name was adopted from the original tavern, started in 1958 by Max and Erma Visocnik, which the new owners converted into the popular theme restaurant. The location closed in 2017 due to financial difficulties. 
The neighborhood is home to one of the world's largest producers of stained glass, the Franklin Art Glass Studios Inc., as well as several art galleries including the Archive Gallery, Hawk Galleries, Keny Gallery, and Kight Studio 551. Shops catering to European-imported retail include Caterina Ltd. 
A prosperous industry for the German immigrants was the brewing industry. Today, the Brewery District, part of the greater German Village neighborhood, still partially resembles its notable past. During the 19th century, the area was found largely along both sides of S. Front Street from Livingston Avenue to Sycamore Street. 
Dr. Hoster became a charter member of the Hodgkin's Disease Research Foundation in New York City, serving as the original President between 1947 and 1951. The first headquarters of the foundation was established at St. Vincent's Hospital and included as board members Dr. Robert Chambers of New York University, Dr. Antonio Rottino, vice president of St. Vincent's Hospital, Dr. Harry Rolnick of Philadelphia, and John Finn, vice president of Fordham University. 
In 2006, local media personality Andrea Cambern, in collaboration with the German Village Society and WBNS, narrated a 10-minute documentary short on the neighborhood, which won an Ohio Historic Preservation Office Award. 
In 1890, the Ohio State Buckeyes football team played their first-ever home game in the south end, at a location just west of present-day Schiller Park between Jaeger, Ebner, and Whittier (then called Schiller) Streets. 
Jaya Seal Ghosh  the renowned actress and dancer started learning Bharatanatyam from a very early age under Guru Indira P. P. Bora for five years. Simultaneously she was also acting in Assamese television and did plays with noted Assamese theatre personalities from NSD like Dulal Roy and Baharul Islam who inspired her. To pursue this interest she went to the National School of Drama in New Delhi where she subsequently completed her three-year course in 1997. 
She received the Best Actress Award at the Assam Prag Cine Awards for the Assamese film Shrinkhol 2014. 
Throughout this phase, she also continued her primary passion - dance. While in Mumbai she trained under Guru Vaibhav Arekar and Guru Rajeshri Shirke at Lasya academy. Later she trained under Guru Naresh Pillai also in Mumbai. 
Inman Park is an intown neighborhood on the east side of Atlanta, Georgia, and its first planned suburb. It was named for Samuel M. Inman. 
Like new developments throughout the United States at the time, but in stark contrast to the attitudes prevalent in the neighborhood today, Inman Park was conceived of and promoted as a segregated community. 
Moreland Park was by contrast developed as a more traditional, incremental building of sub-divisions as opposed to the grand plan for Inman Park proper. 
The arrival of the automobile allowed upper class Atlantans to live in suburbs farther north from downtown workplaces, such as Morningside and what is now considered Buckhead. Inman Park became less fashionable and the exuberant Victorian architecture came to seem dated. The mansions came to be subdivided into apartments. 
Similar to other intown neighborhoods such as Virginia Highland, Inman Park fell to blight during the white middle and upper class exodus to the northern suburbs in the 1950s and 1960s, and was: 
an economically depressed neighborhood of mostly blue-collar white folks, elderly couples who could not afford to move out and families on disability and welfare. They lived in rented bungalows or big houses chopped up into tiny roach-infested apartments. 
During this same period, there was an intense fight against the I-485 freeway which was to be built through the neighborhood, although many properties in Inman Park, as well as the entire neighboring neighborhood of Copenhill, were torn down in preparation for freeway construction. 
Little Five Points district is located where Inman Park and Candler Park meet at Moreland Avenue and Euclid/McClendon. 
Inman Park contains Atlanta's best collection of residential architecture from the late 19th and early 20th centuries. Styles include Queen Anne, high-style Italianate and Romanesque mansion as well as smaller bungalows, shotguns, and foursquares. Inman Park was Atlanta's first example of a garden suburb, with great attention paid to street layout, parks and other public space, and would inspire other Atlanta garden suburbs such as the Frederick Law Olmsted-designed Druid Hills. 
There are two historic districts within the Inman Park neighborhoods: the Inman Park historic district, and the Inman Park-Moreland Historic District, originally the separate suburb of Moreland Park. 
Parks in Inman Park include Springvale Park, a pet project of Joel Hurt and designed by the Olmsted Brothers. Part of Freedom Park lies in the neighborhood, which the BeltLine trail also borders. There are also smaller parks: Delta Park, Inman Park, the park in Inman Park Village, and the Bass Recreation Center. 
MARTA runs bus service and rail service. The Inman Park / Reynoldstown MARTA station is located at the south end of the neighborhood. 
The building was initially constructed in 1582 by Queen Anna I of Poland as one of the gates in the city walls of Warsaw. Unlike other gates, it was built to prevent fire from spreading from the densely built-up Old Town to the newly built wooden bridge that crossed the river. The gate gained the name Brama Mostowa (Bridge Gate). Although the bridge was destroyed by a flood in 1603, and subsequent bridges were built to the south, the name stuck. 
Following the November Uprising and the Russian decision to erect the Warsaw Citadel, in 1833 the prison had been liquidated and the building was refurbished to become a private house. After the World War II parts of the building were rebuilt in their 18th century form. 
David Lawrence Westin is anchor of Bloomberg: Balance of Power and Bloomberg Big Decisions on Bloomberg Television. Previously, he was an anchor on Bloomberg Daybreak Americas and Bloomberg GO which Daybreak replaced. He has anchored for Bloomberg since 2015. From 2014 to 2015, he was principal of Witherbee Holdings, LLC, advising and investing in media companies. He was the president and CEO of NewsRight from 2011 to 2012.  
Westin has written the book Exit Interview, about his experiences as president of ABC News. It was released in May 2012. 
The younger daughter of Francis "Frank" Marion Dee and his wife, the former Henriette Putnam, Frances Marion Dee was born in Los Angeles, California, where her father was working as a civil-service examiner. 
When Dee was seven years old, her family moved to Chicago, Illinois. She attended Shakespeare Grammar School and Hyde Park High School, where she went by the nickname of Frankie Dee. 
After graduating from Hyde Park High in 1927, of which she was vice president of her senior class, as well as voted Belle of the Year, she spent two years at the University of Chicago, where she participated in dramatic activities, then returned to California. 
Following her sophomore year in 1929, she went on summer vacation with her mother and older sister to visit family in the Los Angeles area. She began working as a movie extra as a lark. Her big break came when, still an extra, she was offered the lead opposite Maurice Chevalier in Playboy of Paris. 
The audience appeal established in two films opposite Paramount stars Charles "Buddy" Rogers and Richard Arlen led to the co-starring role as Sondra Finchley, opposite Phillips Holmes and Sylvia Sidney, in Paramount Pictures's prestigious and controversial production of An American Tragedy, directed by Josef von Sternberg. 
Dee's additional screen credits included June Moon, Little Women, Of Human Bondage, Becky Sharp, and Payment on Demand. She co-starred with her husband Joel McCrea in the Western Four Faces West (1948). 
Dee was honored at the 1998 Memphis Film Festival in Mississippi. In 2004, Frances Dee McCrea died in Norwalk, Connecticut due to complications from a stroke at the age of 94. 
The bike was returned to the factory from the Isle of Man where it was used as a runabout and test bed.  Its original hand gear change was replaced with a foot change not long after, and this is still fitted to the bike.  Spring-heeled  Jack remained a regular at the factory as it was apparently owned by Charles Udall of the Velocette Development Department until it was purchased and used for daily transport, despite still not having a kick start, by Fred Teague. 
After this brief return to racing, involving a couple of unplanned excursions that left the bike with a few scratches, 'Spring Heeled Jack' was retired from the track and refurbished. Returned to how it had been when it was bought and used by Mr. Teague.  
Around 1030, he married the important Gascon lady Adalais (sister of the future duke of Gascony and the viscount of Lomagne), with whom he had three children: 
There are also bodyshirts, like the counterpart to the bodysuit, they are loose-fitting garments that cover the whole torso, with sleeves in short to long lengths and crotch snaps. The difference is that they look like a shirt on the top portion of the garment, and may have a different stretch fabric in the waist to the crotch area to make them fit better. 
The bodysuit was a progression from the leotard. It was presented in the United States after 1950 by fashion designer Claire McCardell. It was worn as a blouse or T-shirt. The first recognized bodysuit was worn by Bettie Page in the 1950s, and was a trademark attire of the Playboy Bunnies from the 1960s, as well as Wonder Woman in the animated series Super Friends and Lynda Carter's television series. 
Azzedine Alaia and Donna Karan helped make the bodysuit a fashion item for both men and women in the 1980s. After a slowdown, it was resurrected as shaping underwear or lingerie, and in the 2010s it reappeared as a blouse bodysuit and classic turtleneck bodysuit, as well as a part of evening wear. 
Orchids are easily distinguished from other plants, as they share some very evident derived characteristics or synapomorphies. Among these are: bilateral symmetry of the flower (zygomorphism), many resupinate flowers, a nearly always highly modified petal (labellum), fused stamens and carpels, and extremely small seeds. 
All orchids are perennial herbs that lack any permanent woody structure. They can grow according to two patterns: 
Terrestrial orchids may be rhizomatous or form corms or tubers. The root caps of terrestrial orchids are smooth and white. 
Some sympodial terrestrial orchids, such as Orchis and Ophrys, have two subterranean tuberous roots. One is used as a food reserve for wintry periods, and provides for the development of the other one, from which visible growth develops. 
Epiphytic orchids, those that grow upon a support, have modified aerial roots that can sometimes be a few meters long. In the older parts of the roots, a modified spongy epidermis, called a velamen, has the function of absorbing humidity. It is made of dead cells and can have a silvery-grey, white or brown appearance. In some orchids, the velamen includes spongy and fibrous bodies near the passage cells, called tilosomes. 
The cells of the root epidermis grow at a right angle to the axis of the root to allow them to get a firm grasp on their support. Nutrients for epiphytic orchids mainly come from mineral dust, organic detritus, animal droppings and other substances collecting among on their supporting surfaces. 
The base of the stem of sympodial epiphytes, or in some species essentially the entire stem, may be thickened to form a pseudobulb that contains nutrients and water for drier periods. 
With ageing the pseudobulb sheds its leaves and becomes dormant. At this stage it is often called a backbulb. Backbulbs still hold nutrition for the plant, but then a pseudobulb usually takes over, exploiting the last reserves accumulated in the backbulb, which eventually dies off, too. A pseudobulb typically lives for about five years. Orchids without noticeable pseudobulbs are also said to have growths, an individual component of a sympodial plant. 
The structure of the leaves corresponds to the specific habitat of the plant. Species that typically bask in sunlight, or grow on sites which can be occasionally very dry, have thick, leathery leaves and the laminae are covered by a waxy cuticle to retain their necessary water supply. Shade-loving species, on the other hand, have long, thin leaves. 
The leaves of most orchids are perennial, that is, they live for several years, while others, especially those with plicate leaves as in Catasetum, shed them annually and develop new leaves together with new pseudobulbs. 
Some orchids, such as Dendrophylax lindenii (ghost orchid), Aphyllorchis and Taeniophyllum depend on their green roots for photosynthesis and lack normally developed leaves, as do all of the heterotrophic species. 
Orchids of the genus Corallorhiza (coralroot orchids) lack leaves altogether and instead wrap their roots around the roots of mature trees and use specialized fungi to harvest sugars. 
Some orchids have single flowers, but most have a racemose inflorescence, sometimes with a large number of flowers. The flowering stem can be basal, that is, produced from the base of the tuber, like in Cymbidium, apical, meaning it grows from the apex of the main stem, like in Cattleya, or axillary, from the leaf axil, as in Vanda. 
As an apomorphy of the clade, orchid flowers are primitively zygomorphic (bilaterally symmetrical), although in some genera, such as Mormodes, Ludisia, and Macodes, this kind of symmetry may be difficult to notice. 
The orchid flower, like most flowers of monocots, has two whorls of sterile elements. The outer whorl has three sepals and the inner whorl has three petals. The sepals are usually very similar to the petals (thus called tepals, 1), but may be completely distinct. 
The normal form of the sepals can be found in Cattleya, where they form a triangle. In Paphiopedilum (Venus slippers), the lower two sepals are fused into a synsepal, while the lip has taken the form of a slipper. In Masdevallia, all the sepals are fused. 
Orchid flowers with abnormal numbers of petals or lips are called peloric. Peloria is a genetic trait, but its expression is environmentally influenced and may appear random. 
Pollen is released as single grains, like in most other plants, in the Apostasioideae, Cypripedioideae, and Vanilloideae. In the other subfamilies, which comprise the great majority of orchids, the anther (3) carries two pollinia. 
A pollinium is a waxy mass of pollen grains held together by the glue-like alkaloid viscin, containing both cellulosic strands and mucopolysaccharides. Each pollinium is connected to a filament which can take the form of a caudicle, as in Dactylorhiza or Habenaria, or a stipe, as in Vanda. Caudicles or stipes hold the pollinia to the viscidium, a sticky pad which sticks the pollinia to the body of pollinators. 
At the upper edge of the stigma of single-anthered orchids, in front of the anther cap, is the rostellum (5), a slender extension involved in the complex pollination mechanism. 
As mentioned, the ovary is always inferior (located behind the flower). It is three-carpelate and one or, more rarely, three-partitioned, with parietal placentation (axile in the Apostasioideae). 
Some orchids mainly or totally rely on self-pollination, especially in colder regions where pollinators are particularly rare. The caudicles may dry up if the flower has not been visited by any pollinator, and the pollinia then fall directly on the stigma. Otherwise, the anther may rotate and then enter the stigma cavity of the flower (as in Holcoglossum amesianum). 
The slipper orchid Paphiopedilum parishii reproduces by self-fertilization. This occurs when the anther changes from a solid to a liquid state and directly contacts the stigma surface without the aid of any pollinating agent or floral assembly. 
The labellum of the Cypripedioideae is poke bonnet-shaped, and has the function of trapping visiting insects. The only exit leads to the anthers that deposit pollen on the visitor. 
In some extremely specialized orchids, such as the Eurasian genus Ophrys, the labellum is adapted to have a colour, shape, and odour which attracts male insects via mimicry of a receptive female. Pollination happens as the insect attempts to mate with flowers. 
A rare achlorophyllous saprophytic orchid growing entirely underground in Australia, Rhizanthella slateri, is never exposed to light, and depends on ants and other terrestrial insects to pollinate it. 
Catasetum, a genus discussed briefly by Darwin, actually launches its viscid pollinia with explosive force when an insect touches a seta, knocking the pollinator off the flower. 
After pollination, the sepals and petals fade and wilt, but they usually remain attached to the ovary. 
Some species, such as in the genera Phalaenopsis, Dendrobium, and Vanda, produce offshoots or plantlets formed from one of the nodes along the stem, through the accumulation of growth hormones at that point. These shoots are known as keiki. 
The ovary typically develops into a capsule that is dehiscent by three or six longitudinal slits, while remaining closed at both ends. 
As the chance for a seed to meet a suitable fungus is very small, only a minute fraction of all the seeds released grow into adult plants. In cultivation, germination typically takes weeks. 
The taxonomy of this family is in constant flux, as new studies continue to clarify the relationships between species and groups of species, allowing more taxa at several ranks to be recognized. The Orchidaceae is currently placed in the order Asparagales by the APG III system of 2009. 
Five subfamilies are recognised. The cladogram below was made according to the APG system of 1998. It represents the view that most botanists had held up to that time. It was supported by morphological studies, but never received strong support in molecular phylogenetic studies. 
Cypripedioideae: 5 genera and 130 species, from the temperate regions of the world, as well as tropical America and tropical Asia 
Vanilloideae: 15 genera and 180 species, humid tropical and subtropical regions, eastern North America 
In 2015, a phylogenetic study showed strong statistical support for the following topology of the orchid tree, using 9 kb of plastid and nuclear DNA from 7 genes, a topology that was confirmed by a phylogenomic study in the same year. 
There are around 800 genera of orchids. The following are amongst the most notable genera of the orchid family:[citation needed] 
In Middle English, the name bollockwort was used for some orchids, based on "bollock" meaning testicle and "wort" meaning plant. 
Cultivated hybrids in the orchid family are also special in that they are named by using grex nomenclature, rather than nothospecies.  For instance, hybrids between Brassavola nodosa and Brassavola acaulis are placed in the grex Brassavola Guiseppi. The name of the grex ("Guiseppi" in this example) is written in a non-italic font without quotes. 
A majority of orchids are perennial epiphytes, which grow anchored to trees or shrubs in the tropics and subtropics. Species such as Angraecum sororium are lithophytes, growing on rocks or very rocky soil. Other orchids (including the majority of temperate Orchidaceae) are terrestrial and can be found in habitat areas such as grasslands or forest. 
The scent of orchids is frequently analysed by perfumers (using headspace technology and gas-liquid chromatography/mass spectrometry) to identify potential fragrance chemicals. 
The other important use of orchids is their cultivation for the enjoyment of the flowers. Most cultivated orchids are tropical or subtropical, but quite a few that grow in colder climates can be found on the market. Temperate species available at nurseries include Ophrys apifera (bee orchid), Gymnadenia conopsea (fragrant orchid), Anacamptis pyramidalis (pyramidal orchid) and Dactylorhiza fuchsii (common spotted orchid). 
Orchids of all types have also often been sought by collectors of both species and hybrids. Many hundreds of societies and clubs worldwide have been established. These can be small, local clubs, or larger, national organisations such as the American Orchid Society. Both serve to encourage cultivation and collection of orchids, but some go further by concentrating on conservation or research. 
New orchids are registered with the International Orchid Register, maintained by the Royal Horticultural Society. 
The dried seed pods of one orchid genus, Vanilla (especially Vanilla planifolia), are commercially important as a flavouring in baking, for perfume manufacture and aromatherapy. 
Orchids native to the Mediterranean are depicted on the Ara Pacis in Rome, until now the only known instance of orchids in ancient art, and the earliest in European art.[Note 2] 
Tommy Wilcox (born July 30, 1959) is an American television personality and former college football player. He played defensive back for the University of Alabama Crimson Tide from 1979 through 1982 and was a member of the 1979 national championship team and was a consensus selection to the 1981 College Football All-America Team. Presently Wilcox serves as the host of a hunting and fishing show entitled "Tommy Wilcox Outdoors." 
After his playing career, Wilcox became a teacher and football coach at Hillcrest High School in Tuscaloosa, Alabama and later was a pharmaceutical sales representative. In the mid-1990s, Wilcox began to film his hunting and fishing show entitled "Tommy Wilcox Outdoors" and in the time since has filmed hundreds of episodes that also include famous sports personalities. 
The Virginia Beach Mariners were an American soccer club, who formerly played in the USL First Division of the United Soccer Leagues, the second division in the US Soccer hierarchy behind Major League Soccer. On March 30, 2007 the team folded due to lack of ownership. 
The Mariners played at the Virginia Beach Sportsplex in Virginia Beach, Virginia, from 1999 up to their demise in 2007. 
The team was founded in 1994 as the Hampton Roads Hurricanes, but they changed their name to Mariners after the first year.  For the 2003 season, the team changed their name from Hampton Roads Mariners to the more widely recognizable Virginia Beach Mariners. The team went on a one- year hiatus in 1997, after which they joined the A-League. 
In 2006, the Mariners added a USL Premier Development League club, the Virginia Beach Submariners. Shortly after the termination of the Mariners, the Submariners were taken over by the Hampton Roads Piranhas, a women's W-League soccer club, who renamed the team the Hampton Roads Piranhas to reflect the change of ownership. 
Peacetime structure comprises two mechanized brigades, an airborne regiment and specialized regiments of artillery, logistics, engineers, CBRN defence, reconnaissance and electronic warfare. Mechanized brigades are equipped with various types of combat vehicles to ensure the execution of different combat operations. 
Small arms of the Czech Land Forces are mainly supplied by CZUB, e.g. CZ 805 BREN and BREN 2 assault rifles, CZ 75 pistols and CZ Scorpion Evo 3 submachine guns. The Czech Armed Forces are equipped with about 3,000 T810 and T815 vehicles of various modifications produced by Tatra. 
Principal weapons systems of the Czech Land Forces include T-72 tanks (T-72M1 produced in Czechoslovakia and T-72M4CZ modernized in Czech Republic), BVP-2 infantry fighting vehicles (Czechoslovak-produced version of BMP-2), Pandur II and Iveco LMV wheeled combat vehicles and 152mm vz. 77 DANA self-propelled howitzers. 
The command structure is hierarchical, with brigades and regiments controlling groups of units. Major units are battalion-sized, and minor units are company or platoon-sized units. Airborne Regiment has a unique structure comprising several commandos and centres. 
Czech Land Forces are composed of both Regular (full-time) and Active Reserve (part-time) units. Active Reserve platoons, companies and specialized units are affiliated to respective regular units. Moreover, there are 14 Regional Military Headquarters of the Territorial Command, and each one has an Active Reserve infantry company. 
Transformation of the 600-strong 43rd Airborne Battalion to 43rd Airborne Regiment with more than 1,200 soldiers scheduled for October 2020 is based upon the 2014 Wales summit declaration regarding the NATO Response Force and Very High Readiness Joint Task Force (VJTF). 
It had a small 6V (six volt) battery fitted and an ignition switch to provide easy starting and for constant and even power to the lights and horn.   
In the early 1970s Suzuki started to import the FR50, followed by the introduction of the FR 50K an improved version in 1974, then it was discontinued in August 1975.  Production didn't resume until February 1981 in the form of an even further improved version, the FR50 X.  
Witt went to the State Art Academy in Dusseldorf to study an art teacher. Afterwards, he moved to the College of Design in Dusseldorf in 1976 and earned his degree as a designer. 
From 1993 to 1995 he appeared regularly on the radio and  has performed over two hundred times on television. From 1994 to 1997 he had his own television series: "Tele-spell with Wittus Witt" in which he performed interactive magic tricks every second week live with a spectator. 
Witt is one of the founding members of the association of full-time magicians "The Professionals", which met for the first time in autumn 1989. 
Since 1977 Witt has published the well-known magic directory "International Magic Yellow Pages" which appear in a 3-years cycle.  The publication contains currently more than 1,300 names from all over the world.  Since 2006 it is also available as an E-book version. 
In 2000 he took over Germany's magic magazine Magische Welt, in which he previously published articles and a column. He has also developed the German language version of Magicpedia. 
In 2011 Witt founded the annual Hamburg magic nights, in which several magicians show their full evening shows during one weekend. 
Margaret Mary Quirk (born 26 June 1957) is an Australian politician who has been a Labor Party member of the Legislative Assembly of Western Australia since 2001. She served as a minister in the governments of Geoff Gallop and Alan Carpenter between 2005 and 2008. 
As the result of the studies and to kick-off the establishment of Quezon City's Local University, the Quezon City Polytechnic was created on March 1, 1994 by the virtue of the City Council Ordinance No. SP-0171 for the training and development of skilled and technical workers. 
To support the K-12 initiative of the national government, the University started temporarily offering Senior High School program (ABM, STEM and TechVoc Strands) through the enactment of City Ordinance SP-2308 in 2014. The QCPU Senior High School started accepting students from Academic Year 2016-2017 until Academic Year 2020-2021. 
The QCU Main Campus is located along Quirino Highway in Barangay San Bartolome, Novaliches.  Its 4-hectare campus serves as the home of the Korea-Philippines Information Technology Training Center (KorPhil), whose advanced IT training facilities have also been made available to the University. The University also operates an Enterprise Development Center, from its main campus, designed to connect its Entrepreneurship program with the needs of small and medium-scale businesses in the city. 
In June 2019, The Quezon City Government inaugurated a new 7-storey-building in QCU that has a 500-seater auditorium and 33 laboratories. 
In 2006, the University opened its first satellite campus located inside the grounds of San Francisco High School in Barangay Sto. Cristo near SM City North EDSA. The Campus is connected to the Philippines' first interactive science center, the Quezon City Science Interactive Center. 
QCU opened its second satellite campus on 2009 in Quezon City's Batasan Civic Center.  The four-storey edifice is along IBP Road, Barangay Batasan Hills, beside Batasan Hills National High School. 
Quezon City University has 8,693 students enrolled across all programs for the Academic Year 2019-20. At present, the University offers four to five-year Bachelor's Degree programs under the following colleges: 
J. P. Shaw is Regional Director (East) for India Tourism-Kolkata under the Ministry of Tourism, a branch of the Government of India. 
Zekeriya Alp (born 1 January 1948) is a Turkish former international association football player and, current businessman and sports executive. He represented Turkey at senior level in 22 international encounters. Alp formerly took role of "Head of Central Referee Commission" at TFF. 
This biographical article related to a Turkish association football defender is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Note: Finish = Rank in league at end of regular season; GP = Games played, W = Wins (2 points), OTL = Overtime losses (1 point), L = Losses, GF = Goals for, GA = Goals against, Pts = Points, Top scorer: Points (Goals+Assists) 
The following were players selected by the Barracudas in the 2010 CWHL Draft. Because the league contracted from six to five teams, it was possible for some teams to reacquire players. 
Abraham "Bram" Cornelis Willem Leenards (born 14 June 1940) is a retired Dutch water polo player. He was part of the Dutch teams that placed eighth at the 1960 and 1964 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to a Dutch water polo figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to sport shooting in Russia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Cryptolechia mellispersa is a moth in the family Depressariidae. It was described by Alexey Diakonoff in 1952. It is found in Burma. 
This article on a moth of the subfamily Cryptolechiinae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Born in Princess Anne, Maryland, Long was the son of Zadock and Leah Whittington Long; attended the common schools and graduated from Yale College in 1828.  He studied law, was admitted to the bar in 1830, and commenced practice in Princess Anne.  He also engaged in agricultural pursuits. He married Amelia Roach and they had five children. 
Long was a member of the Maryland House of Delegates from 1833 to 1835, 1839, 1844, and 1861.  He served in the Maryland State Senate in 1860. 
Elected from the sixth district of Maryland as a Whig to the Twenty-ninth Congress, Long served from March 4, 1845, to March 3, 1847.  He was not a candidate for renomination in 1846, and resumed the practice of his profession and also engaged in agricultural pursuits on his family farm, "Catalpa".  He was an unsuccessful candidate for election to the United States Senate in 1860. 
Long died in Princess Anne, Maryland, on October 16, 1865. He is interred at the Catalpa Family Farm, Princess Anne, Somerset County, Maryland. 
The minor district (king amphoe) Kapho was formed on 15 March 1982 by splitting off three southern tambons from Sai Buri District. On 4 November 1993 it was upgraded to a full district. 
Neighboring districts are (from the northwest clockwise): Thung Yang Daeng and Sai Buri of Pattani Province; Bacho of Narathiwat Province; and Raman of Yala Province. 
The district is divided into three sub-districts (tambons), which are further subdivided into 22 villages (mubans). There are no municipal (thesaban) areas. There are three tambon administrative organizations (TAO). 
Robert Paul McGill (born April 27, 1962) is a Canadian former professional ice hockey player. McGill played in the National Hockey League (NHL) from 1981 until 1994. 
In 2005, McGill has transitioned into a career as an analyst with Leafs Nation Network, a popular media outlet in the Greater Toronto Area following the Toronto Maple Leafs and their AHL affiliate the Toronto Marlies.  McGill also serves as the colour analyst for the Marlies radio broadcasts on AM 640 Toronto. 
This biographical article relating to a Canadian ice hockey defenceman born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In the early years, settlers occasionally encountered groups of Aborigines hunting possums. Although artifacts such as grinding stones and stone choppers have been found in the district, no signs of permanent occupation were found by early settlers other than the mia-mias built by "Europeanised" Aboriginal shepherds from Narrogin in the employ of Michael Brown. 
Brown, a businessman from Narrogin, took up large pastoral leases in the Kulin/Kondinin area in 1905. These and other leases in the area were terminated in 1909/1910 to allow the government to distribute the land for agricultural purposes. 
 The town of Kondinin began life as a railway station on the railway line from Yilliminning (near Narrogin) to Kondinin, built from 1911 to 1915. The district around Kondinin was already settled when the government chose to construct a railway line here in 1911. 
The surrounding areas produce wheat and other cereal crops. The town is a receival site for Cooperative Bulk Handling. 
After the War he served as Air Officer Commanding No. 47 Group, Air Officer Commanding No. 4 Group and then Air Officer Commanding No. 22 Group before being appointed Commander of British Forces Aden in 1948. He went on to be Air Officer Commanding RAF East Africa before becoming Senior Air Staff Officer at Headquarters RAF Coastal Command in 1950 and then Air Officer Commanding-in-Chief at RAF Coastal Command in 1951 and retiring in 1953. 
After the French defeated the Holy Roman Empire  in the Siege of Metz in 1552, the city became a French protectorate as the 'Messine Republic' with a French garrison. To house it, an artillery-proof citadel was begun in 1556, only four years after the siege. Although the protectorate was still technically and legally part of the Empire, the city was now a 'de facto' French possession. 
The Governor's Palace was built by the Germans at the start of the 20th century on the site of a bastion of the dismantled citadel. Several Roman monuments and ramparts were brought to light on the site as well as the medieval Tour d'Enfer tower in the subsoil of the gardens. 
Songs of Ireland is an album by the Brobdingnagian Bards released on Saint Patrick's Day in 2002.  Unlike the band's previous albums which featured songs of various Celtic origins, this album is a compilation of almost entirely Irish songs. 
"The Unicorn Song" is a version of the poem by Shel Silverstein, recorded by The Irish Rovers in 1968.  The Bards, however, added a final verse to the song, providing an alternate, happy ending to the tale of the extinction of unicorns. 
This article about a Republican Party member of the Wisconsin State Assembly born in the 1860s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Prior to his appointment as chair of the Central Election Commission, Chang had practiced law for 37 years. He served as legal counsel for dissidents arrested during the Kaohsiung Incident of 1979. Chang has also served on the board of China Aviation Development Foundation. 
The Society was founded in Steyl in the Netherlands in 1875 by Arnold Janssen,  a diocesan priest, and drawn mostly from German priests and religious exiles in the Netherlands during the church-state conflict called the Kulturkampf, which had resulted in many religious groups being expelled and seminaries being closed in Germany. 
The SVD has two sister congregations, also founded by Saint Arnold Janssen. They are the Missionary Sisters Servants of the Holy Spirit (SSpS), otherwise known as the "Blue Sisters" and a contemplative branch called the Sister Servants of the Holy Spirit of Perpetual Adoration (SSpSAP) or better known as the "Pink Sisters"; the nicknames allude to the colour of the respective religious habits. 
 The core formula of the solemn Vows of the Divine Word Missionaries, as cited in their constitutions, is as follow:
 Those whose vocation is to the brotherhood pursue studies which are suited to developing their talents and interests. The Society is conscious that some regard brothers as being lower than priests and, in response, it states:
Vows are renewed annually; after three years a member may request final vows. According to Canon law, temporary vows may be renewed for a longer period but not exceeding nine years. 
 The members of the province also work with those affected by HIV and AIDS, orphaned children, refugees, health education, catechetics, Scripture study, environmental issues and unemployed young people. They have an outreach mission in Zimbabwe. Their preferred partners in dialogue are:
 "We, members of the Society of the Divine Word (SVD), an international religious-missionary congregation of brothers and priests, founded by Saint Arnold Janssen and named after the Divine Word, envision a world where dialogue is possible because people, inspired by the Word of God and empowered by the Spirit, respect the uniqueness of each person and accept all nations and peoples."
In 1905 the Divine Word Missionaries began work in African American parishes in Mississippi, and St Augustine Seminary, the first school specifically for the training of African American men for the Catholic priesthood, was opened in Bay St. Louis, Mississippi shortly thereafter.   
Divine Word Missionary priests have long worked in African American communities in Louisiana, Arkansas, and Mississippi, in Chicago, Indianapolis, Los Angeles, and elsewhere.  Numerous African Americans have joined the Society of the Divine Word as priests and brothers and have served as foreign missionaries throughout the world. 
If We Put Our Heads Together is the third and final collaborative studio album by American country music artists Ernest Tubb and Loretta Lynn. It was released on June 9, 1969, by Decca Records. 
The review published in the June 21, 1969 issue of Billboard said, "This is must merchandise for the dealer. Devotees of country music will find it very difficult to lay this package down inasmuch as the combined sales power of Ernest Tubb and Loretta Lynn is tremendous. They do some great duets, including the hit single, "Who's Gonna Take the Garbage Out" and "Let's Wait a Little Longer", "That Odd Couple" and others." 
Cashbox published a review in the June 28 issue which said, "The dynamic duo of Ernest Tubb and Loretta Lynn return for their third LP which spotlights the twosome performing their latest chart rising single in addition to other fine ballad and up tempo delights. Included, besides the title track, are "Who's Gonna Take the Garbage Out?", "Holding on to Nothing", "Chased You Till You Caught Me", "Let the World Keep on a Turnin'", "That Odd Couple" and five more. Fine set." 
The first single from the album, "Who's Gonna Take the Garbage Out?", was released in May 1969 and peaked at No. 18 on the US Billboard Hot Country Singles chart. The second single, "If We Put Our Heads Together (Our Hearts Will Tell Us What to Do)", was released in September 1969 and did not chart. 
Recording of the album took place over three sessions at Bradley's Barn in Mount Juliet, Tennessee, beginning on February 18, 1969. Two additional sessions followed on March 11 and April 1. 
The river is followed for its entire length through Glyn Tarell (the Tarell valley) by the A470 road, passing by the hamlets of Libanus and Tai'r Bull and entering the Usk at Llanfaes on the southern edge of Brecon. 
The most significant tributary of the river is Nant Cwm Llwch, which enters the Tarell on its right bank between Tai'r Bull and Llanfaes. This secondary river emerges from the glacial lake of Llyn Cwm Llwch beneath Pen y Fan. 
The name may have its origins in the old Welsh language words tarddu, "to bubble out", and tarddell, "a spring or source". 
The Afon Tarell, in common with the Usk and its other tributaries, is designated as a special area of conservation for its three species of lamprey, twaite shad, European bullhead, Atlantic salmon and otter. 
There have been a total of 17 recognized champions who have had a combined 33 official reigns. The current champion is Yamato who is in his fifth reign. 
USS Nabigwon (YTB-521/YTM-521) was a Hisada-class harbor tug in the service of the United States Navy.  The name "Nabigwon" is taken from a Native American language, meaning "ship". 
Nabigwon was assigned advanced base duty in the Pacific.  In addition to towing and berthing services, she provided harbor fire protection and was utilized as an inner harbor patrol craft. Redesignated YTM in February 1962, Nabigwon remained active as a medium harbor tug at Pearl Harbor into the 1970s. 
Nabigwon was sold by the Defense Reutilization and Marketing Service (DRMS) for scrapping on 28 July 1987. 
This article about a specific ship or boat of the United States Armed Forces is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Mantidactylus tornieri is a species of frog in the family Mantellidae. It is endemic to Madagascar. Its natural habitats are subtropical or tropical moist lowland forests, subtropical or tropical moist montane forests, freshwater marshes, intermittent freshwater marshes, and heavily degraded former forest. It is threatened by habitat loss. 
In 1977, the Health Director for the City of Chester became aware of the site and inspected it along with the Pennsylvania Department of Environmental Protection (PADEP).  The owner and operators of the site were ordered to cease operations and clean-up the site.  During the legal appeals to this order the site was inoperative and virtually abandoned. 
In February 1978, an intense fire at the site destroyed one building and damaged two others where drums of waste were stored.  The burning chemicals produced multi-colored smoke and noxious fumes.  The Chester Fire Department mounted an aggressive attack but were driven back by exploding 55-gallon drums and disabling smoke.  The fire was extinguished after 20 hours but rekindled twice in the ensuing days. The Commodore Barry Bridge was closed for the duration of the fire. 
In 1980, Melvin Wade was convicted of risking a catastrophe, failing to prevent a catastrophe and violating the Clean Water Act by polluting the Delaware River.  He was sentenced to one to two years in prison and fined $30,000. 
In late 1981 and early 1982, the EPA conducted two emergency cleanups in which workers removed an estimated 5,000 gallons of PCB-contaminated waste, 10,000 gallons of other hazardous wastes for incineration and 155 tons of contaminated solids. 
In 2004, with EPA and state approval, the site was given drainpipes to clear stormwater and paved with asphalt to create a parking lot for the city's Barry Bridge Park. 
In 2008, the Barry Bridge Park site adjacent to Wade Dump was selected as the site of Subaru Park, home of the Philadelphia Union Major League Soccer franchise. 
In 2018, a five-year review of the site concluded that the site continues to be protective of human health and the environment.  The EPA approved a request from the PADEP to discontinue groundwater monitoring at the site after nearly three decades of sampling data showed that groundwater beneath the site had reached acceptable levels of contamination.  The remaining wells on the site were decommissioned.  Periodic inspections are ongoing to ensure proper maintenance of the site. 
After the family returned to France, he entered the French army in 1810, during the Napoleonic Wars, becoming an officer of carabiniers, two years later, during the campaign against Russia. He was nominated senator, and elected Councillor-General of the Meurthe in 1854. 
This biographical article related to the French military is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Born to W. H. Helm of Dumfries, Alexander Knox Helm was educated at Dumfries Academy and King's College, Cambridge. 
In 1912, he passed the examination for what was then called second division clerkships and was appointed to the Foreign Office. He served as a member of the East Registry. A keen volunteer when World War I broke out, he was allowed by the Foreign Office to join his field artillery unit, being promoted second lieutenant in 1917 and serving in that capacity in Palestine. As a clerk, he performed only routine duties but distinguished himself through his diligence and retentive memory.  
In 1937 he was sent as Consul to Addis Ababa, and at the outbreak of World War II was moved to the British Embassy at Washington, D.C., where he handled the various complicated problems connected with the supply of petroleum to the United Kingdom. In 1942 he went back to Ankara (at that moment a key post) as Counsellor. 
He retained to the end the accent and intonation of the Dumfriesshire farming stock from which he came and his love for and understanding of the things of the soil often stood him in good stead in posts where agricultural problems bulked large in the economy of the country. 
His first wife, Grace Little, died in 1925. His second, Isabel Marsh, whom he married in 1931, survived him after he died at sea in 1964. 
Beauty Nazmun Nahar (born January 1, 1984) is a track and field sprint athlete who competes internationally for Bangladesh. 
Nazmun Nahar represented Bangladesh at the 2008 Summer Olympics in Beijing. She competed at the 100 metres sprint and placed eighth in her heat without advancing to the second round. She ran the distance in a time of 12.52 seconds. 
This biographical article relating to Bangladeshi athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Simon Kun Puoch is a South Sudanese military figure and politician. He had served as governor of Upper Nile (state) from 25 May 2010 till his removal by the President in August 2015. A Lieutenant General, he has also done work with the Southern Sudan Relief and Recovery Commission. 
This biographical article about a South Sudanese politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ptochiomera nodosa is a species of dirt-colored seed bug in the family Rhyparochromidae. It is found in Central America and North America. 
The Arkansas Southern Railroad (reporting mark ARS) is a short-line railroad which started service in October 2005.  ARS operates two disconnected lines consisting of Heavener, Oklahoma to Waldron, Arkansas (32 miles), and Ashdown to Nashville, Arkansas (29 miles), plus a switch track at Ashdown, for a total of 63 miles. The lines are leased from Kansas City Southern Railway (KCS) to ARS's owner, the Watco Companies (Watco). 
The tonnage today is primarily corn and soy, carbon dioxide, and chemicals such as bauxite and acid.  The line also offers car storage. 
On the Northern Branch, the railroad interchanges with the KCS at Heavener.  On the Southern Branch, it interchanges with the KCS at Ashdown, and the Union Pacific Railroad at Nashville. 
The Frankfurt Documents were an important step towards the founding of the Federal Republic of Germany. 
The Frankfurt Documents prompted the prime minister to hold the Rittersturz Conference in Koblenz on the resolutions that had been passed. 
Professor Rhema Vaithianathan is a New Zealand academic who specialises in the field of health economics, and big data. She is a Professor in the School of Economics at Auckland University of Technology and is a co-director of the Centre for Social Data Analytics within that school. 
Vaithianathan gained a Bachelor of Commerce in Economics in 1989, followed by Masters of Commerce (First-class Honours) in Economics in 1995, and a PhD in Economics in 2000, all from the University of Auckland. 
During her PhD studies Vaithianathan won the McKinsey Prize for Best Paper at the Australian PhD Conference in Business and Economics in 1997, and the Jan Whitwell Prize for Best Student Paper in 1998. She also won the prize for the Best Doctoral Dissertation in the Faculty of Business and Economics at the University of Auckland in 2000. 
Between 1988 and 1999, Vaithianathan worked as: A Policy Analyst for the New Zealand Treasury, a Health Economist for the Northern Regional Health Authority, an Economic Consultant for the New Zealand Health Funding Authority, and a Health Economist at the Waitemata District Health Board. 
Vaithianathan commenced her academic career as a research fellow at Australian National University in 2000, returning to the University of Auckland as a lecturer in the School of Economics in 2002. 
In 2013, Vaithianathan joined the Department of Economics (now School of the Economics) at Auckland University of Technology as a full professor. 
Vaithianathan is a member of Data Futures, a government-academia collaboration on data-use, her work with big data has received press attention. 
Since 2014, Vaithianathan's research has had a strong focus on predictive-risk modelling. Current projects include: 
He has appeared in the films Face/Off, The Wraith, Life, Class of 1999 II: The Substitute, Backstreet Dreams and The Astronaut's Wife, among others. He has directed several films, including John Q, Alpha Dog, She's So Lovely, Unhook the Stars, The Notebook, and My Sister's Keeper.  He also adapted the screenplay for Blow and wrote the dialogue for the Justin Timberlake music video "What Goes Around... Comes Around". 
Cassavetes finished in fifth place in the World Poker Tour (WPT) Invitational Season 5, attempting a bluff. He also appeared on season 5 of The Game Show Network's (GSN) High Stakes Poker. 
He also has played himself in the season 7 opener of Entourage on HBO and Tattoo Joe as a cameo in The Hangover: Part II, replacing Liam Neeson from the cast due to scheduling conflicts. 
In 1985, Cassavetes married Isabelle Rafalovich. They had two daughters together before divorcing. Sasha was born with a heart defect and underwent substantial surgery; Cassavetes' film John Q. was dedicated to Sasha, and his later adaptation of My Sister's Keeper was based in part on Sasha's medical experience. 
Cassavetes later married Heather "Queenie" Wahlquist, and they have a daughter together. Wahlquist has appeared in several of his films, including a small role in The Notebook as Sara, a secondary character and best friend to the female lead Allie Hamilton, portrayed by Rachel McAdams. Cassavetes' own mother, Gena Rowlands, appears as the older, married Allie (Hamilton) Calhoun. 
This biographical article relating to an American baseball shortstop is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Soling was a sailing event on the Sailing at the 1972 Summer Olympics program in Kiel-Schilksee.  Seven races were scheduled. Only six races were sailed due to weather conditions. 80 sailors, on 26 boats, from 26 nation competed. 
Because of insufficient wind the scheduled race in the Soling was postponed on 5 September 1972. Due to the interruption of the Games on 6 September 1972, the race was postponed till 7 September. Then the race conditions were unsuitable. Heavy fog and poor wind conditions made it not possible to race until 8 September. Finally for the Soling only six regattas took place. Also the medal ceremony was also postponed until 8 September. 
White Noise is an upcoming American drama film written and directed by Noah Baumbach, based on the 1985 novel of the same name by Don DeLillo. 
Jack Gladney, professor of Hitler studies at The-College-on-the-Hill, husband to Babette, and father to four children/stepchildren, is torn asunder by "the Airborne Toxic Event", a cataclysmic train accident that casts chemical waste over his town. 
On July 28, 2004, Barry Sonnenfeld was set to direct the film adaptation of White Noise from a script by Stephen Schiff. In 2016, Uri Singer acquired the rights to the book and pushed the project into development. On October 17, 2016, Michael Almereyda was set to write and direct the film adaptation. On January 13, 2021, it was revealed that Noah Baumbach would be adapting the film for Netflix with Baumbach producing with David Heyman and Uri Singer. 
Principal photography began in June 2021, under the working title Wheat Germ. Filming took place in Ohio, including Cleveland Heights, Wellington, Oberlin, Dorset and Perry Township. 
Filming took place in downtown Cleveland on November 4, 2021 with scenes shot on the Hope Memorial Bridge. 
Leucine responsive protein, or Lrp, is a global regulator protein, meaning that it regulates the biosynthesis of leucine, as well as the other branched-chain amino acids, valine and isoleucine. In bacteria, it is encoded by the lrp gene. 
MCID (initialism for "My Crew Is Dope") is the third studio album by American rock band Highly Suspect, released on November 1, 2019. Loudwire named it one of the 50 best rock albums of 2019. 
On August 16, 2019, Highly Suspect announced their third album, along with the release of two singles, "16" and "Upperdrugs"; the former track reached No. 1 on Billboard's Mainstream Rock chart. 
The Council is currently chaired by Bhushan Patwardhan. Current members include Deena Bandhu Pandey, P. Kanagasabapathi, Sanjay Kumar, H.S. Bedi, Harish Chandra Singh Rathore, Panchanan Mohanty, Amita Singh, Kshamadevi Shankarrao Khobragade, T. Subramanyam Naidu, Rakesh Sinha, Aswini Mohapatra, P.V. Krishna Bhatta, Santishree Dhulipudi Pandit, J.K. Bajaj, M.P. Bezbaruah, D.D. Pattanaik, and Madhu Purnima Kishwar. 
The Tweed GT-1 is an American high-wing, FAI Open Class single seat glider that was designed by George Tweed Jr. 
The GT-1 was built in concert with the Whigham GW-1 as both builders shared ideas and tools. The GT-1 first flew in 1960. 
Only one GT-1 was built and the aircraft was registered in the Experimental - Amateur-Built category. 
The GT-1 was entered in the 1960 US Nationals, but, as the designer termed it, the aircraft "proved to be a victim of technical obsolescence" and it did not place well. Both the designer and Jack Green did however complete their gold badges in the glider. 
By 2011 the aircraft had had its Federal Aviation Administration registry revoked and the aircraft likely no longer exists. 
Kelly was born in Drudgeon, County Tyrone on 6 August 1812 He was educated at St Patrick's College, Maynooth and ordained  on 13 June 1840. After curacies in Strabane and Culdaff he was parish priest at Upper Fahan. He served as Coadjutor Bishop of Derry from 1849 until 1864, and then Diocesan Bishop of Derry until his death on 1 September 1889. 
This article about an Irish Catholic bishop or archbishop is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Lionel James "L-Train" Simmons (born November 14, 1968) is an American former professional basketball player. 
Simmons led South Philadelphia High School to a Philadelphia Public League boys' championship in 1986, getting an MVP award in the process. He was inducted into the Philadelphia Sports Hall of Fame in 2008. 
Simmons was selected by the Sacramento Kings with the seventh pick of the 1990 NBA draft. On March 23, 1991, Simmons scored a career-high 42 points in a 95-100 loss to the Phoenix Suns. He was the runner-up to Derrick Coleman for the 1991 NBA Rookie of the Year Award. Simmons was NBA Player of the Week the week after the All-Star break during his rookie season. 
He played seven seasons for the Kings, scoring 5,833 career points until prematurely retiring in 1997 due to chronic injuries. He managed to earn more than $21 million in an NBA career that lasted seven seasons. 
Little Chicago is an unincorporated community in Spartanburg County, in the U.S. state of South Carolina. 
The community had once had a reputation for illicit liquor manufacturing and sales, earning it the moniker Little Chicago. 
Schizocypris altidorsalis, common name gorgak, is a species of cyprinid in the genera Schizocypris. It inhabits Sistan, Iran. It is classified as "least concern" by the IUCN Red List. 
Domestic Transformer (A 32 sq.m apartment), ALESSI Kung Fu Tea Set, ACTS Rednaxela Serviced Apartment, 
Chang was born in 1962 and raised in Hong Kong. He studied at the Queen's College and later graduated from the University of Hong Kong in 1987 with an Architecture degree. 
After graduation from the University of Hong Kong, Chang worked at P&T Group, an Architectural firm in Hong Kong. 
In 1994, Chang founded his first company, EDGE. The company was renamed EDGE Design Institute Ltd in 2003. The company works on projects for houses, retails, hotels, restaurants, and offices, and also creates products such as furniture, houseware, etc. 
The Domestic Transformer is the fourth design created by Chang for this apartment. It can transform into twenty-four different rooms through the use of sliding walls and panels. This project is comparable to a puzzle, where pieces are continuously being unfolded, while others are folded/fitted back together to create new rooms and spaces. 
Chang has also designed the Kung Fu Tea Set for Italian houseware brand ALESSI; A "Workstation" for Ogilvy & Mather Asia Pacific; The Kitagata Housing Product in Gifu; The Hong Kong Pavilion at the 50th Anniversary of the PRC, Beijing in 1999.   He also designed interiors at the Treasure Palace development in Hong Kong. 
Chang has won multiple awards, including the ar+d Awards in 2002 and 2003 in Copenhagen and London for Light Hotel and Suitcase House. Gary Chang was also included in "40 Architects Under 40" by Taschen in 2000.  The Domestic Transformer won the Design for Asia Award 2009 Grand Award and Bronze Award.  Chang has won many other awards in Asia and throughout the world for his reconfigurable living spaces and product designs. 
Taylor was born in Stateville, North Carolina where he lived until he was 10. He then resided in Craddock, North Carolina. He dropped out of high school at age 17 and began writing for a living. 
During World War II Taylor served in the United States Merchant Marines. He served in the United States Navy during World War II. 
Taylor worked as a press agent connected with the American film industry and wrote on the side. Early in his career he wrote fiction and non-fiction works aimed at adults. It was not until the Kay he stated writing works aimed at youths. 
In 1993, Taylor wrote and published the follow-up to The Cay, which he titled Timothy of the Cay. It describes the life of Timothy before his encounter with Phillip Enright, the narrator of The Cay, and what happened to Phillip after he was rescued, by which time Timothy had been dead for almost two months. 
This biographical article relating to Romanian athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Himesh Ke Dil Se is the fifth studio album by Himesh Reshammiya, produced by Reshammiya under the banner Himesh Reshammiya Melodies. It is the third album to be released by Reshammiya in 2021 following Surroor 2021 and Moods with Melodies. This album features emerging singers of India, particularly contestants from Indian Idol 12. 
The songs were sung by participants of the Indian Idol 12, including the winner Pawandeep Rajan, the first runner-up Arunita Kanjilal, Sawai Bhatt, Mohammad Danish, Nihal Tauro, Ashish Kulkarni, and Sayli Kamble. Other singers including Palak Muchhal, Meer Jasu, Stebin Ben, and Salman Ali have lent their voices for the album 
All songs were composed by Himesh Reshammiya, while lyrics were penned by Reshammiya, Sameer and Shabbir Ahmed. 
All songs were released in studio version and were shot at the HR Musik Studio and the singers themselves featured in the music videos. 
Shams, an ethnic Pashtun, was born in Nurgal in the Kunar province of Afghanistan. In 1984, the founder of Afghan Social Democratic Party, Ghulam Mohammad Farhad, died. Three years later in 1987, Shams was elected as the new head of the party. 
The party then began to split into 3 factions, one led by Shams-ul-Huda Shams, another by Qudratullah Hadad and the third by Mohammad Amin Wakman. Wakman's faction is now led by Afghan Finance Minister Anwar Ul Haq Ahady. 
Shams was in favor of the establishment of a modern democratic government in the country which could retain its National Islamic character. After the removal of Mohammad Najibullah's Soviet-backed government and Mujahideen take over of Afghanistan, shams continued his opposition with the incumbent regime of religious parties, which he argued, was not representing the majority of Afghan nation. Shams was especially against the Taliban government that was backed by Pakistan.[citation needed] 
While in Peshawar, Shams continued to publish his party's newspaper Afghan Mellat which published articles that produced nationalistic sentiments and called for democratic development in the war-ravaged Afghanistan. Besides writing in his party's journal, Shams also contributed scholarly articles and essays to other newspapers and journals. A unique feature in his writings was that he described facts regardless of its outcome. 
Shams kept a close friendly relationship with Pakhtun Nationalist Parties and Pashto literary organizations of Pakistan, especially Pakhtunkhwa Qawmi Party of Afzal Khan Lala. Shams's death was widely mourned by Afghans all over the world. After the death of Shamsul Huda Shams, the party congress held an emergency meeting and elected Ajmal Shams as the new president of the Afghan Mellat Party. 
This biographical article related to a Mexican association football defender is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bruce Hunter (born 1961) is a Canadian actor and comedian from Calgary, Alberta. He has appeared in television shows such as Puppets Who Kill and The Red Green Show. Hunter received a Canadian Comedy Awards nomination in 2002 for his work on the television series After Hours. He voices the king of Happily-Ever-Afterville on the PBS show Cyberchase. 
He is a member of the internationally renowned comedy troupe Illustrated Men along with David Huband and Adrian Truss. 
"Saints & Angels" is a song written by Victoria Banks and recorded by American country music artist Sara Evans. It was released in September 2001 as the third single from her 2000 album Born to Fly. The song peaked at number 16 on the US Billboard Hot Country Songs chart. Evans has stated that this was her favorite song from her Born to Fly album. 
"Saints & Angels" is a mid-tempo piano ballad that describes a couple who is troubled by their love and pressured by their imperfections. However, in the end, they overcome their differences and essentially become "saints & angels." 
The accompanying music video for the song features Evans on a sidewalk with many people passing in front of her. These scenes are intercut with scenes of couples fighting and making up. Evans is also shown wearing a green T-shirt with a cross and in a blue sweater. 
"Saints & Angels" debuted at number 48 on the U.S. Billboard Hot Country Singles & Tracks for the week of September 15, 2001 
 Bourra is a commune in the Cercle of Ansongo in the Gao Region of south-eastern Mali. The commune extends along the left (east) bank of the River Niger. It covers an area of approximately 2,323 square kilometers and includes 14 villages. In the 2009 census the commune had a population of 19,163. The main village (chef-lieu) is Tassiga. 
Okiwi is a small settlement and rural community at the head of the Whangapoua Estuary, in Whangapoua Bay, on Great Barrier Island in New Zealand's Hauraki Gulf. 
The Okiwi Basin area is a basin of farmland that can be seen from Palmer's Track, a walking track that runs from Windy Canyon to Mount Hobson. The fertile area is used for organic and small-scale growing, including the Okiwi Passion market garden and shop. 
Between 2015 and 2019, the Aotea / Great Barrier Island Local Board investigated establishing a cemetery at Okiwi or Claris, opting to establish it in Claris. 
This Blagoevgrad Province, Bulgaria location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about the Municipality of Loski Potok in Slovenia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Furata has a broad range that goes from playing serious salary men, to bushi in period drama roles, and even women. 
He works with the theatrical troupe called Otona Keikaku and often with the troupe Gekidan Shinkansen. Furuta also stars in the 2007 horror film Apartment 1303. 
USS Newcastle Victory (AK-233) was a  Boulder Victory-class cargo ship acquired by the U.S. Navy during World War II.  She served in the Pacific Ocean theatre of operations through the end of the war, and then returned to the United States of America for disposal. 
Newcastle Victory, built by Permanente Metals Corporation, Richmond, California, was laid down 21 August 1944; launched 17 October; and named 29 October. One of many Victory ships ordered by the U.S. Maritime Commission, she was one of ten taken over by the Navy to carry ammunition; and commissioned 23 November. 
After shakedown off the California coast, she put in at San Francisco, California, 12 December and took on a cargo of ammunition. Upon completion of loading at Port Chicago, California, and at San Pablo, California, she steamed for Pearl Harbor 28 December. 
She departed 7 March for San Francisco via Eniwetok and Pearl Harbor. At Pearl Harbor she received a three-week availability, which brought new ordnance and radar equipment and habitability improvements. She departed Pearl Harbor 17 April, arrived San Francisco 23 April, and then took on a new cargo of ammunition at Port Chicago, California. 
She steamed towards Leyte 15 May, via Pearl Harbor, Saipan, and Ulithi. During June she serviced ships in San Pedro Bay, Leyte, in the Philippine Islands; during July she returned to Ulithi and there assumed duties as station issues ship. 
Newcastle Victory was directed to proceed to Seattle, Washington, in November 1945, where she was laid up in a reduced manning status until May 1946, when she was directed to report to the 3d Naval District for disposal. She steamed in early May via the Panama Canal and Vieques Island, Puerto Rico, where she offloaded her ammunition. 
She reported to Commander, 3d Naval District, New York, 30 May and decommissioned 21 June. She was stricken from the Navy List 3 July 1946. Returned to the U.S. Maritime Commission, she was laid up in the Hudson River, New York. She was reactivated in 1955 and leased to the United Fruit Lines under a general agency agreement. 
Traffic Sports USA, based in Miami, is a soccer event management company in the North American, Central American and Caribbean region. 
Traffic Sports of Brazil were awarded the commercial partnership rights to the 2013 CONCACAF Gold Cup and the 2013, 2014 and 2015 CONCACAF Champions League tournaments. 
Traffic Sports was identified in the 2015 FIFA corruption case for allegations related to bribery in the awarding of commercial and marketing rights going back to 1991. Aaron Davidson, President of Traffic Sports USA, was indicted on May 27, 2015 on multiple counts including bribery and money laundering. Traffic Sports USA has pleaded guilty in this case. 
This biographical article relating to Slovenian association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Udea subplanalis is a moth in the family Crambidae. It was described by Aristide Caradja in 1937. It is found in Yunnan, China. 
Spreckels Lake is the only San Francisco lake that currently allows any model boating without special permits from the San Francisco Recreation and Parks Department (SF Rec. & Parks) under their interpretation of the law. Anyone may sail most types of model boats on Spreckels Lake with few restrictions. 
Since its construction, Spreckels Lake has been home to the San Francisco Model Yacht Club (SFMYC), whose application to the Park Commissioners in 1902 for a dedicated model boating site other than the crowded Stow Lake resulted in the creation of Spreckels Lake. The SFMYC has sailed various kinds of model watercraft on it continuously since before the day it opened. 
 The lake also serves as a gravity-fed source of non-potable, fire-fighting water for the local neighborhood should San Francisco's main and backup fire-fighting water supply systems ever fail, the lake water can be tapped through three green and blue, color-coded hydrants located on Fulton Street on the south side of the intersections of 30th, 34th and 36th Avenues.
In normal circumstances, the water exits the lake via an overflow-style drain in the extreme western end of the lake near the Concrete Turtle in the area known to the model yacht club members as "Turtle Cove." 
When the lake is being drained, a pair of grated, submerged drains in Turtle Cove and a single open drain about 15 feet out from the lake's north shore lead to the Fulton St. hydrants mentioned previously. This gravity-fed system will empty about half the lake's water over about a five-day period before the level drops enough to expose the drains. If work requires the lake to be lowered further still, SF Rec and Parks will bring in gasoline powered pumps. 
SF Rec. and Parks has endeavored when possible to leave enough water in the deeper areas of the east end of the lake so even with evaporation, the larger fish and turtles that populate the lake will survive the experience. 
The structure's red-tiled roof and concrete building with wooden, high-ceilinged interior reflects the WPA-era fusion of Mission Revival and Craftsman-style architectures that matches other buildings in the area including the Police and Public Stables across JFK Drive to the south. 
The current clubhouse replaced an earlier building salvaged by SFMYC members and the City of San Francisco from the remnants of the 'little' St. Francis Hotel after its removal from Union Square. It was rebuilt near the proposed but never built Polo Fields Stadium site with a budget of $16,000 in 1909 and served the Club until they moved to their current building in 1938. 
The clubhouse is open to the public on a request basis or if accompanied by a key-holding member of the model yacht club. 
Model yachting, in a more organized sense, seems to have reached the San Francisco Bay Area sometime during or after the early to mid-1870s. Early traditions tell of open-water model sailing competitions on San Francisco Bay held between the boardwalk of Miegg's Pier and Goat Island (Yerba Buena Island) as well as on Lake Merritt in Oakland, CA and Marin County's Richardson Bay where the competition was sometimes between the crews of the many cargo ships anchored there. 
The San Francisco Model Yacht Club for whom the lake was built regards Spreckels Lake its home waters and the history of the lake and model yacht club become inseparable as neither would exist without the other. 
The "Spreckles Irregulars" are a loosely affiliated but very active informal group of model boating hobbyists and friends who are regulars at the southern lakeside.  They mainly operate many types of model power boats, both liquid fueled and electric, as well as a few sailboats but are not affiliated with the SFMYC for any number of reasons. 
 The "Irregulars" are unstructured in that they do not hold events or races at the lake, but are content to meet in the late mornings on nearly every weekend day and sometimes during the week to run their models and enjoy the convivial company of fellow enthusiasts.  Most have been model boaters for many decades.
Spreckels Lake is usually open to everyone to enjoy year round as long as the overall park itself is open. Anyone interested can walk, run, loaf, watch or sail any boats as they wish. From time to time, the San Francisco Model Yacht Club may cordon off certain areas for special events or regattas but there is almost always plenty of room for other modelers to set-up and run in other areas of the walkway and lake. 
The exceptions are that during marathons and festivals such as the San Francisco Marathon, the Outside Lands Music and Arts Festival or the Hardly Strictly Bluegrass Festival vehicle access to the lake is closed and the lake itself maybe fenced off by event organizers. 
Powered boats are forbidden to run on the northern side of the lake to keep from creating noise issues with the neighborhood bordering on Fulton Street. 
Current rules for model boats at Spreckels Lake. The Recreation and Parks Department added two new rules in May 2015. The first change was that ALL boats were now required to observe the 15 MPH speed limit. The second was that model aviation was now prohibited at the lake. 
The ecology of Spreckels Lake is entirely artificial yet is home to a number species of birds, a temporary resting place for some species of migratory waterfowl and game-birds, as well as some aquatic species, and various species of fish and turtles.  The surrounding trees are good habitat for squirrels and other foragers as well as hunting territory for predatory species such as heron and coyote. 
Note: Pets must be kept on a leash at Spreckels. Not only because of park rules, but because to coyotes, large dogs are competitors in their hunting grounds or interlopers in their cubbing territory, and small pets may be eaten. 
Birds known to habituate to the lake in addition to feral pigeons and seagulls include common ducks and mallards, coots, grebes, swallows, cormorants, herons and egrets and, occasionally, domestic geese. Seasonal waterfowl seen to use the lake as a resting stop-over during migration include migratory ducks and Canada geese. 
Aquatically, the lake's algae-laden water hosts minnows, sticklebacks and carp. Wild carp up to around 24 inches in size also inhabit the lake, though some appear to be discarded goldfish or koi that have managed to survive. There is a 'tradition' of dumping goldfish in many of Golden Gate Park's lakes, sometimes by the bucketfuls, for good luck as well as a means of 'freeing' unwanted pets. 
There seem to be some freshwater clams, probably dropped by seagulls and, at least historically, crawfish. Many older local residents remember catching crawfish in traps in the lake as young children during the 1930s and 1940s. 
The herons in turn find the many pocket gophers that burrow in the grass surrounding the lake quite tasty. 
This problem is likely to grow worse as the weather and lake waters become warmer due to Climate Change. 
Deliberate harassment of the wildlife, with a model or other means is forbidden under SFMYC club rules, illegal under SF Rec and Park rules, the San Francisco Municipal Code, and state and federal statutes as well. 
While SF Park and Recreation Department is the controlling authority for public use of Spreckels Lake including model boaters not associated with the SFMYC, the Rec & Parks Department routinely follows the lead of the SFMYC in making usage rules for the lake as they regard the SFMYC the primary users of the Lake and the "experts" in mandating and controlling its use. 
Charles Richard D'Amato (born September 28, 1942) is an attorney, politician and retired United States Navy Reserve captain best known for facilitating funding for military parapsychology research and conducting an investigation of unidentified flying objects as a senior staff counsel under the aegis of the influential Robert C. Byrd in the United States Senate. 
He received a B.A. (cum laude) in political science from Cornell University in 1964; two M.A. degrees from the Fletcher School of Law and Diplomacy at Tufts University in 1967; and a J.D. from Georgetown University Law Center in 1980. He was subsequently admitted to the Maryland and Washington, D.C. bars. 
A member of the Democratic Party, D'Amato was the chief (1988-1995) and minority (1995-1998) counsel for the Senate Appropriations Committee. Working under Byrd (the Committee's longtime chairman and ranking member), he coordinated and managed the annual appropriations bills and other legislation on policy and funding of U.S. international operations and programs, including trade, defense and the full range of foreign activities of the U.S. government. 
D'Amato also served as senior foreign policy counsel for Byrd. In this capacity, he drafted the resolution that set Senate standards for international global climate change treaty negotiations. He worked on a wide array of issues affecting U.S. international economic and political interests, such as World Trade Organization review legislation and burden-sharing agreements during the Gulf War. 
Between 1980 and 1987, D'Amato was Byrd's director of political, economic, and national security policy during his tenure as Senate majority leader. He joined the congressional staff as legislative director for then-Representative Jim Jeffords (1975-1978) before serving as legislative assistant and then chief of staff to Senator Abraham Ribicoff (1978-1980). 
After leaving the Senate staff, he held elected office as a member of the Maryland House of Delegates from 1999 to 2003, representing an Annapolis, Maryland-based district. He served on the House's Appropriations Committee. 
He was reappointed to the United States-China Economic and Security Review Commission by Senate Minority Leader Harry Reid on October 5, 2005, for a two-year term expiring December 31, 2007. He served as the chairman and vice chairman of the Commission from April 2001 to December 20, 2005. 
The Persian language has between six and eight vowel phonemes and twenty-six consonant phonemes.  It features contrastive stress and syllable-final consonant clusters. 
The inherited eight-vowel inventory is retained without major upheaval in Dari, which also preserves quantitative distinctions. 
Persian syllable structure consists of an optional syllable onset, consisting of one consonant; an obligatory syllable nucleus, consisting of a vowel optionally preceded by and/or followed by a semivowel; and an optional syllable coda, consisting of one or two consonants.  The following restrictions apply: 
The Persian word-accent has been described as a stress accent by some, and as a pitch accent by others. In fact the accented syllables in Persian are generally pronounced with a raised pitch as well as stress; but in certain contexts words may become deaccented and lose their high pitch. 
When spoken formally, Iranian Persian is pronounced as written. But colloquial pronunciation as used by all classes makes a number of very common substitutions.  Note that Iranians can interchange colloquial and formal sociolects in conversational speech. They include: 
The 13th Lancers is an armoured regiment of Pakistan Army. It was formed in 1923 as 13th Duke of Connaught's Own Lancers by the amalgamation of 31st Duke of Connaught's Own Lancers and 32nd Lancers. On Partition of India in 1947, the regiment was allotted to Pakistan. 
The two parent regiments of 13th Lancers had a common origin in the old Bombay Squadron of Cavalry, raised for service in the Second Anglo-Maratha War. The squadron was split to form the 1st and 2nd Regiments of Bombay Light Cavalry in 1817. More than a hundred years later, they were reunited to form the 13th Duke of Connaught's Own Bombay Lancers in 1923. 
 The 2nd Bombay Light Cavalry were stationed at Neemuch in 1857 and took part in the pacification of Central India. One of its officers, Captain James Blair, won the Victoria Cross during these operations. Under Kitchener's Reforms, the 2nd Bombay Lancers was redesignated as the 32nd Lancers.
 During the Great War, the 32nd went to Mesopotamia late in 1916 and were the first British troops to enter Baghdad. In April 1917, at the Battle of Istabulat, a detachment led by the commanding officer, charged an entrenched Turkish position resulting in all the officers and most of the men becoming casualties. 
Rattan Mohan Sharma (born 14 June 1971) is an Indian classical vocalist, belonging to the Mewati gharana. He performs classical music forms such as khyal and tarana as well as light classical forms such as Haveli Sangeet, Tappa and Bhajan as well as Rajasthani Folk. He is considered an "A" grade artist on All India Radio[citation needed]. 
Sharma was born in Rajasthan to Padma and Mohan Lal Sharma. He is the nephew and a disciple of classical vocalist, PanditJasraj. His affinity for percussion instruments in his youth led Sharma to practice tabla up to the age of 15. Over the years, he has trained under Motiram, Maniram and Jasraj. 
He belongs to the Mewati Gharana and belongs to the family of vocalists such as Motiram, Maniram, Pratap Narayan, and Jasraj. He has performed in many concerts and festivals in India and abroad. As a playback singer he has performed in the mythological film Dashavatar (2009). 
He performs regularly at the classical music festival Pandit Motiram Pandit Maniram Sangeet Samaroh organized by Jasraj. 
The coat of arms of Dewsbury was the official symbol of the county borough of Dewsbury in the West Riding of Yorkshire. The county borough was abolished in 1974 under the provisions of the Local Government Act 1972 and replaced by Kirklees Metropolitan Council and West Yorkshire Metropolitan County Council. 
The elements of the arms and the crest refer to various local families: the chequy field refers to the Earls de Warenne; the crosses are from the Copley arms and the owls, as also in the coat of arms of Leeds, from the arms of Savile. 
Chequy or and azure, on a chief engrailed sable a cross patonce of the first between two owls argent. Crest: On a Wreath of the colours in front of a cross patonce fitchy azure an owl as in the arms. Motto: 'DEUS NOSTER REFUGIUM ET VIRTUS'. 
The Ministry of Information and Communication is a governmental ministry of the Republic of Sierra Leone. 
After graduating in 1984 Carlisle was selected 70th overall by the Boston Celtics in the 1984 NBA draft, where he played alongside Larry Bird. Under Celtics' coach K. C. Jones he won the NBA championship in 1986 and lost in the finals in 1985 and 1987. 
In a limited reserve role from 1984 to 1987 Carlisle averaged 2.2 points, 1.0 assists and 0.8 rebounds per game. He then played for the Albany Patroons of the Continental Basketball Association (CBA) under Bill Musselman. He then signed as a free agent with the New York Knicks, where he played under coach Rick Pitino alongside emerging star Patrick Ewing. In 1989, Carlisle played in five games with the New Jersey Nets under Bill Fitch. 
Later in 1989, he accepted an assistant coaching position with the Nets, where he spent five seasons under Bill Fitch and Chuck Daly. In 1994, Carlisle joined the assistant coaching staff with the Portland Trail Blazers under coach P. J. Carlesimo, where he spent three seasons. 
The Pacers slipped to a .500 record in 2005-06 and barely made the playoffs, losing in the first round. Despite this, Bird and Pacers CEO Donnie Walsh did not hold Carlisle responsible for the Pacers' lackluster performances in the past two seasons, and showed it in October 2006 when they signed Carlisle to a multiyear contract extension. The Pacers also gave him the additional title of executive vice president of basketball operations. 
After leaving Indiana, Carlisle worked as a studio analyst for ESPN before signing with the Dallas Mavericks as the team's new head coach. 
On January 30, 2015, he recorded his 600th win in a game against the Heat. He signed a new five-year deal on November 5, 2015. Four days earlier, Carlisle recorded his 340th win as Mavericks coach, passing Don Nelson as the winningest coach in franchise history. 
On June 17, 2021, Carlisle stepped down as the Mavericks head coach with two years remaining on his contract. 
Carlisle and his wife have one daughter. Carlisle is an avid pianist and private pilot, who as of September 2015 has logged nearly 200 hours flying his Cirrus SR22T single-engine light aircraft. 
The name was taken from The Proms, a classical music festival running since 1895, and borrowed a few traditions from its counterpart such as the final night culminating in an interpretation of "Land of Hope and Glory". The musical performances at the festival typically involved indie rock bands incorporating instruments outside of their usual arrangement, most commonly in the form of collaborations with the BBC Concert Orchestra. 
Primarily the festival's headline acts played at The Roundhouse in Camden but events, which included a programme of film, were not limited to this venue. For example, acoustic events took place at Cecil Sharp House. In 2008 in acknowledgement of its status as European Capital of Culture, events were staged in both Liverpool and London. 
In Australia, this program started airing on ABC2 from 1 May 2009 with episodes in a scattered order. 
The 2010 event (now rebranded as the BBC Radio 2 Electric Proms) took place solely in The Roundhouse and ran from Thursday 28 October to Saturday 30 October. The entire event catered to the Radio 2 audience, whereas previously the Electric Proms events featured the involvement of all four of the BBC's national popular music stations. 
The 2009 event took place solely in The Roundhouse and ran from Tuesday 20 October to Saturday 24 October. 
London: Burt Bacharach with the BBC Concert Orchestra; XX Teens; Wild Beasts; Africa Express; Goldfrapp 
London: Saturday Night Fever curated by Robin Gibb, with special guests Ronan Keating, Stephen Gately, Sam Sparro, Sharleen Spiteri, Gabriella Cilmi and Bryn Christopher; Justice, Coldcut via The Radiophonic Workshop; Red Light Company; Fox Cubs; Micachu 
Paul McCartney; Soil & "Pimp" Sessions with Jamie Cullum; Hadouken!; The Enemy; The Chemical Brothers; Justice; Tribute to Lal Waterson 
Kaiser Chiefs via David Arnold; Reverend and The Makers; New Cassettes; Cold War Kids; The Metros; Daler Mehndi and The Wolfmen; Bishi; Basquiat Strings with Seb Rochford, Ellery Eskelin and Simon H Fell 
Paul Weller with Amy Winehouse and others; Guillemots; Kasabian; The Magic Numbers; Jamiroquai; The Young Knives; Klaxons; The Good, the Bad & the Queen; James Brown with the Sugababes, Max Beesley and the London Community Gospel Choir; Jamie T; The Raconteurs; The Horrors; The View; The Zutons; Jet; The Who; Spencer McGarry Season; Friends of the Bride; Genod Droog. Vashti Bunyan. Donovan both on the same set. 
The important stimulus for closer economic and cultural cooperation, and also for the development of tourism, is the visa-free regime which has been in force between Belarus and Serbia since 2000. 
Deep mutual understanding and close cooperation in the field of culture have confirmed successfully carried Days of culture of Belarus in Serbia in 2005. Days of culture of Serbia were held in Belarus in 2007. Serbian artists regularly take part in Slavianski Bazaar in Vitebsk and have won three Grand Prix awards in 1997, 1999 and 2002. Days of the Serbian cinema were held in Minsk in 2006 with record attendance.[citation needed] 
The contract-legal basis of cooperation of Belarus and Serbia includes 20 signed agreements which cover almost all areas of bilateral interests. 
I know Serbia wonderfully. I was there more than once. I know the history and sentiments of the people of Serbia. After all, Serbia originated in Kosovo. In Kosovo, there are Serbian sacred sites.
Following the 2020 Belarusian presidential election, Serbia has signed the Declaration initiated by the European Union rejecting election results and criticizing crackdown against those protestings. 
In 2006, Belarusian exports to Serbia were tractors, potash fertilizers, salt, ferrous metal twisted wires and cotton fabric. Serbian exports to Belarus were pipes, rubber hoses and sleeves, synthetic polymer paints and varnishes, rough-grinding machine tools, honing machines, modular machines for metal processing. Belarus and Serbia signed a free trade agreement in 2009. 
This is a list of unmade and unreleased projects by Image Comics. Some of these productions were, or still are, in development hell. Projects that have not provided significant production announcements within at least a year, would be considered in development limbo until further announcements are released. The following include films, television shows, and video games, whether as live-action or animated productions. 
In 1995, TriStar Pictures acquired the film rights to Prophet. A live-action film was planned with Rob Liefeld as a producer, but the project did not proceed beyond pre-production. In 2018, Studio 8 acquired the film rights to Prophet. 
The Crow: 2037 was a planned sequel to The Crow written and scheduled to be directed by Rob Zombie in the late 1990s; however, it was never made. 
In 2001, Sony Pictures had optioned the comic series for a film production, commissioning a writers room. After development seemed to have stalled, Sony shifted focus in creating a TV show based on the comic instead. 
A sequel, tentatively titled Spawn 2, has been in development hell since 1998. Producer Don Murphy maintained that he was part of the project in 2001. McFarlane stated that the film would have centered primarily on the detective characters Sam and Twitch, with Spawn only as a background character. 
In March 2003, Twentieth Century Fox has optioned feature rights to the fantasy comicbook series with Gil Netter attached to produce. 
There have been two attempts to adapt Scud: The Disposable Assassin into a film and TV show. A live-action feature film was optioned by producer Oliver Stone, but the option lapsed in the early 2000s. 
In 2004, The Legend of Isis was optioned for a major motion picture by Paramount Studios and Grammnet Productions, with screenwriter Ali Russell. 
In 2004, Charlize Theron signed on to produce and star in a film adapted from Jinx for Universal Pictures. 
In December 2004, Dimension Films paid an undisclosed six-figure sum to develop a movie based on the comic, with a planned release for 2008. The film rights were later sold to the Pang brothers in December 2005. At Comic-Con 2009, Top Cow president Matt Hawkins revealed that a live-action The Darkness film was in development, with Scott Stuber Productions attached as the producer for the project. In 2012, Len Wiseman signed on to produce the movie. 
The comic book series Lions, Tigers and Bears was optioned for film in the fall of 2005 by Union Entertainment for six months, however the company closed their doors before a movie could be undertaken. In 2009, Paramount optioned the comic series, with a screenplay by Joey Aucoin and Lorenzo di Bonaventura set to produce. The film would be live action, with "heavy doses" of CGI animation. 
The possibility of Hack/Slash being made into a live-action film by Rogue was discussed by director Todd Lincoln, writer Martin Schenk, series creator Tim Seeley, and others at the 2006 San Diego Comic Convention, to be released in 2008. In 2012, Marcus Nispel, who directed Conan the Barbarian remake, was revealed to have agreed to helm the film for Relativity and Rogue. 
In 2007, McFarlane Funding announced development of a new feature film adaptation of the character, titled Spawn, scheduled for release in 2008.  During an interview on the Scott Ferrall show on Sirius radio, McFarlane said: "It's coming out no matter what. Even if I have to produce, direct and finance it myself, it's going to come out." 
A feature film adaptation of Witchblade was announced in 2008 and scheduled for a 2009 release, but was never produced. The film was to have been produced by Platinum Studios, Top Cow Productions, and Arclight Media, with Top Cow's Matt Hawkins & Marc Silvestri, Platinum's Rich Marincic, and Greenberg Group's Randy Greenberg serving as executive producers. Production was planned for September 2008, with filming to be done in Australia. 
In September 2008, it was announced that War Heroes had been optioned by Columbia Pictures, with Michael DeLuca as producer and Millar taking an executive producer role. 
In February 2009, Collider reported that Reliance Entertainment acquired the feature film rights to Youngblood, reportedly for a mid-six figures, with Brett Ratner attached to direct. 
In March 2009, Rick Remender and Kieron Dwyer were working on a XXXombies screenplay for a proposed film. 
In June 2009, it was announced that Deadworld was to be turned into a film. Jeffrey D. Erb and Framelight Productions along with Dark Hero Studios partners David Hayter and Benedict Carver have teamed up with Bill Mechanic to turn the comicbook into a zombie feature franchise. 
On October 12, 2009, Amanda Conner and Jimmy Palmiotti proposed a live-action adaptation of The Pro. They have said that they would like to have either Sarah Silverman or Ellen Muth as the lead. In March 2017, Paramount Pictures picked up the film rights to The Pro and hired Zoe McCarthy to write the screenplay. 
A film based on Alibi from the 2008 Pilot Season one-shots was announced in 2009.  The production was associated with Mandeville Films and Summit Entertainment, and John Hlavin was attached to write the adaptation. The story follows John and Rick Stephens.  John is a wealthy socialite whose life provides a cover for Rick, who is a top-secret government assassin. 
After the 2010 San Diego Comic-Con, Mandeville Films announced they would develop a film adaptation of Crosshair from the 2010 Pilot Season with producers David Hoberman and Todd Lieberman.  Morgan Foehl was attached to write the adaptation in 2011, and Summit Entertainment came on board as well. 
In August 2010, a film version of Mage had been in development at Spyglass Entertainment with Zack Snyder set to direct, but the rights were subsequently picked up by Watchmen and Hellboy producer Lloyd Levin. 
At WonderCon in 2010 it was announced by Comicraft/Active Images the option of Elephantmen by Zucker Productions for development into a film. Richard Starkings was working on the draft treatment, and is enthusiastic: "Jerry Zucker and I can't wait to bring the stories of Hip, Horn and Sahara to life on screen in a way that will simply take your breath away." 
Warner Bros. are developing a film version of The Red Star. Josh Trank, director of Chronicle, was attached to develop the project in 2012. 
In March 2012, Content House started developing a feature film based on the comic book series Epic Kill by Raffaele Ienco about an 18-year old assassin trying to avenge her parents deaths, with the President of the United States sending mercenaries to stop her. 
In March 2012, production companies Content House and Mosaic Media Group announced development of a Devoid of Life film based on the graphic novel by Raffaele Ienco.  Melinda Hsu Taylor was set to write the screenplay of a sci-fi tale about horrible deaths after the discover of a hidden planet and a threat to human life. 
In July 2012, Content House announced development of a feature adaptation of the graphic novel Manifestations by Raffaele Ienco. 
On December 2, 2012, Mark Wahlberg announced he will be producing a film adaptation of The Amory Wars. 
In 2013, Lakeshore Entertainment were making the film version of The Sword with David Hayter writing the film's script. 
Interest has been expressed in adapting Saga for film or TV. In an August 2013 interview, Brian K. Vaughan and Fiona Staples stated that the point of Saga as they conceived it was "to do absolutely everything we couldn't do in a movie or a TV show. We're really happy with it just being a comic." Vaughan has stated that they are open to the possibility, though it is not a priority for them. 
In December 2013, The Hollywood Reporter revealed that 20th Century Fox would produce the Starlight film with Gary Whitta penning the script. In May 2015, Mark Millar announced to JoBlo.com that the film is his next project. 
In April 2014, 20th Century Fox has optioned the movie rights to the comic series Who Is Jake Ellis? with David Yates attached to directing and Peter Chernin producing. Seth Lochhead would write the script for the film. In August 2016, Josh Mond would direct the movie. 
In 2015, Mark Millar's comic series Chrononauts was optioned for a feature film. In April 2017, Philip Gawthorne was hired to write the screenplay for the film, with Chris Morgan, Mark Millar, and Sean Murphy attached as producers. 
In 2015, Ed Brubaker received calls from interested parties in Hollywood about adapting The Fade Out very early in its publication. However, he did not want to sell the rights until the series was finished. He had done so with a previous work, and it affected the way he wrote it because he was imagining it in the other medium. 
The Tracking Board reported on May 26, 2015, that 20th Century Fox and Davis Entertainment had agreed to develop a League of Extraordinary Gentemen reboot with hopes of launching a franchise. The report stated that a search was underway for a director who could help "continue to develop the reboot". John Davis told Collider in an interview that the reboot will be a female-centric film. 
In 2016, MGM optioned Rising Stars, with J. Michael Straczynski slated to write the script and Alex Gartner and Richard Suckle to produce for Atlas Entertainment. 
In January 2017, series creator Rob Liefeld worked with Akiva Goldsman and Graham King to adapt the property into a film franchise. In March 2018, Netflix bought the series. 
On April 4, 2017, it was announced that Seth Rogen and Evan Goldberg would write, direct and co-produce a film adaptation of the comic for Universal Pictures. It was to be produced by Point Grey Pictures and Skybound Entertainment. Series creator Robert Kirkman was also set to produce the movie, alongside David Alpert and Bryan and Sean Furst. 
In July 2017, Rick Famuyiwa was attached to direct Son of Shaolin, based on the comic of the same name by Jay Longino. 
In December 2017, a film adaptation of Kill or Be Killed was announced. It will be written by Dan Casey and directed by Chad Stahelski. 
On May 22, 2018, it was announced that Chad Stahelski will direct and co-produce a film adaptation of Analog, with Ryan Condal, based on the Gerry Duggan comic. 
In August 2009, Halo-8 Entertainment has optioned the rights to make an "illustrated film" of Loaded Bible to be directed by Matt Pizzolo, who had previously done Godkiller. 
The second attempt was to adapt Scud into a TV series for MTV. It got as far as casting before being halted in 2004. 
In 2007, Jonathan and Joshua Luna spoke to director Stephen Hopkins about moving forward with an adaptation again, but it became stuck in development hell. The Lunas were still in talks for an Ultra television project in 2011. 
In July 2010 it was announced that production company Circle of Confusion, the same company that produces the Walking Dead television series, was planning to adapt Chew. It was revealed in March 2011, that Showtime was developing it into a half-hour comedy series, based on a script by Terri Hughes Burton and Ron Milbauer. 
A&E Network announced that they were working on an OCT TV show in March 2012, with Jorge Zamacona as the script writer. He is also a producer along with the comic's creators Dawson, Atchison, Gilmore and Shasteen, and The Walking Dead producer Gale Anne Hurd. 
In October 2012, Seeley and Norton said major networks had approached them about developing a Revival television series, and later mentioned NBC specifically. 
In 2013, it was reported that Fox was ordering a pilot for the television version of LoEG with Michael Green serving as writer and executive producer. Should the project go to series, showrunner Erwin Stoff would also executive produce. Neither Moore nor O'Neill would be producers on the series. It had also been reported that the pilot episode would still be broadcast, even if Fox opted not to green-light the series. 
On April 30, 2014, Syfy announced they would be adapting Pax Romana into a miniseries. Matthew Federman and Stephen Scaia (Warehouse 13) were writing the show, with Scaia and David Alpert (The Walking Dead) executive producing. Jonathan Hickman would serve as a co-executive producer. 
In 2014, Pukeko Pictures and Heavy Metal magazine announced their intent to adapt Rat Queens as a 30-minute animated television series. 
In October 2014, American television channel SyFy announced that a series based on Five Ghosts was under development. The pilot would be produced by Universal Cable Productions, Black Mask Studios and BenderSpink. 
In October 2015, Relativity Television announced that the series would be adapted into a television series and would be written by Skip Woods, who would serve as executive producer alongside Adrian Askarieh, who first optioned it in 2005. Since then, there have been no updates on the prospective series, causing outlets such as [/Film /Film] to assume that the series is in development hell. 
In September 2017, Deadline Hollywood reported the adaptation was being developed as a potential series for Amazon Studios, who made a "significant production investment" in it. In the letter column of Lazarus X+66 #4 (November 2017), Rucka said this announcement included some inaccuracies, and emphasized the show is still a long way from being released. He said the casting process had not yet begun. 
In 2015, Arrow executive producer Greg Berlanti was attached to direct and produce a television series based on Gerry Duggan's The Infinite Horizon comic. The script was written by Ryan Condal. 
In 2016, Tom Hardy and NBCUniversal announced a television series based on Warren Ellis' and Jason Howard's comic series Trees is in early development. 
A live action television adaptation of Postal from Matt Tolmach and Legendary Entertainment was in development in early 2016. The Walking Dead executive producer Seth Hoffman is writing the pilot script. After tough competition for the rights, it was picked up by Hulu in September 2016. 
In 2017, it was announced that rights have been acquired by United Kingdom company Manga Entertainment in order to develop a Japanese animated or live action series based on Wayward. 
In 2017, Entertainment One ordered a pilot based on Gail Simone's comic series Crosswind, with Vanessa Piazza as showrunner and executive producer. 
In November 2017, Constantin Film acquired the rights to develop Danger Girl as a potential TV series, in partnership with Askarieh's Prime Universe Films and Jeremy Bolt's Bolt Pictures. 
On April 19, 2018, it was announced that Amazon Studios, Skybound Entertainment, and Jonathan Hickman would be developing an hour long series based on East of West and Transhuman. 
In 2018, Warren Ellis' comic series Injection has been optioned for television by Universal Cable Productions. 
In 2018, Orphan Black series writer Will Pascoe was set as the showrunner for an adaptation of Michael Moreci's comic series Roche Limit. 
A Youngblood video game, an isometric action game similar to Crusader: No Remorse, was in development by Realtime Associates for the PlayStation and PC in 1997, with GT Interactive as the publisher. 
After marrying, Sothern retired from the stage and never acted again. After living in England several years, where her children were born, they returned to the United States. Living in Los Angeles, California, she devoted herself to her family and the movie career of her daughter. Sothern died at age 99 in Palm Springs, California. She is interred in Westwood Village Memorial Park, Los Angeles. 
Gerald L. Curtis (born September 18, 1940) is an American academic, a political scientist interested in comparative politics, Japanese politics and U.S.-Japan relations. 
Curtis was the Burgess Professor of Political Science at Columbia University from 1998 until he retired in December 2015.  He is now Burgess Professor Emeritus of Political Science at Columbia.  Between 1974 and 1990, Curtis was head of the Weatherhead East Asian Institute (WEAI) at Columbia. 
In a statistical overview derived from writings by and about Gerald Curtis, OCLC/WorldCat encompasses roughly 40+ works in 80+ publications in 5 languages and 5,000+ library holdings.  
Professor Curtis became a special advisor to Newsweek when the magazine's Japanese language edition was initiated in 1986.  When the political events or changes became the news of the day, the editorial staff incorporated Curtis' analysis.  The New York Times also incorporates the analysis. 
Hockingport is a census-designated place in southeastern Troy Township, Athens County, Ohio, United States. As of the 2010 census it had a population of 212. It has a post office with the ZIP code 45739.  It is located at the intersection of State Routes 124 and 144. 
A post office called Hockingport has been in operation since 1838. The community was a shipping point on the Hocking River, hence the name. 
Eleanora Girlani was born in 1460 to a noble family of Trino, then in the Duchy of Savoy. Having been educated by the Benedictines, she had planned to become a Benedictine nun. However, on her way to the abbey, her horse refused to take her there. Interpreting this a sign, she instead became a Carmelite nun in Parma, and was given the religious name of Archangela. She was professed in 1478. 
Girlani was later elected the prioress of her monastery, and went on to  found a new Carmelite monastery in Mantua. She is remembered as a mystic who had a special devotion to the Most Holy Trinity, and was reported to have the gifts of ecstasies, and miracles, including levitation. 
Widespread devotion and reports of healing arose after her death in 1494. Her cultus was confirmed on 1 October 1864 by Pope Pius IX.  Her feast day is celebrated on 13 February. 
It is a small village located 12KM North from Tiruchirapalli District head quarters, 9KM from Manachanellur & 347KM from the Chennai State capital. 
On 19 March 2010 the Navy issued Request for Information (RFI) N00019-UCLASS-RFI-A for planning purposes, as part of a market survey led by the Navy Program Executive Office for Unmanned Aviation and Strike Weapons [PEO (U&W)]. 
The greater lizardfish (Saurida tumbil) is a species of lizardfish that lives in the Indo-Pacific. They are a minor fishery. 
They live in the Indo-West Pacific. More specifically, their geographic range spans from Red Sea and east coast of Africa (except Kenya), including Madagascar to the Persian Gulf, Arabian Sea, and further east to southeast Asia and Australia but they do not appear to occur in the central or eastern Pacific. 
This species is found on muddy bottoms and trawling grounds. It feeds on fishes, crustaceans, and cephalopods. 
Solikha Khusniddinova (Uzbek: Soliha Husniddinova; born 22 January 1998) is an Uzbekistani footballer who plays as a defender for Women's Championship club Sevinch and the Uzbekistan women's national team. 
Khusniddinova capped for Uzbekistan at senior level during the 2020 AFC Women's Olympic Qualifying Tournament. 
This biographical article related to women's association football in Uzbekistan is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to a Uzbekistani association football defender is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Male leather culture has existed since the late 1940s, when it likely grew out of post-WWII biker culture. Pioneering motorcycle clubs included the Satyrs Motorcycle Club, established in Los Angeles in 1954; Oedipus Motorcycle Club, also established in Los Angeles in 1958, and the New York Motorbike Club. Early San Francisco clubs included the Warlocks and the California Motor Club, while early clubs in Sydney included the South Pacific Motor Club (SPMC). 
Aspects of leather culture beyond the sartorial can be seen in the 1970 murder mystery novel Cruising, by Jay Green. The novel was the basis for the 1980 movie Cruising,  which depicted aspects of the men's leather subculture for a wider audience. 
Drummer is an American magazine targeted at gay men, originally published from 1975 to 1999; during the late 20th century, it was the most successful of the American leather magazines, and sold overseas. The publication had a major impact of spreading gay leather as a lifestyle and masculinity as a gay ideal. The magazine was originally focused on quality writings about leather but gradually changed into more of a photo magazine. 
In 1979 the newly formed San Francisco lesbian motorcycle club, Dykes on Bikes, led what was then called the San Francisco Gay Freedom Day Parade for the first time and has done so ever since (since 1994, the event has been called the San Francisco Pride Parade). 
Leather and Lace, a woman's leather/BDSM support and social group, was founded in Los Angeles in 1980. The women of Leather and Lace learned the "old guard" traditions from the men of Avatar. Leather and Lace had a code of conduct and a uniform that could only be worn once a member earned the right. 
In a review of 48 cases of clinical fetishism in 1983, fetishes included clothing (58.3%), rubber and rubber items (22.9%), footwear (14.6%), body parts (14.6%), leather (10.4%), and soft materials or fabrics (6.3%). 
By the mid-1980s, lesbian motorcycle enthusiasts in other cities besides San Francisco began to form motorcycle clubs. 
In 1984, the Folsom Street Fair in San Francisco was held for the first time; it is and was the world's largest leather event and showcase for BDSM products and culture. 
The leather pride flag was designed by Tony DeBlase. He first presented the design at the International Mister Leather event in Chicago, Illinois, U.S. on 28 May 1989. Initial reaction to the flag was mixed. According to DeBlase's article A Leather Pride Flag, 
"Some, particularly on the east coast, reacted positively to the concept, but were quite concerned, some even offended, that I had not involved the community in helping to create the design." 
In June 1989 the flag was used by the leather contingent in a Portland, Oregon pride parade, which was its first appearance at a pride parade. 
In the 1980s and early 1990s, lesbian leatherwomen were often involved in helping to care for gay leathermen who had been stricken with AIDS. 
In 1997 the (American) National Coalition for Sexual Freedom was founded; the NCSF's mission as described on its web page is: 
The NCSF is committed to creating a political, legal and social environment in the US that advances equal rights for consenting adults who engage in alternative sexual and relationship expressions. The NCSF aims to advance the rights of, and advocate for consenting adults in the BDSM-Leather-Fetish, Swing, and Polyamory Communities. We pursue our vision through direct services, education, advocacy, and outreach, in conjunction with our partners, to directly benefit these communities.
Mark Leno was the first out leatherman to be a state legislator in the United States; he served in the California State Assembly from 2002 to 2008. 
Leather & Grace, a (now defunct) organization of Unitarian Universalist kinksters, was founded in 2011, and combined a red flaming chalice with the stripes of the leather pride flag for their logo. 
The LGBTQ and Leather Cultural District was created in South of Market, San Francisco in 2018. It includes the San Francisco South of Market Leather History Alley, with four works of art, which opened in 2017. 
Throughout the history of the leather subculture, a variety of traditions have been observed, often diligently. While most or all are based on military protocols and ritual, these traditions varied widely between regions, causing much debate today over which traditions are the original or true traditions, or whether the "romanticized versions of leather history" ever existed at all. 
As time has progressed and BDSM has become more mainstream (see below), the traditions of leather have adapted. The first major evolution has become known as "New Leather" or "New Guard". However, even this is the subject of some disagreement, as many noted authors and historians assert that there are little or no substantive differences. 
Today, the leather subculture is one of many facets to semi-organized alternative sexuality. Many individuals describe long periods of introspection leading to their choice to identify as "leather". Others do not necessarily associate their leather lifestyle with BDSM, and simply enjoy the sensory experience of leather. 
The more specific aesthetics of men's leather culture drew on sources including military and police uniforms. This influence is particularly evident in the graphical illustrations of leathermen found in the work of Tom of Finland. The pornographic films of one of his models Peter Berlin from Berlin, such as his 1973 film Nights in Black Leather, also reflected and promoted the leather subcultural aesthetic. 
Aspects of leather culture beyond the sartorial can be seen in the 1970 murder mystery novel Cruising by Jay Green. The novel was the basis for the 1980 movie Cruising,  which depicted aspects of the men's leather subculture for a wider audience. 
In the late 1970s many fans of Judas Priest, AC/DC and Meat Loaf began imitating the clothing of leathermen due to the association of such fashions with toughness. Typical heavy metal fashions in the UK, US and Australia included leather battle jackets, combat boots, studded belts, and black leather jackets like the Schott Perfecto. 
Freddie Mercury of Queen began incorporating leather into his stage costumes during the band's 1978 News of the World Tour. By their 1979 Jazz Tour, Mercury was wearing a full leather outfit, which he explained was inspired by clubs he frequented. Leather jackets, trousers, and accessories would feature prominently in his wardrobe for the rest of his touring career. 
In 1979 the newly formed San Francisco lesbian motorcycle club, Dykes on Bikes, led what was then called the San Francisco Gay Freedom Day Parade for the first time and has done so ever since (since 1994, the event has been called the San Francisco Pride Parade). 
Leather and Lace, a woman's leather/BDSM support and social group, was founded in Los Angeles in 1980. The women of Leather and Lace learned the "old guard" traditions from the men of Avatar. Leather and Lace had a code of conduct and a uniform that could only be worn once a member earned the right. In New York, there was LSM. Only members of the club were allowed to know that LSM stood for Lesbian Sex Mafia. 
By the mid-1980s, lesbian motorcycle enthusiasts in other cities besides San Francisco began to form motorcycle clubs. 
In the 1980s and early 1990s, lesbian leatherwomen were often involved in helping to care for gay leathermen who had been stricken with AIDS. 
Other large events include Easter in Berlin (the largest leather event in Europe), International Mr. Leather and Mister Leather Europe, and Amsterdam Leather Pride (see Wikipedia article in Dutch). 
Many major cities around the world had or have legendary leather bars and clubs, and in some cases a concentration of these associated a particular district with the leather scene: 
Coffmania is a genus of small yellow chironomid midges with two known species, both found in the Darjeeling and Sikkim areas of the Indian Himalayas. The generic name honours Professor W. P. Coffman of the University of Pittsburgh. 
The larvae and pupae live in cool, shallow, slow-flowing water with a preference for algal mats. The larvae feed largely on other chironomid larvae and also on algae and detritus. 
This article related to members of the fly family Chironomidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
More than 23,500 local car repair garages throughout England, Scotland and Wales, employing more than 65,800 testers, are authorised to perform testing and issue certificates. In principle, any individual in Great Britain can apply to run a MOT station, although in order to gain an authorisation from DVSA, both the individual wanting to run the station, as well as the premises, need to meet minimal criteria set out on the government's website within the so-called VT01 form. 
In Northern Ireland, tests are performed exclusively at the DVA's own test centres, although currently there is an open project investigating bringing Northern Ireland into line with the rest of the United Kingdom. 
In order to allow vehicles to travel from a country to another one, some international regulations require test to be performed on vehicles. 
This is for instance required by the 1997 Unece agreement and by Directive 2014/45/EC on Periodic Road-worthiness tests, Directive 2014/47/EC on technical roadside inspections of commercial vehicles and Directive 2014/46/EC.  
All test stations are required to display a "VT9A Fees and Appeals" poster on their premises which must be available to the public. As of 6 April 2010, these are the maximum fees that can be charged. They are not subject to VAT. 
The actual designation for the pass certificate is VT20, and failure is the VT30, with any advisories being the VT32. The MOT test will provide an emissions report if applicable. 
In Great Britain MOT testing centres are regulated and licensed by the Department and Transport and DVSA for the purpose, and the individual testers carrying out the inspections also have to be trained and certified. The decision to pass or fail each presented vehicle comes down to the discretion of the tester following the guidelines issued by the DVSA. 
The inspection manual can be found online. The full details must by law be provided on request by all garages licensed to perform MOT tests, and are currently published in DVSA's leaflet The MOT Test and You. An MOT pass certificate indicates that at the time of the test the vehicle met or exceeded the minimum safety standards determined by the DVSA guidelines. 
A vehicle that has no front- and rear-position lights fitted or has had those lights permanently removed, painted or masked-over is exempt from the lighting sections of the MOT test. An advisory note will be provided on the VT32 as a reminder that the vehicle should only be used during daylight hours and not used at times of seriously reduced visibility. 
This is sometimes incorrectly referred to as a "Daytime MOT", but there is no official distinction. It is the Road Vehicles Lighting Regulations that prevent an unlit vehicle being used on the road after dark, not the MOT. 
Bonnet, horn, sharp edges, boot lid, lamps, steering wheel, brake pedal anti-slip, loading door, tailboard, direction indicators, mirrors, tailgate, doors rear reflectors, VIN, drop sides, registration plates, windscreen and glass, fuel filler cap, seat belts, wipers and washers, hazard warning, seats, wheels and tyres. 
After the 10-day period a full MOT test will have to be carried out. The full MOT test fee is charged again. 
Test stations and the DVSA's website provide full and up-to-date information regarding MOT re-tests. 
The fee for testing and retesting is at the discretion of the proprietor of the test facility, subject to legal maximum prices. The vehicle owner is only subject to one retest per MOT test. If the vehicle fails the MOT retest it is then subject to a full MOT test at the full MOT test fee. 
If the items in question are repaired, replaced or removed from the vehicle, the right of the owner to appeal becomes null and void. Failure because of items easily replaceable, such as tyres or windscreen wiper blades, may not be appealed against, as it cannot be adequately determined if they were the ones fitted at the time of inspection. 
DVSA/DVA has only the power to discipline the station involved and cannot pursue compensation of any kind for the complainant; that is the responsibility of Trading Standards. An MOT station cannot be held responsible for defects that occur to the vehicle several months after the test was conducted. The appeal process is outlined on the reverse of the VT20 pass certificate and the VT30 failure notice. 
It is a common misconception that the MOT inspection provides an irrefutable record of a vehicle's mileage. However, although the mileage is recorded during the test, no part of the inspection requires the test station to verify that this is indeed the actual mileage. It is merely recorded, and any tampering of an odometer would not be discovered as part of the MOT inspection. 
In 2012 the MOT test was radically overhauled with many items not previously included in the test now becoming standard. 
From 18 November, the MOT certificate shows the vehicle's recent mileage history. This has been introduced as part of a government initiative to reduce vehicle crime. Where available, the mileage history will comprise the readings associated with the three most recent VT20s (test passes) along with the date of those readings. 
From 20 May 2018, the way that the MOT test works in England, Scotland and Wales changes to comply with EU Directive 2014/45. This involves some changes to the way the test is carried out and reported, with the basic essence of the test remaining the same. After the change date, vehicles first registered 40 or more years prior will not need to undergo an MOT test. 
From 1 October 2019, the way that the MOT test works in England, Scotland and Wales changed to comply with the new connected equipment legislation. This only applies to any applications to open a new MOT centre, reopen an MOT centre or make a change of ownership of an MOT centre. 
From 1 April 2020, all class 4 vehicle MOT expiry dates were extended by 6 months if it is due on or after 30 March 2020. This has been implemented due to the coronavirus outbreak across the UK. Although the 6 month exemption was granted, vehicles that were still being used were required to be kept in a roadworthy condition, and penalties were still being issued for driving a vehicle in a dangerous condition. 
Emissions tests on diesel cars have not been carried out during MOTs in Northern Ireland for 13 years, despite being a legal requirement. 
The men's 50 metre backstroke competition of the swimming events at the 2013 Mediterranean Games took place on June 21 at the Mersin Olympic Swimming Pool in Mersin, Turkey. 
Sybrinus is a genus of longhorn beetles of the subfamily Lamiinae, containing the following species: 
Eunice Lake is a glacial lake located in Pierce County, Washington and in the northwest part of Mount Rainier National Park. The lake was named after Eunice Sargent Roth by her husband Andy (Adolph) Roth who grew up in Washogal and was active in the forest service for many years.  The lake is a popular area for hiking. 
This Pierce County, Washington state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
HMS Petard was an Admiralty M-class destroyer destroyer built by Denny for the Royal Navy, commenced 5 July 1915 and launched on 24 March 1916. She saw service during the First World War. Postwar, she was sold for breaking up on 9 May 1921. 
This article about a specific destroyer of the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The squadron became part of the new Royal Air Force on 1 April 1918. As it was assigned to patrol to the north of London where attacks were less likely, it retained its obsolete B.E.12s well into 1918, receiving its first modern S.E.5s in May. In October 1918, the squadron re-equipped with Sopwith Camels and in December replaced these by Sopwith Snipes. The squadron moved to Biggin Hill in March 1919 and in July 1919 it was renumbered as No. 39 Squadron RAF. 
On 2 October 1945 37 Squadron moved to Aqir, moving again to Shallufa in Egypt in December, disbanding there on 31 March 1946. On 15 April 1946, 214 Squadron, an Avro Lancaster-equipped bomber squadron based at RAF Fayid in Egypt, was renumbered No. 37 which flew  bombers until it was disbanded again on 1 April 1947. 
Gibson was born near Conwy, Wales, where his father was a market gardener.  When he was nine years old the family were on the point of emigrating to America, but his mother put a stop to this plan on their arrival at Liverpool, where they settled, and where Gibson was sent to school. He became fascinated by the displays in the windows of the city's print shops. The painter and printseller John Turmeau lent him some drawings and plaster casts to copy. 
Throughout most of his time in Rome Gibson had an alleged relationship with the Welsh artist Penry Williams 
Gibson was elected R.A. in 1836, and bequeathed all his property and the contents of his studio to the Royal Academy, where his marbles and casts are open to the public as of 2005[update]. He died at Rome on 7 January 1866 and was buried in the Protestant Cemetery there. 
In all worldly affairs and the business of daily life he was simple and guileless in the extreme; but was resolute in matters of principle. He was visited by William Dean Howells in Naples who described him as "dressed with extraordinary slovenliness and indifference to clothes, had no collar, I think, and evidently did not know what he had one Everything about him bespoke the utmost unconsciousness and democratic plainness of life." 
The letters between Gibson and Margaret Sandbach, granddaughter of William Roscoe, and a sketch of his life that lady induced him to write, furnish the chief materials for his biography. See his Life, edited by Lady Eastlake. 
After his graduation from Beijing Dance Academy in 2005, Sun Rui joined Beijing Dance Academy Youth Troupe as a classical dancer. In 2008, he joined Beijing Contemporary Dance Theatre. Because of his outstanding dancing skills and styles, Sun Rui showed up in numerous performances both nationally and internationally. 
Obum Gwacham (born March 20, 1991) is a Nigerian professional gridiron football defensive end for the BC Lions of the Canadian Football League (CFL). He has played for the New Orleans Saints and the New York Jets. He played college football for the Oregon State Beavers. 
On Saturday, May 2, 2015, Gwacham was drafted by the Seattle Seahawks with the 209th pick in the sixth round. 
On September 6, 2015, he was claimed off waivers by the New Orleans Saints. He was placed on injured reserve on September 28, 2016. On September 2, 2017, the Saints released Gwacham. 
Gwacham was selected by the Tampa Bay Vipers in the 21st Round (round one of phase three) of the 2020 XFL Draft. He was placed on injured reserve before the start of the season on January 21, 2020. He was activated from injured reserve on February 24, 2020. He had his contract terminated when the league suspended operations on April 10, 2020. 
German submarine U-670 was a Type VIIC U-boat of Nazi Germany's Kriegsmarine during World War II. The submarine was laid down on 25 November 1941 at the Howaldtswerke yard at Hamburg, launched on 15 December 1942, and commissioned on 26 January 1943 under the command of Oberleutnant zur See Guido Hyronimus. 
Attached to 5th U-boat Flotilla based at Kiel, U-670 collided during training in the Baltic Sea with the target ship Bolkoburg and sank. Of her crew of 43, 22 survived while 21 perished in the accident. 
He was nominated by President John Dramani Mahama to be the vice-president a week after Mahama himself was sworn in. This followed the sudden death of John Atta Mills on 24 July 2012. He was sworn in as Vice-President on 6 August 2012, following vetting by the Parliament of Ghana. 
He attended the Aboom Methodist 'B' Primary School in Cape Coast and passed the Common Entrance examination from the Akim Oda Methodist School in 1964. He completed his secondary education at the Mfantsipim School, where he obtained the GCE Ordinary Level in 1969 and the GCE Advanced Level in 1971. At Mfantsipim, he was a resident of Lockhart-Schweitzer House. He proceeded to the University of Ghana at Legon, where he obtained the B.Sc. in 1974 and M.Sc. in 1976, both in Economics. 
He went into politics until 1997 when he resigned from the public sector and went into finance and economic consultancy.  He worked as a consultant for the World Bank in The Gambia. He also served as a consultant for the Netherlands' government education project in Ghana. He then worked as Senior Economist for the Sigma One Corporation in Ghana between 1998 and 2000. Between 2001 and 2002, he was on assignment for the Ministry of Foreign Affairs of Denmark. 
Amissah-Arthur was married to Matilda Amissah-Arthur with two children, Kwesi, an ophthalmologist-academic and Araba, a lawyer. He was a Christian and was known to worship at the Calvary Methodist Church at Adabraka in Accra. He enjoyed football and playing of Tennis. Due to his love for sports especially football, he was a supporter and a major shareholder in the football club, the Accra Hearts of Oak S.C. 
The Ghanaian government renamed the Moree Senior High School as Amissah-Arthur Senior High School, Moree in his memory. A learning centre, consisting of a library and an ICT complex, located at Ohawu in the Volta Region was named in his honour. On the occasion of the first anniversary of his death, his family sponsored the establishment of a doctoral fellowship and a research chair at the Department of Economics at the University of Ghana. 
Nabila, and its variant spellings Nabeela, Nabilah, and Nabeelah, is the feminine variation of the given name Nabil, meaning noble. Notable people with the name include: 
His radio career began in 1952 with KOLJ in his native Quanah, Texas.  While attending Texas Christian University, he worked as a disc jockey at KCUL in Fort Worth.  His shows were The House of Wax and The Man on the Beat.  From 1959-1961 he worked for KLIF in Dallas.  He also worked at KILT in Houston. 
At the news department of KOGO in San Diego, Gilliland used the pseudonyms of John Land and Johnny Land. 
 In 1965, Gilliland came to the news department of KRLA radio in Los Angeles County, where he became one of the original members of The Credibility Gap which mixed topical humor along with their news broadcasts.  Fellow founding member Richard Beebe said of him that 
Even though John was an integral part of the "Gap," working on the Pop Chronicles was always number one for him. It seemed like he was always working on it. John was a very talented guy and a lot of fun.
  Gilliland researched this radio documentary, The Pop Chronicles, for over two years prior to its broadcast.  He interviewed many famous musicians for this show.  It covered popular music of the 1950s and 1960s, was originally broadcast on KRLA 1110, later broadcast on many other stations, and now can be heard online. 
Meme is an indie-pop music project created by producer Danny Burke and singer/lyricist Lizzie Brown based in Minneapolis, Minnesota.   
The couple began making music together after-hours at In the Groove Music's studio where Danny Burke works as a producer and songwriter. The group's sound combines Lizzie Brown's ethereal pop voice and sense of melody with Danny Burke's ambient electro-acoustic songs.  The group has been featured on multiple television shows and movies including Jersey Shore, Gossip Girl, From Prada to Nada, and The Real L Word. 
Meme's first self-titled disc was released in the summer of 2010. Their second disc, Primary Colours, was scheduled to release in the summer of 2011. 
This article on a United States band or other musical ensemble is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Attayampatti is a panchayat town located southwest to the Salem City in Salem district, Tamil Nadu, India. 
Attayampatti Lake is one of the chief sources of groundwater supply in the town and is the major source for farming. 
As of 2001[update] India census, Attayampatti had a population of 12,867. Males constitute 52% of the population and females 48%. Attayampatti has an average literacy rate of 64%, which is higher than the national average of 59.5%, with 58% of the males and 42% of females being literate. Of the population, 11% is under 6 years of age.  
Public health centre (Government Hospital) is located at Nainampatty. Police Station and Post Office are available.  Its Postal Index Number is 637501. STD code is 0427.  
Attayampatti is known for its murukku, a snack made of rice flour. Most of the residents in the town make murukku and sell it in front of their house. 
The town has two separate government schools for boys and girls. There are 3 more Private schools here. 
This article related to a location in Salem district, Tamil Nadu, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
She was part of the Greek national team awarded the gold medal at the 2011 World Aquatics Championships which took place in Shanghai in July 2011. 
This biographical article relating to a Greek water polo figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Steven Michael Davies (born 17 June 1986) is an English first-class cricketer, a left-handed batsman who plays for Somerset. He bats in the middle order in first-class cricket and opens in limited-overs. He started as a wicket-keeper, playing ODI and Twenty20 cricket in this role for England and has stated a desire to return to this position. 
Educated at King Charles I School in Kidderminster, Davies began his career playing for Worcestershire in 2001, playing a number of games in second eleven cricket and in the ECB 38-County Cup, and played one C&G Trophy match in each of the following two seasons. In February and March 2004 he appeared for England Under-19s in the Under-19 World Cup in Bangladesh, averaging 55.25 from six innings. 
In 2004 he made his senior Worcestershire debut, in a one-day game against Sri Lanka A. He also played for the England Under-19s in the home series against Bangladesh, and captained the side on tour in India throughout the series of three "Tests" and five "One-Day Internationals". In 2004, too, Davies was awarded the NBC Denis Compton Award. 
Davies made his first-class debut against Loughborough UCCE in April 2005, making 6 and 37 as his county succumbed to an unimpressive eight-wicket defeat. An unsuccessful totesport League match against Nottinghamshire followed a few days later, but nevertheless he opened the batting for Worcestershire in County Championship games against Somerset and Durham. 
After his first call up to the England A squad, Davies scored 192, to date his highest first-class score, against Gloucestershire in June 2006, sharing a partnership worth 345 runs with Vikram Solanki (who scored 222), and also taking five first-innings catches. 
Towards the end of the 2008 domestic season, Davies hit an outstanding run of form in the 40-over Natwest League, in which he both kept wicket and opened the batting; his scores in August were 16 off 18 balls, 103 not out off 100, 59 off 53, 92 off 93, and 119 off 87 (the 103* and 119 being his first two limited overs centuries). This excellent run of form resulted in his inclusion in the England ODI squad for the 2009 tour of West Indies. 
On 14 September 2016, Surrey announced that Davies had turned down a new contract so would leave the club at the end of the season. Davies then signed a three-year deal with Somerset, with the aim of returning to both wicket-keeping and international cricket. 
On 19 September 2005 Davies was named in the 17-man ECB National Academy squad. In March 2006, he was called up to the England A squad to replace Chris Read, who had returned home after a burglary at his house. He was named in the England A squad touring Bangladesh in 2007. 
He made his Twenty20 International debut for England, opening the batting along with Ravi Bopara against the West Indies in Port of Spain on 15 March 2009, top-scoring with 27 from 21 balls as England reached 55 for 1, before collapsing to 121 all out. 
In October 2009, Davies was called up to England's Test squad for the first time. Geoff Miller, England's chairman of selectors, said "Steven is a player of great potential who has been a consistent performer for his county and he will act as understudy to Matt Prior in South Africa". Although part of the Test squad, Davies was not selected for the ODI squad on the tour. 
Davies had to wait until England toured the UAE in January 2012 for a recall. He was included as cover for Prior in the 16-man squad to face Pakistan in three Tests. 
Davies is openly gay; he came out publicly on 27 February 2011 in an interview with The Daily Telegraph. He had come out to his family five years earlier and was also already out to his teammates. He became the first male international cricketer to come out as gay. 
Tutti Pazzi Per Amore is an Italian television series that aired on Rai 1 from December 7, 2008 to January 1, 2012, consisting of three seasons. 
The show is set in Rome and follows the love story between a single father, Paolo Giorgi, and a single mother, Laura Del Fiore, and the adventures of the extended family that originates from their relationship.  The main characters are Paolo Giorgi and his daughter Cristina, Laura Del Fiore and her son Emanuele and her daughter Nina. Around these main characters develops the story of their grandparents, their uncles and aunts, their colleagues and friends. 
In 2009 Tutti Pazzi Per Amore has won the Premio Regia Televisiva in the category best fiction. For her portrayal of Lea, the actress Sonia Bergamasco has received the prize for best actress in a supporting role at the RomaFictionFest 2009. 
This article relating to the superfamily Copromorphoidea is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
By the 19th century, the standard form for playing cards had become fixed in most of Europe and America.  French cards used hearts, diamonds, spades and clubs.  German cards used acorns, leaves, hearts and bells.  It was at this time that designers in Germany, France and England began to draw small figures around the pips. 
An article entitled "Playing Card Squiggles." was published in the December 1910 issue of Strand Magazine.  Several Cotta cards were pictured, erroneously attributed to an unnamed French artist.  Strand subsequently asked its readers to submit their own designs for card squiggles, which the magazine periodically published.  John Butler Yeats was one of the first to contribute a card design to the magazine.  The feature remained popular for some time. 
Some[who?] have estimated that around 70 different transformation decks were created throughout the entire nineteenth century, which by modern standards is a relatively small number. This period of time also witnessed progression with this art-form. By the late 19th century more colourful and creative transformation decks by Vanity Fair and Harlequin appeared, which showed pips incorporated into artwork that depicted people dining, skating, playing tennis and riding bicycles. 
Transformation playing cards like Art for the Earth by The Friends of the Earth and Under the Sea by the Marine Stewardship Counsel, are created for charity purposes, with different artists contributing art for each card.  Similarly, other collective projects like Ultimate Deck from Dan & Dave and Stranger & Stranger or the series from Black Rock Collective brings multiple artists together to create semi-transformation decks. 
With the advent of Kickstarter and other crowdfunded websites, individual artists are more easily able to bring transformation and semi-transformation decks to the public. 
This biographical article relating to a Canadian ice hockey defenceman born in the 1910s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
It is a part of the parish of Audley Rural, which comprises Audley, Bignall End, Wood Lane, Miles Green, Halmer End and Alsagers Bank. 
There are two public houses, The Swan (or "the duck") on Chapel Street and the Plough on Ravens Lane.  Bignall End Working Men's Club was demolished and had residential accommodation built on it. Audley Football Club is also in Bignall End. 
In 1851, Bignall End was described as having "a number of scattered houses and cottages, one mile E of Audley, and several collieries". 
Three England cricketers, Jack Ikin, Bob Taylor and Kim Barnett have played for Bignall End Cricket Club 
"I Want My Life Back" is a song written by Frank Myers and Anthony L. Smith, and recorded by American country music artist Bucky Covington.  It was released in April 2009 as the fourth single of his career, and the lead-off single from his album I'm Alright, which went unreleased when his label folded.  The single was later included as part of Good Guys, Covington's formal second studio album in 2012. 
"I Want My Life Back" is a ballad, backed primarily with percussion, strings, and steel guitar. The narrator describes a homeless man he meets, who doesn't want food or money, but instead longs for the pleasures of life that were taken away from him (such as his job and his home). 
"I Want My Life Back" debuted at number 58 on the U.S. Billboard Hot Country Songs chart for the week of April 18, 2009. The song entered the Top 40 of the country charts for the chart week of May 29, 2009 and reached a peak of number 32 in June 2009.  
In theology, he was a supporter of Lutheran orthodoxy and starkly rejected liberal theology and rationalistic interpretation of the Bible. 
This biographical article about a Polish religious figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Up2Us, doing business as Up2Us Sports, is a sport-based youth development non-profit organization founded in 2010 dedicated to supporting young people through sport. Through their national coach program, Up2Us identifies, trains and supports coaches, many of whom serve as AmeriCorps members, to work with young people in underserved communities around the country. Their training teaches strategies for coaches to work with young people who have dealt with trauma. 
Street Soccer USA is a non-profit organization under the umbrella of HELP USA that promotes the growth and development of a national network of grassroots soccer programs to achieve social change. SSUSA aims to get homeless men, women, and youth off the streets through innovative, sports-based solutions to eradicate homelessness and poverty in the United States. As of 2010, SSUSA has 18 teams across the United States. 
Reviving Baseball in Inner Cities (RBI) is a youth baseball program operated by Major League Baseball.  This youth initiative is designed to provide young people from underserved and diverse communities the opportunity to play baseball and softball.  The program was created by John Young in 1989 in Los Angeles, and now serves more than 200 communities. 
CityLax is based in New York City. Since the organization started in 2005, it has described itself as "school-centric." CityLax functions on the idea that schools are the best environment for students and athletes alike to build on their abilities and work towards self-improvement. The organization brings lacrosse into the public school sphere to provide more opportunities to learn, both on and off the field. 
Play for Life International, founded in 2007, helps over 700 children per year. The organization provides a secure community for at-risk children. As stated on the website, "We give children a safe place to play while fighting the battle of idle time." 
Cricket for Change, founded in 1981 in the UK, has had thirty years of impacting the lives of disadvantaged children. 
Hoops 4 Hope is a non-profit organization in South Africa that uses basketball to help children from underserved areas become proactive leaders in their individual lives and in their communities. It has been in existence for over 15 years. Hoops 4 Hope, in conjunction with its sister organization Soccer 4 Hope, has given 10,000 children the opportunity to participate in sports. 
Peace Players International has been working for almost a decade "to unite, educate and inspire young people in divided communities through basketball". There are 52,000 children involved in South Africa, Northern Ireland, Israel and the West Bank and Cyprus. 
The curriculum has a grounding in academic research and is based on classical learning theories. Sporting activities and games are structured into each session to make them fun and appealing to children. Sessions are designed to represent real-life situations and challenges so children are able to relate these back to their daily lives. 
Rugby League Against Violence (RLAV) is an organisation that operates in both Australia and Papua New Guinea, using rugby league as a vehicle for development. It aims to change attitudes towards women and promote respectful relationships as a way of reducing levels of family, gender-based and domestic violence in both nations. 
Building extensive networks in the private, governmental and non-governmental sectors in addition to composing a solid organisational framework and acquiring the appropriate resources is the recipe to success. There are foundations internationally that offer grants. 
The Tripartite Indenture of 1856, was an agreement between the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, the City of Boston, and the Boston Water Power Company signed December 11, 1856.  The agreement settled the plan for the development of Boston's Back Bay, then a tidal flat.  
The compromise is particularly significant because the decisions of the parties have had lasting impacts today.  As part of the agreement, land was set aside for specific purposes, including the parks and public institutions that are now a part of Back Bay.  It also heavily influenced the grid-and-alleyway system that is today part of the Commonwealth Avenue neighborhood. Now established as a residential-only district. 
This article relating to the history of the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ro-63, originally named Submarine No. 84, was an Imperial Japanese Navy Type L submarine of the L4 subclass. First commissioned in 1924, she served in the waters of Japan prior to World War II. During World War II, she operated in the Central Pacific and took part in the Aleutian Islands campaign, then in late 1942 was relegated to a role as a training ship and tender for midget submarines. After the war ended in 1945, she surrendered to the Allies, who scuttled her in 1946. 
On 10 December 1928, Submarine Division 24 was transferred back to the Sasebo Naval District and began service in the Sasebo Defense Division. Ro-63 was decommissioned  on 10 March 1929 and placed in reserve at Maizuru, but was recommissioned on 29 June 1929. While proceeding to Sasebo, Japan, on 13 November 1929 after conducting diving exercises with Ro-64, Ro-63 collided off Sasebo with the small Japanese motor vessel Segawa Maru, suffering minor damage to her starboard bow. 
Submarine Division 24 returned to duty in Submarine Squadron 1 in the 1st Fleet on 30 November 1929. It transferred back to the Sasebo Naval District on 1 December 1930 and began a stint in the Sasebo Defense Division on 1 December 1931. Ro-63 again was decommissioned on 1 December 1932 and placed in reserve at Maizuru. 
Ro-63 departed Kwajalein on 7 January 1942 and called at Truk in the Caroline Islands from 11 to 15 January before getting back underway in company with Ro-64 and Ro-68 to conduct a reconnaissance of Rabaul on New Britain in the Admiralty Islands. She then patrolled south of Cape St. George on New Ireland before returning to Truk on 29 January 1942. 
After her repairs were completed, Ro-63 departed Maizuru on 5 June 1942, arrived at Saipan on 13 June, and then made for Truk. Recalled to Japan, she departed Truk on 27 June 1942 bound for Yokosuka, Japan, which she reached on 4 July 1942. 
On 14 September 1942, Ro-63 was anchored at Kiska when American aircraft raided the base. She submerged to avoid attack, but a bomb a United States Army Air Forces Eleventh Air Force B-24 Liberator dropped nonetheless damaged one of her periscopes while she was underwater. Submarine Division 33 was attached directly to the 51st Base Unit at Kiska on 15 September 1942, and Ro-63 carried out another Aleutians patrol from 22 to 24 September 1942. 
While Ro-63 was at Kiska on 25 September 1942, Submarine Division 33 was reassigned to the Kure Naval District. Ro-63, Ro-64, and Ro-68 departed Kiska on 26 September 1942 bound for Maizuru, where they arrived on 5 October 1942. 
Ro-63 departed Maizuru on 6 November 1942 and arrived at Kure on 8 November 1942. Thereafter, Submarine Division 33 was assigned to training duties in the Kure Naval District. It was assigned to the Kure Submarine Squadron on 1 December 1943. 
The Japanese struck Ro-63 from the Navy list on 20 November 1945. Allied forces scuttled her in the Iyo Nada in the Seto Inland Sea in May 1946. 
Apolabis is a genus of earwigs in the subfamily Anisolabidinae. It was cited by Srivastava in Part 2 of Fauna of India. 
The 2000 Ivy League Baseball Championship Series took place at Bill Clarke Field in Princeton, New Jersey on May 6, 2000.  The series matched the regular season champions of each of the league's two divisions.  Princeton, the winner of the series, claimed their second title and the Ivy League's automatic berth in the 2000 NCAA Division I Baseball Tournament.   It was Princeton's fifth appearance in the Championship Series, all of which were consecutive. 
On June 14, 2018, Poulianitis left Aris and joined Kymis of the Greek Basket League. On August 16, 2019, Poulianitis signed a two-year deal with Kolossos Rodou, but only spent one season with them.  
After winning the 2nd division championship with Apollon Patras in the 2020-2021 season, Poulianitis agreed to return to Aris on August 11, 2021. 
Poulianitis was a member of the Greek junior national teams. With the junior national teams of Greece, Poulianitis played at the 2011 FIBA Europe Under-16 Championship, the 2014 FIBA Europe Under-20 Championship, and the 2015 FIBA Europe Under-20 Championship. 
Poulianitis has origin from Trikala. His father Vangelis is a former basketball player who played in the Greek Basketball League with Panellinios and Philippos Thessaloniki. 
This biographical article relating to a Greek basketball figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Annweiler has a primary school and a secondary school ( Staatliche Realschule Annweiler ) which was a partner school with the William Lovell Secondary School in Stickney, Lincolnshire. There is also a school for people with learning disabilities and a vocational school and the Trifels-Gymnasium evangelical grammar school. 
Lorna Margaret Hutson, FBA (born 27 November 1958) is the ninth Merton Professor of English Literature and a fellow of Merton College, Oxford. Together with Professor John Hudson, she is a director of the Centre for Medieval and Early Modern Law and Literature at the University of St Andrews. 
Hutson was born in Berlin, in what was then West Germany, on 27 November 1958, to John Whiteford Hutson, a British career diplomat, and his wife, Doris Kemp. She attended St Hilary's School, Edinburgh and Tormead School, Guildford. She studied at Somerville College, Oxford graduating with an MA (Hons) with first class honours, and received a DPhil in 1983. 
In 2016 she was elected as a fellow of the British Academy, in May gave the British Academy's Shakespeare Lecture, and in September took up the post of Merton Professor of English Literature, becoming a fellow of Merton College, Oxford. 
The Medicine Wheel/Medicine Mountain National Historic Landmark (formerly known as the Bighorn Medicine Wheel) is a medicine wheel located in the Bighorn National Forest, in the U.S. state of Wyoming. The Medicine Wheel at Medicine Mountain is a large stone structure made of local white limestone laid upon a bedrock of limestone. It is both a place of sacred ceremony and scientific inquiry. In Native Science these uses are not distinguished as separate as they are in Western science. 
The cultural history of the Big Horn Mountains, home to the Big Horn Medicine Wheel, dates back over ten thousand years. 
The Arapaho call the Big Horn Medicine Wheel "Hiieeinoonotii." A detailed account of ceremonial use of the Bighorn Medicine Wheel by the Arapaho was related in 1993 by Paul Moss in a landmark of Native American oral tradition. 
Tom Yellowtail (Crow) told the story of Burnt Face building a medicine wheel in the Bighorn Mountains and receiving help from the Little People. After the Little People healed his face, Burnt Face came down from the Bighorns, rejoined his people, and built what is now called the Fort Smith Wheel. This Wheel has similar stellar and solar alignments to the Big Horn Medicine Wheel, adjusted for landscape changes and latitude. 
Further, he found that cairn pairs FO, FA, and FB correspond to the rising points of the stars Sirius, Aldebaran, and Rigel, respectively. Observing the first yearly heliacal rising of these stars would have been an effective tool for determining the progress of the solar year, as the first heliacal rise of a star occurs on the same date (relative to the solstices) each year. 
In 1903, Stephen Simms of the Chicago Field Museum published a scientific paper on his visit to the Wheel. His diagram looks only slightly similar to the Big Horn Medicine Wheel that is now a Historic Landmark.  More than one medicine wheel existed in the Bighorn Mountains previous to 1916. Cut Ear, a Crow guide, would accompany people to wheels in the Bighorn Mountains. One article in the Sheridan Post talks of finding another wheel about 60miles from the first wheel. 
The site was declared a National Historic Landmark in 1970, and renamed as the Medicine Wheel/Medicine Mountain National Historic Landmark in 2011. 
Like most Australian Cryptocarya fruit, removal of the fleshy aril is advised to assist seed germination, which is slow but reliable with Cryptocarya rigida. 
"Beloved" is a single by VNV Nation from their album Futureperfect. It was released in 2002, with the release of the album. 
Egan Frantz (born 1986) is an American artist. He is known for producing large-scale, abstract paintings wherein passages of vivid color stand out sharply against measured visual fields. 
This article about a painter from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Crimson Lake received its name from the striking colours of the setting sun reflecting on the surface of its waters seen by an earlier trapper. It is a small, clear, shallow lake set in the meeting spot of foothills pine forests, aspen parkland, bog and muskeg ecosystems. Located on the northeast shore of the lake is Pioneer Ranch Camp, a Christian summer camp within the park's boundaries. 
Crimson Lake Provincial Parks offers many recreational activities. There is a public access, groomed beach along the shores of Crimson Lake. Located very near to the beach is a public campground and numerous day access areas. 
Twin Lakes offers fishing, ice fishing and boating. Fish species include Fathead Minnow, Northern Pike, Pearl Dave, Rainbow Trout, White Sucker, and Yellow Perch. 
Crimson Lake's campground offers 169 units. Equipped with showers, washrooms, firewood, a playground, boat launch and sewage disposal, 62 of the campsites have power hookups. Recycling bins are located at garbage stations. Pets must be kept on leashes. Fire wood can be bought daily and cutting from live trees can result in a fine. There are three picnic shelters and four creative play areas. 
Bird watching in the reeds along the lakeside is common as the park has populations of sandhill cranes, boreal owls, northern pygmy-owls, greater yellowlegs, western tangers and solitary sandpipers.  Fish species in Twin Lakes include Fathead Minnow, Northern Pike, Pearl Dave, Rainbow Trout, White Sucker, and Yellow Perch. 
In the summer months, black bears are frequent within the park and nearby areas. Occasionally grizzly bears are sighted as well. Bear safety is important and park conservation officers are available to share information and safety brochures. Moose and deer are abundant and commonly viewed. The area also has beaver, red squirrel, shrew and occasionally cougars. 
Boating is a very common pastime on Crimson Lake. Because Crimson lake is located in a marshy landscape the leach population is high but that does not stop people from swimming. 
Colchester United Football Club is an English football club based in Colchester, Essex. Formed in 1937 from the remnants of the former Colchester Town football club, United competed in the Southern Football League from their foundation until 1950, when they were elected to the Football League. 
Ex-England international centre-half Jimmy Allen took over in 1948 and led Colchester to Football League election in the summer of 1950. 
Fenton's replacement was former Stoke City and England centre-half Neil Franklin. His spell in charge saw Colchester bounce between the Third and Fourth Divisions, and he was sacked following his second relegation to Division Four. 
When Colchester United held its annual general meeting in September 1972, Graham was so incensed of the questioning of his team and tactics by a shareholder that he tendered his resignation. A month later, Jim Smith was appointed manager, who had led Boston United to the Northern Premier League title. Smith later left to join Second Division side Blackburn Rovers in the summer of 1975. His coach Bobby Roberts was appointed manager. 
Under Roberts' stewardship, Colchester were relegated from the Third Division in his first season in charge, but made another immediate return the following season. Following another relegation in 1981, and a drop in form in the Fourth Division, Roberts was asked to resign in April 1982. He refused and was sacked a month later. 
Steve Wignall was named as new Colchester manager in January 1995. Under Wignall's management, the U's finished as runners-up in the 1997 Football League Trophy Final and won promotion via the 1998 Football League Third Division play-off Final. Wignall quit in 1999 citing that he had taken his team as far as he could and was frustrated at the role agents were playing in transfer deals he was trying to set up. 
Ghislain N'Clomande Konan (born 27 December 1995) is an Ivorian professional footballer who plays as a left-back for French Ligue 1 club Stade de Reims and the Ivory Coast national team. 
This biographical article related to football in Ivory Coast is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Born in Acquaviva Palace in Caserta, where the royal family lived before the Royal Palace of Caserta was built, he was the fifth son of Charles III of Spain and Maria Amalia of Saxony. A humanist devoted to arts, he bore a striking resemblance to his elder brother Charles IV. At the death of his uncle Ferdinand VI of Spain, who he never met, his parents, brothers Charles and Gabriel, and sisters Maria Luisa and Maria Josefa departed for Spain where his father ruled as Charles III. 
He headed the Junta Suprema de Gobierno, in the absence of his brother and nephew, when they tried to humor Napoleon in Bayonne. 
After 14 years at the club, Lykkegaard took the trip all the way from the youth rank s to the first team squad, where he got his professional debut in the Danish Superliga against FC Copenhagen on 13 December 2020. Lykkegaard started on the bench, before replacing Daniel Svensson in the 78th minute. Lykkegaard did also play in the following league game against FC Midtjylland. Those two games was his only professional appearances in the 2020-21 season. 
Construction of the power station started on 1 February 1990 and the first unit was commissioned on 31 July 1993.[citation needed] It was constructed and credited by the China National Machinery and Equipment Import and Export Corporation. 
 Rarities is the name of two separate and unrelated compilation albums by the English rock band the Beatles. The first was released in the United Kingdom in December, 1978, while the second album was issued in the United States in March, 1980. 
Rarities is a British compilation album featuring a selection of songs by The Beatles. The album was originally released as part of The Beatles Collection, a box set featuring all other Beatles records, but was later released individually. The album has not been released on CD, but all of the tracks are available on the double CD compilation Past Masters. 
Rarities was conceived to include lesser-known songs that were not included on any other original Beatles album. These included B-sides of singles, two German-language recordings, the tracks from an EP with exclusive material, a song recorded for the American market and a version of "Across the Universe" that had previously appeared on a World Wildlife Fund charity record. 
The album was released on 2 November 1978 in the UK, as part of the British edition of The Beatles Collection box set. On 12 October 1979, Rarities was issued as a stand-alone album in the United Kingdom. 
The US pressing of Rarities included in the limited edition numbered boxed set of The Beatles Collection contained "I Want to Hold Your Hand" rather than "Komm, Gib Mir Deine Hand," and "She Loves You" rather than "Sie Liebt Dich". 
Although the Capitol Rarities album was geared towards the American market, it was also issued in several other countries, including Australia, Canada, France, Japan and New Zealand. The Rarities album has not been released on compact disc. All but three of the tracks were subsequently made available on other Beatles CDs, such as the Beatles' 2009 mono and stereo box sets. 
The Lewisville Leopards are an American professional basketball team based out of Lewisville, Texas, and a member of The Basketball League (TBL). 
On August 18, 2019, Evelyn Magley, CEO of The Basketball League (TBL), announced a new franchise called the Lewisville Yellow Jackets sponsored and owned by Creating Young Minds located in Lewisville, Texas. Creating Young Minds also operates CYM Academy, a high school and amateur team. The team was renamed the Lewisville Leopards following their inaugural pandemic-shortened season. 
Note: Flags indicate national team eligibility at FIBA sanctioned events. Players may hold other non-FIBA nationality not displayed. 
Jin employs extremely complex tone sandhi, or tone changes that occur when words are put together into phrases. The tone sandhi of Jin is notable in two ways among Chinese varieties:[citation needed] 
In addition, there are a number of words in Jin that evolved, evidently, by splitting a mono-syllabic word into two, adding an 'l' in between (cf. Ubbi Dubbi, but with /l/ instead of /b/). For example: 
Some dialects of Jin make a three-way distinction in demonstratives. (Modern English, for example, has only a two-way distinction between "this" and "that", with "yon" being archaic.) 
A Greek inscription on the wall of one of the town's oldest churches (Saint John the Baptist) testifies to the existence of an ancient Greek settlement under the name Aiginion. 
It was named "Kalabaka" six or seven centuries ago. It is of Turkish origin and means "powerful fortress". It has been Anglicized variously as Kalampaka, Kalambaka or Kalabaki.[citation needed] 
The town is situated at the foot of the Meteora peaks. It is inhabited by an important native-indigenous community of Greek Vlachs. 
Born in Nazareth during the Ottoman era, A-Dahar was a member of Nazareth's city council for thirty years. In 1959 he was elected to the Knesset on the Progress and Development list. He retained his seat in the 1961 elections, but lost it in the 1965 elections. He died in 1984. 
Set in the fictional town of Ramville near North Bay, Ontario, the series focuses on Gordie, Julie, Maureen and Christian, four members of the fan club for the town's senior hockey team, the Radiateurs Dufresne. 
This article about a television show originating in Canada is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Sergio Lasam Utleg, D.D., (born in Solana, Cagayan, September 11, 1943), is a prelate of the Roman Catholic Church in the Philippines.  He is the former Archbishop of Tuguegarao in Tuguegarao, Philippines and succeeded Archbishop Diosdado Talamayan. On October 18, 2019, his resignation was accepted by Pope Francis, appointing Alaminos Bishop Ricardo Baccay as his successor. 
Sergio Utleg was ordained priest of Tuguegarao, Philippines on March 30, 1968. He was ordained Bishop on March 17, 1997 in St. Peter's Cathedral, Tuguegarao, Cagayan. He then succeeded as Bishop of Ilagan on July 26, 1999. Then-Bishop Utleg was appointed by Pope Benedict XVI as Bishop of Laoag on November 26, 2006. 
On June 16, 2011, Pope Benedict XVI has elevated Laoag Bishop Sergio Utleg to Archbishop of Tuguegarao replacing retiring Archbishop Diosdado Talamayan. His resignation was accepted by Pope Francis on October 18, 2019, appointing Alaminos Bishop Ricardo Baccay as his successor as Archbishop of Tuguegarao. 
The two sides of the coat of arms are divided in the middle by blue wavy lines. The right side is the personal seal of the Archbishop. 
Yoon Sang-chul (born June 14, 1965) is a former South Korean footballer. During the course of his career, he played for only one club, FC Seoul. He was the first player to score 100 goals in the K League. 
A. F. M. Abdur Rahman (born 5 July 1951) is a retired justice of the High Court Division of the Supreme Court of Bangladesh. He was elevated to the High Court Division as additional judge on 27 April 2003, and was confirmed as a permanent judge on 27 April 2005 by the then President of Bangladesh Iajuddin Ahmed. Rahman retired from the bench on 4 July 2018. 
Rahman was born on 5 July 1951 in East Bengal, Dominion of Pakistan (now Gazaria Upazila, Munshiganj District, Bangladesh) to Dr. Abdul Gaffer Khan and Mosammat Mohsena Begum. 
He earned an LLB degree from Central Law College, Dhaka in 1977, and obtained a second LLB with honors from the University of London. 
Rahman was enrolled as an advocate of the District Court on 3 February 1979, the High Court Division on 16 September 1982, and the Appellate Division of the Supreme Court of Bangladesh on 14 January 2000. He describes his field of practice as civil law, banking law, admiralty law, company matters, writ petitions, and arbitration. 
He was elevated to the High Court Division as an additional judge on 27 April 2003, and was confirmed as a permanent judge on 27 April 2005. He retired from the bench on 4 July 2018. 
Compsolechia amazonica is a moth of the family Gelechiidae. It was described by Edward Meyrick in 1918. It is found in Amazonas, Brazil. 
In addition to the elections held in 36 states, elections were also held in the unincorporated territories of Guam and the United States Virgin Islands. The Democrats held their seat in the United States Virgin Islands, while the Republicans won an open seat in Guam previously held by the Democrats. 
This election marked the most recent cycle in which New York and Colorado elected Republican governors. 
Kinney and his thugs specialized in armed robbery, burglary, and extortion. Snake's biggest early rival was George "Baldy" Higgins, an alcoholic sadist who was jealous of Snake's success. Kinney killed Higgins in a street fight in the early morning hours of September 20, 1896. Snake was acquitted on a charge of self-defense. Kinney eventually married Tom Egan's sister Catherine, with whom he had a daughter named Florence. 
Tom Kinney was defeated in November 1910 for a U.S. Congress seat, and soon after was diagnosed with tuberculosis, from which he died of on May 15, 1912. Kinney's brother-in-law Tom Egan suspected his 1910 defeat was the result of a double-crossing political ally named Michael Gill, who betrayed Snake to advance his own ambitions. Egan and his goons complied such a large tally for Gill's opponent in the 1912 election, the congressman was speechless upon his defeat. 
The gang that Snake Kinney helped found endured as the most powerful St. Louis criminal organization until the early 1920s. 
One of Gallot's works was transcribed for orchestra by Ottorino Respighi as part of his suite Gli Uccelli. 
In an eight-season career, Barbare was a .260 hitter with one home run and 156 RBI in 500 games played. 
A solid infielder with a strong arm and a light bat, Barbare was a utility man with the Indians, Red Sox and Pirates in a span of six seasons. In 1921 he was sent to the Braves in the same trade that brought star shortstop Rabbit Maranville to Pittsburgh, and he responded with a career year, hitting .302 in 134 games. 
This biographical article relating to an American baseball shortstop is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to an American baseball third baseman is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 2006 NESTEA European Championship Final (or the 2006 European Beach Volleyball Championships,) was held from August 25 to August 28, 2006 in The Hague, Netherlands. It was the fourteenth official edition of the men's event, which started in 1993, while the women competed for the thirteenth time. 
The 1976 United States Senate election in New Jersey was held on November 2, 1976. Incumbent Democrat Harrison A. Williams defeated Republican nominee David F. Norcross with 60.66% of the vote. 
Lewis was the creator of Zarjaz, editing its first four issues during which time it won the National Comics Award for Best Independent Comic.  He wrote and lettered several strips, interviewed Alan Grant and Frazer Irving and wrote a major piece on breaking into comics writing which featured advice from a range of leading editors, writers and artists. 
For UK science fiction comic 2000 AD, Andrew Lewis wrote the Future Shocks 'Goldie Locke and the Three B.E.A.R.S.' and 'Escape'. 
Lewis also reviewed comics for Comics International, and from 2006 to 2007 was a daily contributor to Mike Read's morning show on Big L (Radio London International) radio station, where he was known as 'Lord Tosh' or 'Lord Top Notch of Tosh'. 
In 2002 Zarjaz won the "Best Self-Published/Independent" National Comics Award at the annual Bristol Comic Festival and came second to Jack Staff in 2003. 
Humphrey Goudie Hunter was a Scottish amateur football outside right who played in the Scottish League for Queen's Park. He was capped by Scotland at amateur level. 
This biographical article related to association football in Scotland, about a forward born in the 1910s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Aside from his political work, Filali was head of the Maghreb office of the International Labour Organization in Algeria. He was also on the board of directors for the Studies Center of Arab Unity in Beirut. 
This article related to members of the insect family Tachinidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
ISO 3166-2:SH is the entry for Saint Helena, Ascension and Tristan da Cunha in ISO 3166-2, part of the ISO 3166 standard published by the International Organization for Standardization (ISO), which defines codes for the names of the principal subdivisions (e.g., provinces or states) of all countries coded in ISO 3166-1. 
Currently for Saint Helena, Ascension and Tristan da Cunha, ISO 3166-2 codes are defined for 3 geographical entities. 
Each code consists of two parts, separated by a hyphen. The first part is SH, the ISO 3166-1 alpha-2 code of Saint Helena, Ascension and Tristan da Cunha. The second part is two letters. 
Ascension Island and Tristan da Cunha, previously dependencies of Saint Helena but raised to equal status in 2009, are exceptionally reserved the ISO 3166-1 alpha-2 codes AC and TA respectively on the request of the Universal Postal Union. 
Subdivision names are listed as in the ISO 3166-2 standard published by the ISO 3166 Maintenance Agency (ISO 3166/MA). 
In the first edition of ISO 3166-2, the following codes were defined for 1 administrative area and 2 dependencies, but they are no longer defined since the second edition (ISO 3166-2:2007, published on 2007-12-13). 
 Alison Moore (born 1971) is an English writer. Born in Manchester, she lives in Leicestershire. She is an honorary lecturer in the School of English at the University of Nottingham. 
Before The Lighthouse, Moore had written and published several short stories, including 'Static', shortlisted for the inaugural Manchester Fiction Prize, and 'When the Door Closed, It Was Dark', published as a chapbook by Nightjar Press and included in Best British Short Stories 2011. Much of this work is collected in The Pre-War House and Other Stories, whose title story won first prize in the novella category of the New Writer Prose and Poetry Prizes 2009. 
Her second novel, He Wants, was published in 2014. Both The Lighthouse and He Wants were Observer Books of the Year. In 2018, Moore published her fourth novel, Missing, and a chapter book for children, Sunny and the Ghosts, which became the first in a trilogy, illustrated by Ross Collins. 
"The best novels are the ones that leave you with a sense of yearning, and in He Wants, Alison Moore proves her mastery of the medium." (Lynsey May, The List) 
"Moore masterfully dials up the tension throughout, leading to an unexpected finale that feels both inevitable and deliciously satisfying." (Colette Maitland, The New Quarterly) 
"There are books which, when you finish reading them, force you to stop everything for a moment to acknowledge their excellence, to mark a personal encounter with something special. Missing is one of those books" (Nina Allan, The Spider's House) 
"There is humour and kindness alongside the mischief and mystery. A delightful and satisfying read for any age." (Jackie Law, Never Imitate) 
Pristimantis helvolus (in Spanish: rana pierniamarilla) is a species of frog in the family Craugastoridae. It is endemic to Colombia. Its natural habitat is tropical moist montane forests. It is threatened by habitat loss. 
The son of Samuel Adolphus Theodore Self, a tram conductor, Henry Self was born in Fulham, London, and educated at Bancroft's School, Woodford Green. 
Prior to his civil service career, he was employed as a dishwasher on the Fulham Road. During the Second World War, he was part of the British Air Commission in America. Initially he was the air representative to the British Purchasing Commission which was purchasing all kinds of armaments and war materiel in the US. 
Post war, Self became Permanent Secretary to the Ministry of Civil Aviation, replacing Sir William Hildred. 
Already a Companion of the Order of the Bath, he was made Knight Commander of the Order of the British Empire in the King's 1939 Birthday Honours list. He was invested as a Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath in 1947. 
The frigate tuna, frigate mackerel or alagaduwa (Auxis thazard) is a species of tuna, in the family Scombridae, found around the world in tropical oceans. The eastern Pacific population is now regarded as a separate species by some authorities, Auxis brachydorax. 
Jelleke Veenendaal (born 15 December 1953 in Alkmaar) is a Dutch politician. She was a member of the House of Representatives for the People's Party for Freedom and Democracy (VVD) between 2003 and 2006. She was one of the three candidates in the 2006 VVD leadership election, but obtained only 803 votes (3%). 
In this period she had already become active within the VVD, as secretary of the Purmerend branch, and as member of the board of the party's women organisation. She also took courses in liberalism and liberal politics, and in political communication from the Haya van Someren Foundation, which trains the VVD members on request. She also was member of the board of the NVVH, the Dutch Association of Home Makers. 
In 2003 she entered the House of Representatives. She was not on an eligible position, but after the formation, many VVD MPs had become minister, leaving their parliamentary seats. In parliament she was member of the backbench, and spokesperson for housing policy. In 2005 she proposed a plan together with social-democratic MP, Staf Depla. She also pleaded for a more lenient policy towards permanent housing in vacation houses. 
The W. & L. E. Gurley Building is a historic industrial building in Troy, New York, United States. Built in 1862, it is a classical revival structure that housed the W. & L. E. Gurley Company, a maker of precision measuring instruments.  The Gurley Company was one of the first companies in the nation to make precision instruments.  The building was designated a National Historic Landmark in recognition of this in 1983. 
The Julius Hanks foundry was purchased by the W. & L. E. Gurley Company in 1852, and was destroyed in the Great Troy Fire of 1862. The W. & L. E. Gurley Building was built in "an amazing feat of construction" in just 8 months to replace the previous building.  Originally, the first floor space was used for retail with the third and fourth floors leased to other manufacturers. Gradually, Gurley expanded to use the entire buildings. 
The company, run by William Gurley and his brother, Lewis Ephraim, were leaders in the field and published a regularly updated manual of instruments and their operations and were engaged in producing military products for the American Civil War, which included "brass fuse-plugs for naval projectiles and an improved type of brass trimming for saddle trees." In the 1960s, the company was acquired by Teledyne Company, and was sold again in 1993 and continues as Gurley Precision Instruments today. 
The building was declared a National Historic Landmark in 1983. The building is currently rented by Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute, and houses its Lighting Research Center, which moved there in 2000, and a few acoustics labs associated with the school of architecture as well as the Human Resources department . Gurley Precision Instruments still occupies the first floor of the building and the entire building directly across the street. 
Originally, the first floor space was used for retail with the third and fourth floors leased to other manufacturers. Gradually, Gurley expanded to use the entire buildings. 
This biographical article related to a Mexican association football goalkeeper is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Nepal Rastriya Janamukti Morcha Party was founded in Kathmandu on 6 May 1990. The party contested the 1991 general elections with a man as their electoral symbol. The party merged with Rastriya Jana Party on 20 January 1992 and renamed itself, Rastriya Janamukti Party also adopting a house as its electoral symbol. 
The party's first General Convention was held in Kathmandu from 10 June to 12 June 1996. The general convention elected Malbar Singh Thapa as the party's first president and Gore Bahadur Khapangi as the party's first general secretary. 
In the 1999 parliamentary election, the Rastriya Janamukti Party fielded 130 candidates and got 92,567 votes but none of their candidates were elected. During the party's second General Convention in Butwal, Malbar Singh Thapa and Gore Bahadur Khapangi were reelected to their posts. 
The party held its third General Convention in Lalitpur from 3 March to 5 March 2006. Malbar Singh Thapa was reelected as the party's president and Bayan Singh Rai was elected as the general secretary. The party contested the 2008 Constituent Assembly election and won 2 seats through proportional representation. 
The party then held its fourth General Convention in Kawasoti and Malbar Singh Thapa was reelected party president and Keshav Suryavanshi was elected general secretary. In the 2013 Constituent Assembly election, the party again won 2 seats through proportional representation. 
The two members in the Constituent Assembly, Shiva Lal Thapa and Sima Kumari BK, quit the party on 2 March 2015 and announced the formation of Rastriya Janamukti Party (Loktantrik). 
In the party's fifth General Convention in Lalitpur, Khadga Prasad Palungwa was elected president and Keshav Suryavanshi was elected general secretary. The party contested the 2017 local elections and won 20 seats in local governments. The party also contested the 2017 legislative and provincial elections but did not win any seats. 
The sister organizations of the Party are called Jana Sangathan (People's Organization). According to the RJP central office, the following are the current sister organizations: 
In addition, teachers, intellectuals, athletes, transport entrepreneurs, and communication/media-related organizations are parties which are closely aligned with Janamukti Thought. 
In 1991, Mbaye launched Dakar Science Biennale and was president of Youth Network For Developpement, a foundation created by Youssou N'Dour. He participated in the foundation of N'Dour's holding, Youssou Ndour Head Office. 
Mbaye was a close friend of Macky Sall, and became Chief of Staff upon Sall's election in 2012. On 29 October 2012, Mbaye succeeded N'Dour as Minister of Culture. He was a founding member of the Alliance for the Republic, Senegal's ruling party since Sall's election. 
Abdoul Aziz Mbaye died of COVID-19 during the COVID-19 pandemic in Senegal on 3 February 2021, at the age of 66. 
Ste and John Pickford (artist and programmer, respectively), also known as the Pickford brothers, are English video game developers and designers, and founders of the indie game company Zee-3. 
The Hajhir massif is a mountain range situated on the island of Socotra, Yemen. It is the highest point of the island. 
Bedouin goatherds have a long history of climbing in the Hajhir. A 2014 study of Soqotri oral storytelling traditions revealed that a number of popular myths recount ascents throughout the range by local goatherds. According to the anthropologist Christopher Elliott, many accounts demonstrate a strong oral chain of transmission that links mythical characters with actual pre-modern ascents. 
Jeffrey Dewsnup (born May 21, 2004) is an American professional soccer player who plays as a goalkeeper for Major League Soccer club Real Salt Lake. 
Born in Herriman, Utah, Dewsnup began playing soccer for a club side in his hometown before joining La Roca FC, a premier club soccer side in the state. In 2018, Dewsnup joined the youth setup at Major League Soccer club Real Salt Lake. He spent the majority of his time in the academy playing with the under-16/17s. On July 11, 2020, Dewsnup was called-in to Real Monarchs, the reserve affiliate for Real Salt Lake, for their match against San Diego Loyal but did not come off the bench. 
On January 12, 2021, Dewsnup signed a professional homegrown player contract with Real Salt Lake, becoming the club's youngest signing in their history. He was also the club's 24th signing from their academy. 
Chouani is a village on the island of Grande Comore in the Comoros. According to the 1991 census, the village had a population of 1723. 
Spelling correction is the process of automatically detecting and correcting spelling errors in search queries. Most spelling correction algorithms are based on a language model, which determines the a priori probability of an intended query, and an error model (typically a noisy channel model), which determines the probability of a particular misspelling, given an intended query. 
Once the attention of the information retrieval field moved to languages other than English, it was found that for some languages there were obvious gains to be found. 
Entity recognition is the process of locating and classifying entities within a text string. Named-entity recognition specifically focuses on named entities, such as names of people, places, and organizations. In addition, entity recognition includes identifying concepts in queries that may be represented by multi-word phrases. Entity recognition systems typically use grammar-based linguistic techniques or statistical machine learning models. 
In July 2007, he left for Padova in co-ownership deal, signed a 2+1 year contract. In June 2008 Padova acquire the remain rights form Messina few weeks before the bankrupt of Messina. He then played 15 league matches for Padova before released on 30 June 2009. Padova won promotion to Serie B in June 2009 
Singles, B-Sides & Live is a compilation album by English rock group Electrelane. It was released on CD in 2006 by Too Pure. Tracks 7, 8 and 9 are from their EP I Want To Be President. 
 T. T. Daniel was an Indian politician and former Member of the Legislative Assembly. He was elected to the Travancore-Cochin assembly as a Tamil Nadu Congress candidate from Colachel constituency in Kanyakumari district in 1954 election. This was the first ever election held in this constituency and it happened before Kanyakumari district merged with Tamil Nadu. 
The 1983 EuroHockey Club Champions Cup was the tenth installment of Europe's premier field hockey club competition. It was won by defending champions Dynamo Almaty on HC Klein Zwitserland in a replay of the past edition's final match, confirming the progress of Soviet hockey. 1976-78 champions Southgate HC attained the third place. 
VVHS is affiliated to Thane Police School. It has 150 teachers and provides facilities for special children with disabilities ranging from cerebral palsy to dyslexia and other learning disorders. 
Vasant Vihar High School was started in 1990 with 35 students in the Amrapali Shopping Arcade with four staff. 
This experiment shows the catalysed decomposition of hydrogen peroxide. Hydrogen peroxide (H2O2) decomposes into water and oxygen gas, which is in the form of foam, but normally the reaction is too slow to be easily perceived or measured: 
In normal conditions, this reaction takes place very slowly, therefore a catalyst is added to speed up the reaction, which will result in rapid formation of foam. The iodide ion from potassium iodide acts as a catalyst and speeds up the reaction while remaining chemically unchanged in the reaction process. The iodide ion changes the mechanism by which the reaction occurs: 
The reaction is exothermic; the foam produced is hot.[specify] A glowing splint can be used to show that the gas produced is oxygen. The rate of foam formation measured in volume per time unit has a positive correlation with the peroxide concentration (v/V%), which means that the more reactants (peroxide concentration) the faster the rate of foam formation. 
AccuRev is a software configuration management application developed by AccuRev, Inc. and was first released in 1999. In December 2013 AccuRev was acquired by Micro Focus. 
The land was acquired by Joseph Medill as a country estate, which he called Red Oaks, in the late 1800s. After his death, the estate passed to his grandson, Colonel McCormick. Colonel McCormick served in World War I and saw action at the Battle of Cantigny. After returning home, he renamed the estate in honor of the battle. 
Colonel McCormick had no children. When he died in 1955, he left his fortune to establish the McCormick Charitable Trust (now the McCormick Foundation). He also directed that Cantigny should be transformed into a park for the use of the general public. Since then, the McCormick Foundation has used the endowment funds bequeathed by Colonel McCormick to operate Cantigny as a public facility. 
On display outside the museum is the area's largest collection of tanks and artillery pieces, known as "Tank Park".  The collection includes tanks and armored vehicles from the First World War up to the present day.  Visitors are allowed to climb on the vehicles. 
The museum's ongoing Date with History series features guest speakers on subjects of interest to the general public and military historians in particular.  Speakers include historians, authors, filmmakers and veterans.  The presentations are generally open to the public and free of charge. 
The museum is also home to the McCormick Research Center, for use by authors, scholars, teachers and students.  The Center's archives contain more than 10,000 works on military history, including secondary works on various battles, campaigns and wars.  Included in the primary works are the bound battle records of the First Division in World War I, and the 1st Infantry Division's World War II battle records on microfilm.  The Center's Reading Room is open to the public. 
Cantigny Park is open to the public and attracts more than 350,000 people per year. Visitors can watch a short welcome film inside the Visitor Center to learn about the park's history and present-day features. The Visitor Center also includes the Cantigny Shop, Bertie's coffee shop and Le Jardin, a sit-down restaurant serving lunch. 
Concerts, lectures, workshops, festivals and special events are held at Cantigny throughout the year. It is also a popular place for weddings and banquets. School field trips and youth group camping are offered by Cantigny, too. 
Colonel McCormick and his first wife, Amy, are buried on the grounds. The elaborate gravesite, near the mansion, is known as the Exedra and was designed by Chicago architect Andrew Rebori. 
The McCormick Museum was used for filming a scene in "A League of Their Own" (1992) from the east end overlooking the fountain and pond east of the museum. Two other movies, "Richie Rich" and "Baby's Day Out" also include scenes from outside the mansion. 
Cantigny Park is located in Wheaton, Illinois, at 1s151 Winfield Road, just south of Illinois Route 38 (Roosevelt Road). The entrance to Cantigny Golf is 27w270 Mack Road, also in Wheaton. 
Haldea striatula (formerly Virginia striatula), commonly called the rough earth snake,  is a species of nonvenomous natricine colubrid snake native to the southeastern United States. 
The species was first described by Carl Linnaeus in 1766, as Coluber striatulus. Over the next two and a half centuries its scientific name has been changed several times (see synonyms). Most recently, the generic name was changed back from Virginia to Haldea in 2013. 
The rough earth snake is found from southern Virginia to northern Florida, west along the Gulf Coast to southern Texas, and north into south-central Missouri and southeastern Kansas. 
The rough earth snake is generally not aggressive towards humans, is not venomous, and is harmless if encountered. Although it has teeth, the rough earth snake normally does not bite. Its response when harassed is to remain motionless, or to try to escape. It will defecate and excrete a foul smelling musk as a defense mechanism to make itself less palatable to would-be predators. If necessary, the rough earth snake can be safely picked up by hand and relocated. 
Ndunda is a minor Mambiloid language of Nigeria. It was discovered by Roger Blench near the Mvanip-speaking town of Zongo Ajiya. Ndunda village is situated about 5 kilometers from Yerimaru, to the south of Zongo Ajiya. It is closely related to but distinct from Mvanip. 
He is a Senior Lecturer in Northwestern University's English Department. At Northwestern, he founded the Creative Non-Fiction writing sequence, which he currently teaches. He is also a Visiting Writer at Lesley University. 
This article about a United States writer of non-fiction is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
U-Neek is the tenth studio album by Jamaican reggae artist Eek-A-Mouse. It had a distinctively different sound compared to his previous  albums, breaking away from the traditional reggae style to more hip-hop and dancehall influences. It includes a cover of the song "D'yer Mak'er" by Led Zeppelin. 
The computation model of universal composability is that of interactive Turing machines that can activate each other by writing on each other's communication tapes. An interactive Turing machine is a form of multi-tape Turing machine and is commonly used for modelling the computational aspects of communication networks in cryptography. 
The communication model in the bare UC framework is very basic. The messages of a sending party are handed to the adversary who can replace these messages with messages of his own choice that are delivered to the receiving party. This is also the Dolev-Yao threat model. (Based on the computational model all parties are modeled as interactive turing machines) 
All communication models that add additional properties such as confidentiality, authenticity, synchronization, or anonymity are modeled using their own ideal functionality. An ideal communication functionality takes a message as input and produces a message as output. The (more limited) powers for the adversary       A     {\displaystyle {\mathcal {A}}}   are modeled through the (limited) capacity of the adversary to interact with this ideal functionality. 
While the technical means, and the physical assumptions behind anonymous and pseudonymous communication are very different, the modeling of such channels using ideal functionalities is analogous. See also onion routing and Anonymous P2P. Similar functionalities can be defined for broadcast communication, or synchronous communication. 
In an ideal anonymous channel, the ideal functionality,        F     A n o n      {\displaystyle {\mathcal {F}}_{\mathsf {Anon}}}   takes a message     m   {\displaystyle m}   from a party with identity     P   {\displaystyle P}   as input, and outputs the same message but without disclosing the identity     P   {\displaystyle P}   to the recipient and the adversary. 
There exists no bit commitment protocol that is universally composable in the Standard Model. The intuition is that in the ideal model, the simulator has to extract the value to commit to from the input of the environment. This would allow the receiver in the real protocol to extract the committed value and break the security of the protocol. This impossibility result can be applied to other functionalities. 
To circumvent the above impossibility result, additional assumptions are required.  Additional setup and trust assumptions, such as the common reference string model and the assumption of a trusted certification authority are also modeled using ideal functionalities in UC. 
USS Vermilion (AKA-107/LKA-107), was a  Tolland-class attack cargo ship of the United States Navy, named after a parish in southern Louisiana and a county in eastern Illinois. She served as a commissioned ship for 25 years and 9 months. 
The outbreak of the Korean War in the summer of 1950 meant the Vermilion was recommissioned at Orange on 16 October 1950, Captain A. Jackson in command. However, though the war had prompted her return to active duty, she never saw service in the Far East. Instead, she was used to replace other Atlantic Fleet ships released for duty. 
For the next five years, Vermilion participated in Atlantic Fleet amphibious exercises at Onslow Beach, North Carolina and in the Caribbean.  She also conducted independent ship's exercises and made cruises the length of the Atlantic seaboard. She spent the second half of 1958 deployed in the Mediterranean Sea, returning to Little Creek and Atlantic Fleet duties in December. 
Her routine of amphibious exercises and independent ship's exercises continued until the fall of 1962 when she was deployed to the West Indies to support the American quarantine of Cuba during the Cuban Missile Crisis.  She then returned to Little Creek and her routine operations before deployment with the 6th Fleet in the Mediterranean beginning May 1963. 
She was once again decommissioned on 13 April 1971 and then transferred to the Maritime Administration on 27 July 1971 to be laid up in the National Defense Reserve Fleet at James River, Virginia.  Her name was struck from the Navy List on 1 January 1977. 
Kati Piri (born 8 April 1979) is a Hungarian-born Dutch politician serving as a member of the House of Representatives since 2021. A member of the Labour Party (PvdA), she previously was a Member of the European Parliament (MEP) within the Progressive Alliance of Socialists and Democrats from 2014 until 2021. 
In 2014 Piri stood as a candidate for the European Parliament. She occupied the third place on the Labour Party list for the European Parliament elections of 2014, after Paul Tang and Agnes Jongerius. She cited upholding democratic standards and the respect for human rights as internal motivations to take up the candidacy. She was elected to the European Parliament in May 2014. 
In the European Parliament, Piri was a member of the Committee on Foreign Affairs. During her first term, she served as the Parliament's rapporteur on Turkey's EU membership. In 2020, she also joined the Special Committee on Foreign Interference in all Democratic Processes in the European Union. 
Since the 2021 elections, Piri has been a member House of Representatives. In parliament, she serves on the Committee on Foreign Trade and Development Cooperation, the Committee on Foreign Affairs, the Committee on Defense, the Committee on European Affairs, and the Committee on Justice and Security. 
In November 2019 she criticised the veto by the European Council to start the accession procedures of Albania and North Macedonia to the EU. She stated that the countries already made significant reforms and it also drove them towards cooperation with China, Turkey and Russia. 
Motability is a charity in the United Kingdom. It oversees Motability Operations Ltd, which runs the Motability Scheme intended to enable disabled people, their families and their carers to lease a new car, scooter or powered wheelchair, using their disability benefit. Currently, the scheme has more than 650,000 customers. 
It is a partnership between the charitable sector, the UK government, leading banks, and the motor and insurance industries. Since 1978 over three million cars, scooters and powered wheelchairs have been provided to help disabled people with their mobility needs. 
By the mid-1970s over 40% of households in the country owned a car but disabled people claimed that they were missing out. Only those who could drive themselves received any government help with transport, usually in the form of a blue trike which was unable to take passengers. 
The Mobility Allowance was a positive advance but it soon became clear that it was not large enough to buy and run even the smallest car. The then Secretary of State for Health and Social Services invited the late Lord Goodman and (now Lord) Jeffrey Sterling to consider how disabled people could use this allowance to affordably obtain a vehicle. 
Thus Motability was born in 1977 and, often for the first time, disabled people could afford a good-quality car from any participating manufacturer, fully insured, serviced, and with breakdown assistance. Motability was set up as a charity so it could also raise funds and make grants, in order to provide customers with a complete mobility package even if their allowance would not cover the type of car and adaptations that they needed. 
Motability opened up new horizons for many disabled people. Things that were once difficult to do, such as getting to work, going shopping, doing volunteer work, visiting friends, getting to the doctor, going swimming, giving a family member a lift, or enjoying a driving holiday, became easier. For some, enhanced opportunities for further education and profitable full-time employment became a reality for the first time. 
In 2003, Motability celebrated its 25th anniversary with a garden at the Chelsea Flower Show. The garden included a Motability car, an adapted Renault Clio, to symbolise disabled people gaining access to the remotest parts of the countryside. 
In October 2006, the Scheme hit the two million vehicles mark and Jeffrey Sterling commented: "Family life revolves around the disabled person so if you make someone mobile you don't help two million, it's more like six to eight million." 
The late Lord Goodman described the establishment of Motability in 1977 as "the most successful achievement of my career and the most fortunate thought that ever came into my head". 
Disability Living Allowance (DLA) is not means tested. It is a benefit designed to help towards the additional living costs incurred by people with disabilities and is broken into two components, Mobility and Care. The Care component is valued at three different rates; lowest, middle and highest, and the Mobility component at two different rates; lower and higher. 
Motability is a registered charity and has overall responsibility for the Motability Scheme, including: 
Motability Operations also set and monitors the standards of service provided by the dealer network, adaptations suppliers, breakdown company and the insurance company. Motability Operations also negotiates pricing with the vehicle manufacturers on a quarterly basis. 
The Wheelchair and Scooter Scheme was operated by Route2mobility until June 2010, when it was taken over by Motability Operations. 
This article about a member of the Virginia House of Delegates is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Legis Volumni was a Roman and Byzantine era town in the Roman province and Berber kingdom of Numidia in the Maghreb. It served as an ancient Latin Catholic diocese. The town is identified with ruins near the modern city of Lioua in Algeria. 
Legis Volumini was also the seat of an ancient bishopric, which remains a titular see of the Roman Catholic church. 
O'Kelly was born in Abbeyfeale, County Limerick in 1915. Although he was baptized Michael Joseph, and published as Michael J. or M.J., he was known to family and friends as Brian, the name his mother originally wanted, throughout his life. He entered University College, Cork (UCC) in 1934. 
After receiving his M.A. he was appointed curator of the new Cork Public Museum in Fitzgerald Park. In 1945 he married Claire, also an archaeologist, whom he had met as a student. 
Newgrange, the site O'Kelly is most associated with, was originally accidentally discovered in 1699. It was in extremely poor condition in 1961, with no public access. That year the archaeologist Patrick Hartnett selected O'Kelly to direct excavations. Work continued every season through to 1975. 
On the front cover of the passport is the Coat of arms of Seychelles. The passport has two languages, French and English. 
As of 2 July 2019, Seychellois citizens had visa-free or visa on arrival access to 150 countries and territories, ranking the Seychellois passport 27th in terms of travel freedom, and best ranking African country, according to the Henley Passport Index. 
The first legislation of passports in Seychelles appeared in 1920 during the administration of Governor Sir Eustace Edward Twistleton-Wykeham Fiennes (1864-1943). Published in the Seychelles Government Gazette no. 50 on November 6, 1920, it was a Bill of An Ordinance to regulate the issue of passports in the Colony and to require persons landing in the Colony to be possessed of passports, and otherwise to restrict the landing in the Colony of undesirable immigrants.   
The ordinance must have fallen short of its intended purpose because, by the end of 1921, it was repealed and replaced by Passport Ordinance 1921.  
On June 29, 1976, when Seychelles became independent, upon acquiring their nationhood, Seychellois automatically lost the status of British subject and became citizens of Seychelles. However, a person of Seychellois descent could retain his British nationality if his father or paternal grandfather was born in Great Britain or in a Colony that was not yet independent. 
Laurent Levesque (born 28 January 1970) is a film score composer. He started the piano at 4 and graduated at 17 from the French national music school academy with five first prizes. 
This biographical article related to film in France is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
George Washington said of Gardoqui on August 10, 1790, "... no man in his most Catholic Majesty's dominions could be more acceptable to the Inhabitants of these States." Gardoqui gave Washington a four-volume edition in the original Spanish of Don Quixote as a present. The set of volumes still exists and is preserved at Washington's personal library, which opened as a museum on September 27, 2013. 
In 1785, Gardoqui laid the cornerstone of the first Catholic Church in New York City, St. Peter's on Barclay Street. 
In 1977, the Spanish Crown, in commemoration of the Bicentennial of the United States, presented a statue of Don Diego de Gardoqui, crafted by Spanish artist Luis Antonio Sanguino (b. 1934, Barcelona, Spain), to the City of Philadelphia.  The statue currently stands in Logan Square. 
Initially a student at Loughborough University, Stubbs signed for Notts County in September 1968 and spent the whole of his professional career at the club. He played for the club in the Football League Fourth Division but by the time he left had helped them into the top flight. 
This biographical article related to association football in England, about a defender born in the 1950s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to an American baseball first baseman is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Kirk Chambers (born March 19, 1979) is a former American football offensive tackle. He played college football at Stanford and was drafted by the Cleveland Browns in the sixth round of the 2004 NFL Draft. He was also a member of the Buffalo Bills, Cincinnati Bengals, Detroit Lions and Atlanta Falcons before becoming a high school football coach in the 2010s. 
Chambers graduated from Provo High School in 1997. For three years he started both on offense and defense. He was a member of championship winning basketball teams at Provo High in 1995 and 1997. Chambers also participated in student government, Mr. Provo High, track and field, and the Chamber Choir. 
A distinguished high school athlete, Chambers was heavily recruited by Stanford University and by his home town school Brigham Young University, eventually selecting the Cardinal. 
Before playing at Stanford, however, Chambers served a two-year church mission for the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints in Berlin, Germany. 
Chambers was drafted in the sixth round of the 2004 NFL Draft by the Cleveland Browns. He spent two seasons with the team, appearing in 21 games with no starts. 
After spending the 2006 season out of football, Chambers signed a free-agent contract with the Buffalo Bills on January 25, 2007. He played in all 32 games for the team over the following two season, starting five. 
Chambers re-signed with the Bills in March 2009. He was released during final cuts on September 5, only to be re-signed three days later after offensive tackle Langston Walker was released. He was again released during the final cuts on September 4, 2010. 
On August 11, 2011, Chambers signed with the Detroit Lions. Chambers was released from the Lions on the final day of cuts. 
His father was a high school German teacher, so Chambers speaks fluent German. He also earned the rank of Eagle Scout while a member in the Boy Scouts of America.[citation needed] 
After the 2011 NFL Season Chambers chose to become the head football coach at Spanish Fork High School in Spanish Fork, Utah. In April 2015, he resigned as head football coach at Spanish Fork High School to become a Co-Athletic Director with Phil Olsen at Provo High School. 
Morningwood was an alternative rock band from New York City. Founded in 2001, it primarily consisted of Pedro Yanowitz and Chantal Claret.  Morningwood was signed to Capitol Records and released two albums. Claret went solo in 2012 and folded the band. 
Morningwood's self-titled debut album was produced by Gil Norton, known for his work with Pixies, the Foo Fighters, and Echo & the Bunnymen. Singles from the album include "Nth Degree", "Jetsetter" and "New York Girls." In support of the album, the band toured with Mindless Self Indulgence, Head Automatica, Gang of Four, Kasabian, The Sounds and The FireTheft on various legs of their US tour in 2006.  
In August 2008, the band finished up work on a new album. The album, Diamonds & Studs, was released October 27, 2009 by VH1 Records, a record company started by VH1 and owned by Viacom.  Morningwood was their first and only act. 
Shortly after Claret's video for "Snobby Little Elf" premiered on YouTube, the band split for an indefinite hiatus. They regrouped in March 2012 to join Mindless Self Indulgence on a final tour. The band's final show was on March 11 at Irving Plaza in New York City. Since the disbanding, Claret has started a solo career while Yanowitz has started work on a Broadway musical. 
There is evidence that hydrogen in the fullerene cage is not completely shielded from the outside world as one study found that H2@C60 is more efficient at quenching singlet oxygen than empty C60. 
Bachelor and Spinsters  Balls (B&S) events are hosted regularly in rural Australia, known locally as "B & S Balls" or simply "B&S's". 
They are staged for young (18 years and over) spinsters and bachelors and traditionally the couples dress up in formal wear. Large volumes of cheap alcohol such as beer, spirits, Bundaberg Rum and Jim Beam can be consumed. The activities usually start at night and run until morning, but from mid-afternoon people will start to arrive and the partying/drinking will begin. Country music is often featured at these events. 
After the event people usually sleep in their swag on the back of their ute. Usually the committee supplies something for dinner and breakfast the next day. Some committees run a 'recovery' where the ball goers move to a different location to continue drinking, having fun and sometimes participating in competitions. 
Tickets can cost anything from AU$80 to AU$110 and usually include all you can drink, dinner and sometimes breakfast as well as little gifts such as ear tags, hats, stickers and sometimes condoms and lubricant. People will travel many kilometres to attend the balls, and the profits made from them go to charities and organizations such as the Royal Flying Doctor Service of Australia, Red Cross and the Australian Cancer Council, as well as local charities of the specific area. 
In 2009 as part of the Q150 celebrations, the Bachelor and Spinster Balls were announced as one of the Q150 Icons of Queensland for its role as an "event and festival". 
The Baikal Amur Mainline (BAM) railway traverses the southern end of the mountain range via the Severomuysky Tunnel. 
The Northern Muya Range separates the basins of the Upper Angara and Muya Rivers. Among the rivers having their sources in the range are the Upper Angara and its left tributaries Yanchui and Angarakan, several Vitim tributaries, such as the Mamakan and Muya, as well as rivers Parama and Yanguda, originate from it. 
Philip Frederick McNairy was born in 1911 in Lake City, Minnesota, to Harry Doughty McNairy and Clara Christina Moseman. He attended Kenyon College where he was a member of Sigma Pi fraternity and attended seminary at Bexley Hall.  He married Cary Elizabeth Fleming in November 1935 and they had three children. 
He served as Suffragan Bishop of Minnesota from 1958-1968, Bishop Coadjutor of Minnesota from 1968-1970. He was elected Bishop of Minnesota in 1971 and served until his retirement in 1978. He died on December 8, 1989, in the Metropolitan Mount Sinai Hospital, Minneapolis. 
State Highway 56 (abbreviated SH-56 or OK-56) is a state highway in the U.S. state of Oklahoma. The road serves Seminole County, Okfuskee County, and Okmulgee Counties in central and east-central Oklahoma. In Seminole County, it is also designated as the Seminole Nation Highway in honor of the contributions the Seminole Nation has made to the state of Oklahoma. 
SH-56 was first added to the state highway system in 1929. It was gradually extended to its present length between then and 1942. 
The highway then bisects the town of Wewoka, intersecting US-270 and concurring with its business loop. SH-56 also serves as the eastern terminus of SH-59 in Wewoka. North of the town, SH-56 intersects with SH-9. The highway continues north, intersecting SH-99A in Cromwell and interchanging with I-40 near the unincorporated community of Schoolton. After crossing I-40, SH-56 makes a long arc to the east, bringing it into Okfuskee County. 
Just east of the county line, SH-56 bridges the North Canadian River. South of Castle, the road intersects with SH-48. SH-56 then proceeds east into Okemah, the county seat, where it has a short concurrency with both US-62 and SH-27. The highway continues east from town, then turns north, before turning back to the east to pass through the unincorporated settlement of Okfuskee. East of Okfuskee, the highway enters Okmulgee County. 
In Okmulgee County, SH-56 skirts the northern edge of Okmulgee Lake and serves Dripping Springs State Park. East of the lake, it passes through Okmulgee Wildlife Refuge and Deep Fork National Wildlife Refuge. It then enters the city of Okmulgee. There, SH-56 comes to an end at US-75.  However, there is a separate loop route segment of SH-56 that starts from a more northerly point on US-75 and runs a short distance to US-62. 
 Gomaji Naik Pansambal was a warrior and military adviser in the army of Shivaji, founder of the Maratha Empire in 17th century India. Gomaji was deputed by Lakhuji Jadhavrao. He was also a guru of Shivaji[citation needed], also taught him artillery and warmenships, especially the lance and guerilla warefare, the characteristic Maratha weapon. 
Lundamo Station is located in the village along the Dovre Line, but it is now in use only for local traffic. The European route E6 highway also runs through the village.  The Gaula River runs through Lundamo and in 2005 it was selected the best river for salmon-fishing in Norway. Lundamo was the administrative center of the former municipality of Horg.  It is also the location of the Horg Church. 
General Suhaila was born in Kabul, Afghanistan. She was born on March 11, her exact birth year is unknown, believed to be either 1938 or 1949. She belonged to the royal Barakzai Mohammadzai Pashtun lineage. She was one of six daughters; her father was a governor of Kandahar. 
After completing high school, she attended Kabul Medical University but completed her medical studies at Moscow State University in what was then the Soviet Union. 
Siddiq was well respected by many Afghan feminists for her actions during the Taliban era. Both she and her sister Sidiqa, who was a professor at the Kabul Polytechnical Institute, were two of very few women who successfully refused to wear the burka. She is quoted as having said, "When the religious police came with their canes and raised their arms to hit me, I raised mine to hit them back. Then they lowered their arms and let me go." 
As minister, in April 2002, Siddiq oversaw the vaccination of about 6 million Afghan children against polio on behalf of the United Nations Children's Fund.  In July 2002 she met with a Chinese delegation who agreed to fund the renovation of what was promised to be Afghanistan's most modern hospital.  In November 2006, Siddiq presented a speech on AIDS in Afghanistan to Eurasianet in New York City. 
Siddiq had Alzheimer's disease. She died in Kabul on 4 December 2020, at the age of 71, from complications from COVID-19 during the COVID-19 pandemic in Afghanistan. 
Dominique Deruddere (born 15 June 1957) is a Belgian film director, actor, screenwriter and producer. 
Belonging to the Ortsgemeinde are the centres of Maiermund, Briedeler Heck,  Bummkopf and Hohestein, as well as the formerly state-owned domain of Margaretenhof. 
In 1674, Briedel, and also some of the neighbouring places, denied French occupational troops in Trier any contributions. In an act of revenge, the troops set out from Trier to punish the wayward villages, but on the way met with Imperial troops who beat them back. The village's fortifications were destroyed by the French in 1689. The villagers then had to do compulsory labour, building the fort, Mont Royal. 
Beginning in 1794, Briedel lay under French rule. In 1815 it was assigned to the Kingdom of Prussia at the Congress of Vienna. 
Since 1946, Briedel has been part of the then newly founded state of Rhineland-Palatinate. The Maiermund housing development sprang up on cleared swathes of the Briedeler Hecke after the Second World War in the course of the housing development movement. In 1969, administrative restructuring in Rhineland-Palatinate put Briedel in the new Cochem-Zell district. 
In 1991, a lady from Briedel named Bettina Fischer became the Mosel-Saar-Ruwer Regional "Wine Queen"; the following year she also became "German Wine Princess". 
The council is made up of 16 council members, who were elected by proportional representation at the municipal election held on 7 June 2009, and the honorary mayor as chairman. 
The municipality's arms might in English heraldic language be described thus: Argent a cross gules, in dexter chief and sinister base tendril patterns, in sinister chief the letters BR, and in dexter base a bunch of grapes on a vine palewise reversed, leafed of two and slipped, all vert. 
The arms have been borne since 1 February 1957, and they were designed by Dr. Bruno Hirschfeld of Koblenz, after the old seal. 
There are many timber-frame houses, a Baroque church with a Stumm organ and ceiling paintings, and a fountain in the village centre. Nearby is the wooded area Briedeler Schweiz ("Briedel Switzerland"). 
The two countries are collaborating on the development of China's Belt and Road Initiative. China has delivered healthcare supplies and COVID-19 vaccinations to Uruguay in response to the pandemic. 
During 2000-2006, trade flows between China and Uruguay significantly increased due to China's rapid economic growth. For Uruguay, imports from China increased by 213% in this period, with the proportion of imports from China to total imports increasing from 3.2% in 2000 to 7.4% in 2006. China rose to become Uruguay's fourth largest import supplier in 2006. The increase in imports has negatively impacted Uruguay's domestic producers, who have struggled to compete with foreign firms. 
Exports from Uruguay to China increased by 5.5% between 2001 and 2005. The proportion of exports to China to total exports increased by 0.5%. This increase in exports is attributed to China's high demand for natural resources. As such, a large proportion of Uruguay's exports to China consist of primary commodities. 
Uruguay had a trade deficit with China during 2000-2006, importing more than exporting. Its trade deficit with China made up a quarter of its total deficits. This increased Uruguay's reliance on commodities, which posed a challenge for the economy's development. 
Foreign direct investment (FDI) also increased during this period. In late 2008, Chery Mobile, a Chinese company, began manufacturing cars in Uruguay through a joint venture with Socma in Argentina and Oferol in Uruguay. 
In February 2003, the two countries celebrated 15 years of diplomatic relations. Then Chinese Foreign Minister Tang Jiaxun exchanged congratulations with then Uruguayan Foreign Minister Didier Opertti. The two foreign ministers expressed positive sentiments regarding past relations, particularly emphasizing the progress in areas of trade, culture, and technology. Opertti stated his interest in further expanding bilateral ties. 
During a week-long visit to China in August 2010, then Uruguayan Vice-President Danilo Astori expressed positive expectations in regards to China-Uruguay relations. He acknowledged China's impact on Uruguay's economic development. Wu Bangguo, a Chinese legislator, shared similar sentiments, expressing interest in expanding trade and cooperation between the two countries. 
In June 2012, former Chinese Prime Minister Wen Jiabao visited several Latin American countries, including Uruguay, expressing interest in establishing an economic forum between China and CELAC (Community of Latin American and Caribbean States). Wen Jiabao's proposals during this visit encouraged the expansion of trade relations between China and Latin American countries. 
Talks regarding infrastructure cooperation were furthered in June 2013, with Mujica's visit to China. During his visit, an agreement was signed which allowed Chinese companies to aid in the reconstruction of a Uruguayan railway. Additionally, it was agreed that China would contribute to the development of a Uruguayan port located on the Atlantic coast. 
In April 2019, China's deputy Prime Minister Hu Chunhua visited Uruguay. Uruguayan Foreign Minister Rodolfo Nin Novoa said that the visit strengthened China-Uruguay relations. He also stated his expectations for future trade and tariff agreements between the two countries, particularly emphasizing the importance of agreements that concerned food safety, as a large portion of Uruguay's exports consists of food products. 
On 1 March 2021, Uruguay started a COVID-19 vaccination campaign after receiving doses of Sinovac vaccines from China. Chinese Ambassador Wang Gang stated that this was an important step in advancing bilateral relations. On 29 March 2021, Uruguayan President Luis Lacalle Pou was vaccinated with the Sinovac vaccine. 
During the Chinese-Uruguayan Mixed Economic Commission in 2004, the two countries discussed economic cooperation, particularly focusing on the export of soybeans and beef to China. National representatives also emphasized the importance of extending safety measures for Uruguayan food products. Uruguay expressed interest in importing electronic goods from China. 
Trade has been expanding since 2008 due to an increase in both China and Uruguay's exports. Exports to China increased from US$171m in 2008 to US$2500m in 2017. Exports remained largely made up of primary commodities, namely soybeans, wool, and meat products. Imports from China increased from US$833m to US$1704m in the same period, consisting mainly of manufactured products. Since 2012, Uruguay has had a trade surplus with China. 
Due to the COVID-19 pandemic, Uruguayan exports to China decreased by 1% in the first quarter of 2020. Imports fell by 10% during the same period. This decline is expected to have a negative impact on Uruguayan industrial sectors and product chains, particularly considering China's role as Uruguay's largest trading partner. 
Financial flow and investment between the two regions are minimal. Uruguay does not currently have a currency swap agreement with China, unlike other nations in the same geographic region. Most financial flows between the two countries consist of China's foreign direct investment. These investments are largely made up of China's use of Uruguay as a tax haven, but precise data from official reports has not been publicized. 
According to a 2015 census conducted by the Ministry of Commerce of the People's Republic of China, there were 300 Chinese citizens living in Uruguay. Uruguay's tight immigration laws have prevented high levels of migration. There is no reported data on the number of Uruguayan citizens living in China. 
Both China and Uruguay are members of the Group of 77, the United Nations, and the World Trade Organization. 
The castle hosted the Archduke Louis and his brother Johann, sons of Holy Roman Emperor Leopold II of Austria, during one of their trips to France. 
Ganjam Kewda Rooh (Screw pine, IPA:/Kia/, Pandanus fascicularis) is a plant native to the Indian state of Odisha primarily in the Ganjam district. Kewda has been identified as a Geographical Indications in India. 
The kewda industry in Ganjam provides income of 4.5-6 million USD (300-400 million INR) to the local farmers. About 140 traditional distillation units operate in the small scale industries in nearly 200 villages and hamlets of the district producing an estimated 35 million flowers (3,500 tons) worth 10 million USD annually. 
This article related to a British comedy film of the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a United States film actor born in the 1860s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 1859, Colonel Edwin Drake discovers oil in Titusville, Pennsylvania. There is an unprecedented rush to the small town. Everyone wants to have their share of oil and become rich. The Mayor, who fears overflows, telegraphs Lucky Luke for help. If he accepts, he will be appointed sheriff. At first, he thinks to refuse but he soon realizes that this rush to oil will lead to chaos if it is not controlled and he finally accepts, to the chagrin of Jolly Jumper . 
The program centred around the search to find a new member of Kara, following the departure of its members Nicole and Jiyoung. Seven trainees from DSP Media participated in the show, competing to become part of the group. The winner of the competition was Heo Young-ji, who became Kara's new member. 
On February 24, 2015, contestant Ahn So-jin was found to have died from apparent suicide one month after DSP ended their contract with her. She had been a trainee for five years before participating in Kara Project. 
In 1966, GEMS (formerly "Calvinettes"), the Calvinist Cadet Corps, and ThereforeGo (then the Young Calvinist Federation) merged to form Dynamic Youth Ministries (then known as United Calvinist Youth). 
In 2006, GEMS expanded its global vision to reach girls everywhere by organizing clubs in Africa. Since then, girls in clubs across North America have been active in assisting the efforts. New curriculum has been developed, a micro-financing program has started, and construction has started the Esther School for orphans and under-resourced children in Zambia. 
GEMS Girls' Clubs is governed by an executive board that oversees general policies, finances, and the overall effectiveness of the ministry. 
Most local churches divide their GEMS programs into three age levels. GEMS produces a variety of age-appropriate curriculum for each level. GEMS also partners with Cadets to produce a curriculum for 4- and 5-year-olds, and offers a leadership-development position for high school-aged girls who wish to remain in the program.  
GEMS Girls' Clubs produces two magazines that help girls recognize and embrace their potential to be world changers. 
Published monthly from September through May, SHINE brightly is for girls ages nine to fourteen. Each issue contains three Bible lessons as well as articles and stories that inspire girls to be activists for Christ. The magazine is designed to help girls see how God is at work in their lives and in the world around them. 
Produced monthly from October through March, Sparkle is designed for girls in grades 1-3. Through Bible lessons, articles, stories, and games, it seeks to show girls how they can make a difference in the world. 
A crucial aspect of the GEMS ministry is giving women the tools they need to effectively reach out to the girls in their local clubs. Volunteer leaders (counselors) are offered training opportunities in which they learn how to use the GEMS curricula as well as gain important insights into the development stages of the age group they are teaching. These training events are all designed to equip and encourage counselors in their work with girls. 
Each summer, GEMS hosts its Annual Counselors' Leadership Conference for women. This is a major event for the ministry and is held in different locations around North America. Volunteer leaders are also appointed to various areas of the United States and Canada, and these women offer training and support to the counselors in their geographic region. 
GEMS Girls' Clubs is a member of the Evangelical Council for Financial Accountability. Members of the ECFA must adhere to standards of responsible stewardship including high standards of accountability in fundraising, financial disclosure, confidentiality of donor information, and the use of resources. The ministry submits to an annual independent audit. 
Henry, Sweet Henry is a musical with a book by Nunnally Johnson and music and lyrics by Bob Merrill. 
Based on the 1964 novel The World of Henry Orient by Johnson's daughter Nora and the subsequent film of the same name, the plot focuses on Valerie and Marian, two wealthy, love-struck teenagers who stalk an avant-garde composer and aging philanderer. 
The musical premiered on Broadway on October 23, 1967 at the Palace Theatre, and closed on December 31, 1967 after 80 performances and twelve previews. It was directed by George Roy Hill and choreographed by Michael Bennett. The cast featured Don Ameche, Neva Small, Robin Wilson, Carol Bruce, Louise Lasser, Baayork Lee, Priscilla Lopez, Alice Playten, and Pia Zadora. 
The York Theatre Company "Musicals in Mufti", New York, presented a staged concert of the musical in October 2004. 
Cindy Stein (born January 22, 1961) is the head women's basketball coach at Southern Illinois University Carbondale. She is the former coach of the Missouri Tigers women's basketball team at the University of Missouri from 1998 to 2010 and at Illinois Central College from 2012 to 2013. She was the head coach for the Cougars from April 3, 2012, until April 2, 2013 when she was named head coach of the SIU Women's basketball team. 
Stein was a graduate assistant and coach for Central Michigan University, where she earned a master's degree in physical education with an emphasis in athletic administration. After jobs as an assistant coach at Miami University, the University of Cincinnati, and Bradley University, Stein returned to her alma mater, first as a recruiting coach, and then as an assistant coach for her former team. 
Her first head coaching assignment came at Emporia State University, an NCAA Division II school in Emporia, Kansas. In three years as head coach at Emporia State, Stein turned the women's basketball program into a national contender, with her team advancing to the NCAA Division II title game in 1998. This success earned Stein various coaching awards, including being named the Division II Basketball coach of the year. 
Stein was a TV analyst for Fox Sports basketball games. From 2010 to 2012 she provided color commentary for UMKC women's basketball along with play-by-play broadcaster T. J. Jackson on KCWJ. 
Antonio de Lanchares (1586/1590-1630/1640) was a Spanish painter, active during the Baroque period, mainly in Madrid and surrounding towns. 
Christian Ackermann was one of the greatest masters of the Baroque style in Estonia. He brought strong Central European influences to Northeast Europe, in particular the motifs of the Baroque and masterful Acanthus ornaments. The majority of his works consists of almost twenty altarpieces, pulpits and large coat-of-arms epitaphs. 
Since picigin is an amateur sport, there are no strict or formal rules, but it is played according to tradition, with little variation, but the main goal is to keep ball in the air as long as possible. 
Picigin must be played on a sandy beach in shallow water. The beach must be sandy because otherwise players could easily get hurt. It is best if the water is ankle-deep, because of mobility and also to soften falls, which are common because there's a lot of jumping around trying to reach the ball. 
The traditional ball, called balun (otherwise a dialectal name for a ball, but this name is strictly used, especially by expert players) is actually a peeled tennis ball, polished off a few millimeters. This kind of ball is best suited for bouncing. It is smooth and lighter than a normal tennis ball. 
In June 2008, picigin was pronounced a Croatian immaterial cultural good, for a period of three years, and it is planned to get a permanent protection after that. 
Having attended highly ranked public universities, the two are broadly recognized as "highly educated comedians". However, Suga eventually dropped out of Osaka Prefecture University while Ujihara graduated from Kyoto University spending 9 years to earn satisfactory credits to graduate. 
As the boke, Suga is prone to strange comments, while Ujihara is the more reasonable of the two, often criticizing Suga's remarks. As their talk material, they often use current affairs and items that Japanese students learn in high school and middle school. Suga writes almost all their material while Ujihara types them out since Suga cannot touch-type. 
In Yoshimoto Kogyo's annual "Most Handsome Yoshimoto Kogyo Entertainer" awards, Suga won 7th place and Ujihara won 14th in 2009 (8th and 20th in 2008 respectively). 
"La Llamada" (English: "The Phone Call") is a song recorded by American recording artist Selena for her first live album Live! (1993). It was composed by Selena y Los Dinos backup singer Pete Astudillo and Selena's brother and principal record producer A.B. Quintanilla III. The song was produced by Quintanilla III and Argentine music producer Bebu Silvetti. 
"La Llamada" was released as the second single from Live!. It peaked at number 5 on the US Hot Latin Tracks on the week ending 23 October 1993. On the week ending 9 April 2011, "La Llamada" entered the Regional Mexican Digital Songs chart. The lyrical content of the song describes a girlfriend's feelings after witnessing her boyfriend kissing another girl, telling him to never call her again and ending the relationship. The central theme explored on "La Llamada" suggests women empowerment. 
"La Llamada" is an uptempo Mexican cumbia song. The song received generally positive reviews from music critics. A music video was released and features Selena dancing in a crowd at a beach house in Malibu, California. There have been many cover versions of "La Llamada" ranging from Mexican to Dominican artists. 
"La Llamada" is an uptempo Mexican cumbia song. Written in the key of A minor, the beat is set in common time and moves at a moderate 90 beats per minute. "La Llamada" describes a woman telling her boyfriend over the phone that she saw him kissing another girl, while her boyfriend tries to persuade to her that it was not him. The central theme explored on "La Llamada" suggests women empowerment. 
Mexican band Banda El Grullo recorded the song on their tribute album Lo Mejor De Selena Con Banda. Mexican singer Dalila also recorded the song for her album Dalila en Vivo. Dominican bachata singer Kiko Rodriguez recorded the song on his album Otra Vez Con Amor. 
The complex was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1985.  The church was closed in 1999, and converted to housing. 
This article about a National Register of Historic Places listing in Norfolk County, Massachusetts is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a church or other Christian place of worship in Massachusetts is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
NASCO acts as the organized voice of the "group-equity" cooperative housing movement, both in terms of bringing together student and community co-op activists, and in maintaining relationships with national cooperative organizations, including the National Cooperative Business Association and the Cooperative Housing Federation of Canada. 
NASCO works with its members and the general public on a variety of more extensive training and consulting activities. The NASCO staff visits Active Member groups at least once every two years, providing free consultation and training on a variety of topics as a member service. 
NASCO's Co-op Voices newsletter features reports on activity among cooperatives in Canada and the United States. It reports on NASCO's activities and provides updates on co-operative news. The newsletter articles are written by and for co-op members. 
NASCO supports and assists, to varying degrees, regional networking and training opportunities for co-op members and staff. In the Midwest, on the West Coast, in Ontario, in Minneapolis-St. Paul, and in the Northeast, co-ops meet annually for workshops and social events, where they can discuss issues pertinent to their co-ops. 
NASCO holds an annual conference, NASCO Institute, which is usually held in Ann Arbor, Michigan and hosted by the Inter-Cooperative Council at the University of Michigan. This is a multiday conference, most of which is spent in workshops, skillshares, and caucuses. The courses cover topics of interest to participants in the cooperative movement and progressivism in general. There is typically a guest speaker and an annual theme. 
The Action Camp, held each August, provides an intensive training environment for leaders and active members of housing co-ops, worker collectives, and other democratically run communities. Participants spend one week in a beautiful, natural environment engaging in a week-long program on privilege and anti-oppression work and interactive fun, using techniques from Augusto Boal's "Theater of the Oppressed." 
Special organizing and training resources are made available to groups interested in starting or expanding cooperatives. NASCO Development Services provides an array of development services including assistance in pre-development activities, financial assistance, and start-up assistance. 
In 1989, a $50,000 donation from the Japanese Consumer Cooperative Union was used to seed The Kagawa Fund for Student Cooperative Development. The Kagawa Fund, named for Toyohiko Kagawa, provides loans and technical assistance to new and existing housing cooperatives. The fund is administered by the Cooperative Development Foundation and NASCO Development Services. 
In 1988, NASCO Properties was established as an affiliate of NASCO to purchase and hold title to housing around the United States, which is then leased to local co-ops. 
Its first property was the House of Commons, a 21 bedroom student house in Austin, Texas. It acquired the title from an ailing student housing co-op, ICC-Austin, with the purpose of keeping the building in the affordable cooperative housing sector. ICC-Austin bought the house back from NASCO Properties in 2003. 
NASCO manages NASCO Properties and through it provides assistance to the local leasing co-ops. Staff members visit each leasing co-op at least three times per year to help with finances, maintenance, and other problems or issues that may arise. In 2004, a second title holding organization was created between NASCO and Riverton Community Housing called Lots in Common (LINC). NASCO entered into asset management contracts for Davis Campus Cooperatives in 2006. 
Monte delle Figne (Figne Mountain) is a mountain in Liguria, northern Italy, part of the Ligurian Appennines. It lies at an altitude of 1172 metres. 
The mountain is located in the provinces of Genoa and Alessandria.  Is divided by Passo Mezzano (1063 m) from Monte Taccone and by Passo della Dagliola (858 m) and a saddle near Cascina Carrosina (825 m) from Monte Tobbio.  
Monte delle Figne is accessible by signposted traks departing from Bocchetta Pass or Isoverde (municipality of Campomorone). 
The Alta Via dei Monti Liguri, a long-distance trail from Ventimiglia (province of Imperia) to Bolano (province of La Spezia), passes very close to the mountain's summit. 
North-western slopes of the mountain are included in the Capanne di Marcarolo Piedmontese natural park. 
The International Trumpet Guild (ITG) is an international organization of trumpet players. Members include professional and amateur performers, teachers, students, manufacturers, publishers, and others interested in the trumpet. ITG is a nonprofit, tax-exempt organization supported by the dues of individual members.[citation needed] 
ITG was established in 1975. In 1975, the first ITG Conference was held in Bloomington, Indiana; the following year the Guild met as part of the First International Brass Congress in Montreux, Switzerland. ITG Conferences have been held every year since then, with the Second International Brass Congress being held in 1984 at Indiana University. 
In 1982, the ITG Archive was established at Western Michigan University to chronicle the Guild's activities and to preserve historical trumpet-related research. The ITG Research Library serves as a lending library for trumpet-related research. 
In 1988, plans were begun to form a larger European component of ITG. In fall, 1990 the Euro-ITG chapter was formed at the Trumpet Days in Bad Sackingen, Germany, with initial membership of 120 members. An International Membership Coordinator was appointed to further develop growth of ITG. The Euro-ITG chapter disbanded in 2003. 
The ITG Honorary Award is given to those individuals who have made extraordinary contributions to the art of trumpet playing. These contributions are through performance, teaching, publishing, research, and/or composition. The tradition has been to award persons only toward the end of their careers, rather than at the beginning or height of their careers. 
The ITG Honorary Award does not have to be given every year, and it is possible to award more than one per year. 
The ITG Award of Merit is given to those individuals who have made substantial contributions to the art of trumpet playing through performance, teaching, publishing, research, composition, and/or support of the goals of the International Trumpet Guild. 
There is no requirements that the award be given annually, and no restrictions are made as to the number of recipients. 
The ITG Journal is published quarterly and includes articles on history, performance, literature, recordings, research, pedagogy, physiology, interviews, instrument modifications, and many other trumpet-related areas. The Journal features columns dealing with aspects of trumpet performance and reviews of books, music, and CDs. 
ITG hosts annual competitions for students under 25 including scholarship competitions, solo trumpet, orchestral except and jazz solo competitions. 
In addition ITG sponsors two major trumpet competitions - The Ellsworth Smith International Trumpet Solo Competition which takes place every 4 years, and the Carmine Caruso International Jazz Trumpet Solo Competition, which takes place every 2 years. 
The International Balzan Prize Foundation awards four annual monetary prizes to people or organizations who have made outstanding achievements in the fields of humanities, natural sciences, culture, as well as for endeavours for peace and the brotherhood of man. 
The first award was in fact 1 million Swiss francs to the Nobel foundation in 1961. After 1962 a gap of 16 years followed when prizes recommenced with an award of half a million Swiss francs to Mother Teresa. Award ceremonies alternate between Bern and the Accademia dei Lincei in Rome, and frequently winners have later won a Nobel Prize. 
All awards are decided by a single committee. The Balzan Prize committee comprises twenty members of the prestigious learned societies of Europe. 
Each year the foundation chooses the fields eligible for the next year's prizes, and determines the prize amount. These are generally announced in May, with the winners announced the September the following year. 
Since 2001 the prize money has increased to 1 million Swiss Francs per prize, on condition that half the money is used for projects involving young researchers. 
Four prizes have been awarded annually since 1978. The award fields vary each year and can be related to either a specific or an interdisciplinary field. The prizes go beyond the traditional subjects both in the humanities (literature, the moral sciences and the arts) and in the sciences (medicine and the physical, mathematical and natural sciences), with an emphasis on innovative research. 
Every 3 to 7 years the foundation also awards the Prize for humanity, peace and brotherhood among peoples. It was last awarded in 2014 to Vivre en Famille. 
Emmanuel T. Cabajar (also known as Manny Cabajar) is a Filipino bishop of the Catholic Church. He was Bishop of Pagadian from 2004 to 2018. 
Cabajar was born on 8 October 1942, in Jandayan Island, Jetafe, Talibon, Bohol, Philippines. He entered priesthood as a member of the Congregation of the Most Holy Redeemer. 
He attended Philosophy at the St. Alphonsus Seminary in Cebu City. He attained a master's degree and doctorate in Moral theology from St. Anthelmo in Rome and in Madrid, Spain, respectively. 
Pope John Paul II named him Bishop of Pagadian on 14 May 2004. He received his episcopal consecration from Cardinal Ricardo Jamin Vidal on 14 August and was installed on 2 September. As Bishop of Pagadian, he governed the sixteen Diocesan Schools of Pagadian. He also sits as Chairman of the Board of Trustees of Saint Columban College. 
In the Catholic Bishops' Conference of the Philippines, he has served as Chairman, Vice Chairman, and member of episcopal commissions. 
On February 2017, Cabajar played host to Msgr. Jose R. Manguiran, Bishop Emeritus of Dipolog, and delegates of the Mindanao Convention on Family and Life held in Pagadian City. A week after, he played host again to the delegates of the National Convention on Family and Life, led by Archbishop Gilbert A. Garcera of the Archdiocese of Lipa. 
1871 was the 85th season of cricket in England since the foundation of Marylebone Cricket Club (MCC). Derbyshire County Cricket Club became a first-class club and the last matches were played by Cambridgeshire, who in the days of Bob Carpenter, the first Tom Hayward and George Tarrant had been one of the leading cricket counties. 
a Hampshire, though regarded until 1885 as first-class, played no inter-county matches between 1868 and 1869 or 1871 and 1874 
Amir Zalani is a Singaporean footballer who plays for Hougang United FC as a striker as of 2021. He previously played for Home United FC. 
He was promoted to the senior squad in 2016 after impressing with the prime league team.  He was the captain of the prime league team and played 19 games (with 10 goals) in 2015 prime league team. He scored two goals in the 2016 Singapore FA Cup finals against NFL side Siglap FC and securing his club's second consecutive FA Cup trophy. 
On 10 June 2021, Amir returned to Hougang United after completing his national service duty. He will be wearing jersey number 29. 
This Peru mountain, mountain range, or peak related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Vincent I. Maduka, OFR (born October 5, 1935) is a Nigerian engineer, broadcaster and the first director general of the Nigerian Television Authority (NTA). He holds the Nigerian national honour of the Officer of the Order of the Federal Republic of Nigeria, OFR (2003). He was between 2008 and 2016 a senior fellow at the  Pan-Atlantic University, Lagos, Nigeria. 
The civilian administration of President Shehu Shagari  in 1979 did not accept the non-partisan posture NTA was adopting under Maduka and in 1983 he, was summarily removed from NTA and assigned him to the Ministry of Communication as a technical adviser. 
Maduka is currently a facilitator at the School of Media and Communication (SMC), Pan-Atlantic University. He teaches Creativity and Innovation as a course to the Masters' students. 
Oscar Murillo (born 1986 in La Paila, Colombia) is a Colombian artist working within the painting tradition. He currently lives and works in various locations. 
The artist has also participated in numerous international group exhibitions and biennials, including the Sharjah Biennial 13 (2017) and the 56th Venice Biennale (2015). 
In 2019, he co-won the Turner Prize after requesting with his fellow nominees (Tai Shani, Helen Cammock, and Lawrence Abu Hamdan) that the jury award the prize for the first time to all four nominated artists. 
Murillo was born, and spent the first ten years of his life, in La Paila, a small town in the Valle del Cauca Department of Colombia. His parents moved to London when he was 10 years old and knew no English. He attended Cardinal Pole Catholic School in Hackney, returning in 2021 to exhibit there as part of his Frequencies project. 
Another ongoing theme throughout Murillo's work concerns postcolonial and socioeconomic disparities. In his work The Coming of the Europeans (2017), a large-scale banner conceived for the inaugural Kathmandu Triennale in the same year, he commented on the continuing legacy of colonialism in present-day international fairs. 
Murillo is represented by Carlos Ishikawa (London), Isabella Bortolozzi Galerie (Berlin) and David Zwirner (London, New York).[citation needed] 
Cornelia Wyngaarden (1942) is a Canadian media artist based in Vancouver, British Columbia. She creates works in video, sculpture, and installation, and has played a significant role in the development and institutionalization of new media in Vancouver. 
Wyngaarden has worked in various artist-run centres in Vancouver as a bookkeeper, editor, grant writer, administrator, photographer, fundraiser, and artist. Her video-based installations and single channel videotapes explore feminist themes, issues of gender, sexuality, technology, and the ways in which history and social conditions have complicated women's rights. She juxtaposes technological media with human subject matter to extend the interpretive possibilities of her work. 
Wyngaarden's work also addresses cross-dressing either overtly or subtextually, in order to deconstruct stereotypes and power relations. Employing lived experience, queer theory, and "forgotten" history and cultural mythology, her video installations also create an arena for queer representation. 
Originally installed in 1985 and remastered in 2015, the work is a video portrait of the life of a rancher named Keely Moll. Exploring her confidence and life through her perspective, this work shifts the Western gender paradigm of a man in the landscape by restituting female imagery. Her view is accompanied by a complex network of family relations, the land, labour and community; aspects that the Western Front Gallery has considered "facets of a life well lived." 
Originally installed in 1991 and remastered in 2015, Apollo's Kiss/Matricide: An Allegorical Landscape is a lightbox photograph taking inspiration from Aeschylus's Oresteia, spotlighting the tragic fate of Cassandra. Her representation of the female protagonist challenges the dominant male order. The market value of this work is estimated at $2,500. 
The Fragility of Origins is a 1994 video-based installation focusing on women's bodies in relation to art, historical practice, and other theoretical discourses. Through the combination of video, baroque painting allusions, photography, and text, Wyngaarden critiques many postmodern positions at a moment where marginalized subjects are becoming authors themselves. 
She received the VIVA Award in 1998, from the Jack and Doris Shadbolt Foundation for the Visual Arts. 
Wyngaarden has work in the permanent collections of The National Gallery of Canada, The Canada Council Art Bank, 49th Parallel Gallery in New York, and The California College of Art.[citation needed] 
After joined the French armed forces, Saint-Paul served as a Doctor-major in Algeria, then in Tunisia.  He was then stationed in France at Tours, then Nancy. In 1926, Saint-Paul was appointed director of the Armed Forces Health Service, in Nancy, with the rank of general. 
In 1931, he created the Association of Geneva places, to promote areas intended to accommodate civilians in the event of armed conflict, anticipating the principles of the Geneva conventions of 1949. 
Saint-Paul, at the instigation of Alexandre Lacassagne, carried out work on interior language. Defender of a scientific psychology, he intended to democratize the method of introspection by applying it to a large sample of individuals. His program is based on what he calls "cerebrology", or science of the brain, a scientific-medical method allowing to pass from individual psychology to a form of general psychology. 
^a Not a playable character ^b Downloadable content, playable only in multiplayer ^c Alternate skin available (pre-order/downloadable content) ^d Slag was renamed Slug in the game due to Slag being a derogatory term in some cultures ^e Playable in escalation 
In the final days of the war for Cybertron, the Autobots attempt to flee their dying homeworld aboard the Ark, but their spacecraft comes under attack by Decepticon forces. While Optimus Prime engages Megatron on the outer surface of the Ark, Bumblebee is sent by Ratchet to find and help the former. Just as Megatron is about to deliver a finishing blow, Bumblebee jumps in and sacrifices his life for Optimus. 
As of 2020, Activision has discontinued support for Fall of Cybertron, and the game's multiplayer servers have been shut down. 
A toy line based on the game was manufactured by Hasbro under the Transformers: Generations banner. Bruticus, a character formed by combining five Decepticons, is part of the line. Other figures include Optimus Prime, Jazz, and Shockwave. It was announced the toy line would be released August 21, 2012, in North America, a week earlier than originally planned. 
On August 8, 2016, Activision released Fall of Cybertron for PlayStation 4 and Xbox One in Australia without announcing it. These versions were developed by FunLabs. 
Fall of Cybertron has received generally positive reviews. The PlayStation 3 version received an aggregate score of 77/100 at Metacritic, while the Xbox 360 and Windows versions both hold scores of 79/100. GameRankings reports similar scores; the Xbox 360 version has an aggregate score of 81.40%, the PlayStation 3 a score of 76.48%, and the Windows version a score of 79.17% Jeff Gerstmann of Giant Bomb gave the game a 60% approval, the lowest score reported.[note 1] 
According to the NPD Group, the game sold well during the month of its release, placing seventh in sales despite only being available during the last ten days. Fall of Cybertron sold 105,000 copies during its North America debut according to Game Informer. 
A video game titled Transformers: Rise of the Dark Spark was developed by Edge of Reality and published by Activision. Most of the game takes place between the events of War for Cybertron and Fall of Cybertron. It is also a crossover to the fourth live-action film Transformers: Age of Extinction, and is therefore a tie-in to the film. It features characters from both timelines. 
Imparables is the last studio album of the duo Magnate & Valentino with the duo separating immediately after the release with each carrying their careers as solo artists. 
At an independent show held on July 14